CHAPTER I.
What countryman, I pray?
Of Mantua.
Of Mantua, sir?  marry, God forbid!
And come to Padua, careless of your life?
Taming of the Shrew
.
During
the momentous five minutes occupied in these
private movements, Raoul affected to be gaping about
in vulgar astonishment, examining the guns, rigging,
ornaments
of the quarter-deck, &c.; though, in truth, nothing
that passed among those near him, escaped his vigilant
attention. He was uneasy at the signs of the times, and
now regretted his own temerity; but still he thought his
incognito must be impenetrable. Like most persons, who
fancy they speak a foreign language well, he was
ignorant
,
too, in how many little things he betrayed himself; the
Englishman, cteris paribus, usually pronouncing the Italian
better than the Frenchman, on account of the greater affinity
between his native language and that of Italy, in what
relates to emphasis and sounds. Such was the state of mind
of our hero, then, as he got an intimation that the captain
of the ship wished to see him below. Raoul observed, as he
descended the ladder, to comply with what sounded very
much like an order, that he was followed by the two Elban
functionaries.
The cabin-lamp was trimmed, and the privateersman found
himself under a strong light, as soon as he had crossed the
threshold of the apartment. Cuffe and Griffin were standing
near the table, where the vice-governatore and the podest
took their stations, also; giving the whole arrangement a
most uncomfortable air of investigation and justice. For an
instant, Raoul wished that it was a portion of the Holy
Inquisition
,
rather than the tribunal before which he now found
himself so unexpectedly arraigned.
You must be cool, said Griffin, as the other moved
slowly up to the table, maintaining the outward signs of
steadiness, but cursing, in his heart, the severe ordeal which
he felt he was undergoing; do me the favour to put this
silk handkerchief about your neck.
S'nore, your eccellenza is pleased to joke; we men of
Capri think little of the nights, at this season of the year
still, as it seems to be your wish, I will honour myself so
much.
In that age, a black silk kerchief was the certain mark
of a military man. The old-fashioned stock had gone out,
with all but old-fashioned people, and the new-fashioned
substitute did not make its appearance until many years
later; the present usage, indeed, having come in from an
imitation of the military mania which pervaded Christendom
at the close of the last general war. Black around the neck,
properly relieved by the white of the linen, was then deemed
particularly military; and even in the ordinary dress, such
a peculiarity was as certain a sign, as the cockade, that the
wearer bore arms. Raoul knew this, and he felt he was
aiding in unmasking himself, by complying; but he thought
there might be greater danger, should he refuse to assume
the kerchief.
Your eccellenza is making a prince, of a very humble
boatman, he said, when his neck was fairly enveloped;
and my wife will think some great general is coming,
when I enter the door.
To help the delusion, friend, wear this, also, continued
Griffin, throwing the other one of his own undress uniform
coats, his stature and that of Raoul being very nearly the
same.
The true state of the case was now getting to be
somewhat
unequivocal; nevertheless, as steadiness and
compliance
were his only hopes, Raoul did as desired, and stood
1 *
with all his upper man decorated in an English naval
undress
uniform, while the nether remained  la lazzarone.
What say you, now, vice-governatore, resumed Griffin,
here are lights, and the dress?
I say that this gentleman has done me the honour of
several visits, in my poor residence, at Porto Ferrajo,
returned Andrea; and that never has he been more
welcome
,
than he is at this moment. Signor Smees, you are a
great lover of masquerades, and make a carnival of the
whole year. I trust, your distinguished countryman, Sir
Cicero, will have it in his power to convince these brave
Inglese, that all is done in pure pleasantry, and without a
crime.
Messieurs, said Raoul, stripping himself of his
borrowed
plumes, it is too late to feign, any longer.
If
I am
Raoul Yvard, as you say, I am certainly
not
le Feu-Follet.
Of course, you are aware, Monsieur, observed Griffin,
in French, that you are a prisoner to His Britannic
Majesty
?
Sa Majest Britannique has not made a conquest equal
to his success at the Nile, returned Raoul, ironically;
but he has me in his hands. It is not the first time that I
have had the honour to be a prisoner of war, and that, too,
in one of his own ships.
You are not to suppose that such will be your situation,
now, Monsieur Yvard. We arrest you in a totally different
character.
Not as a friend, I trust, Monsieur; for, I protest, I have
not the smallest claim to the character; as witness a short
interview off Porto Ferrajo, and an interesting incident at
the mouth of the Golo.
Your taunts may be spared, sir; fortune favoured you,
then, we allow; but, now, we arrest you as a spy.
Espion! repeated Raoul, starting; that is an office
I never contemplated, Monsieur, on coming on board your
ship. You will do me the justice to acknowledge, that it
was only at your own invitation, that I came on deck.
'T would be an infamy to pretend differently!
We will endure the infamy of our acts, Monsieur Yvard.
No one accuses you of having come on board the Proserpine
as a spy; but, when an enemy is found rowing about our
fleet, which is anchored in a hostile bay, and this in a
disguise
like yours, it must be a very scrupulous conscience,
that hesitates to pronounce him a spy, and liable to the
punishment of one.
This was so true, that the unfortunate young man now
felt the exceeding delicacy of his situation. In coming into
the bay, he had certainly been led by no other intention than
to find Ghita; and yet he could not but confess, to himself,
that he should not have hesitated about profiting, in his
public
character, by any information incidentally obtained. He
had subjected himself to the severest penalties of military
law, by yielding to his passion for Ghita; and he could not
discover a single available excuse, to plead in mitigation.
What does the poor devil say, Griffin, asked Cuffe,
who felt regret that so brave an enemy should be reduced to
so desperate a strait, notwithstanding his determined hostility
to all Frenchmen; do not bear too hard upon him, at the
first go off. Has he any excuse for his disguise?
The usual apology, no doubt, sira desire to serve his
one and undivided republic! If we should believe all such
chaps tell us, Captain Cuffe, we might go home, and send
deputies to the National Convention; if, indeed, they would
do us the favour to admit them to seats.
Gentlemen, said Raoul, in English, there is no
longer any occasion for an interpreter between us; I speak
your language sufficiently well to make myself understood.
I am sorry for your situation, Mr. Yvard, said Cuffe,
and wish, with all my heart, you had fallen into our hands
in open battle, instead of in this irregular way.
In which case, Monsieur le Capitaine, le Feu-Follet
would have been in your power, also! returned Raoul,
smiling ironically; but, messieurs, words are idle, now; I
am your prisoner, and must take my chance with you.
There is no necessity, however, for causing others to suffer
for my indiscretion. I shall esteem it a favour, messieurs, if
you will let the good people, in the boat alongside, pull
ashore, without molestation. It is getting late, and we must,
now, be nearly, or quite abeam of the place where they wish
to land; which is the marina grande of Sorrento.
Do you wish us to understand that your companions are
not French, Monsieur Yvard?
Oui, Monsieur le Capitaine; there is not a Frenchman
among them, I give you my parole d'honneur.
Of that fact, it may be well to satisfy ourselves, by an
examination, Captain Cuffe, put in Griffin, drily.
I have sent up to beg Mr. Winchester would get these
people on board
There is a young woman, in the boat, who is
unaccustomed
to entering ships, interrupted Raoul, hastily, and
I implore your tenderness, in her behalf. Let the men come
on board, if you think it necessary; but the signorina can
never climb this frigate's sides!
We will see to that; more especially, Monsieur Yvard,
as you appear to be so much interested in the lady's comfort.
At present, it will be my duty to put you under a sentry's
charge; and that it may be done in a way the least
offensive
to yourself, your prison, for the night at least, shall be
this cabin. Mr. Griffin, give orders to the marine officer,
accordingly.
In a few minutes, a soldier was introduced into the
forward
cabin, and Raoul was regularly placed under his
charge. Not till then did the officers return to the
quarterdeck
.
All this time, Ithuel, and his companions in the yawl,
were left to their own reflections, which were anything but
agreeable. Matters had been conducted so quietly, in-board,
however, that they possessed no clue to what had actually
occurred; though Ghita, in particular, was full of forebodings
and apprehensions. The frigate had towed them along at a
rate, which, as Raoul had said, had brought them quite
abreast of their landing, and within a league of it; and yet
she showed no signs of an intention to abate her speed, nor
did any one appear at the gangway, to speak to them. At
length a hoarse call was heard on deck, and the ship began
to shorten sail. Her fore-course was hauled up, and the
spanker was brailed; then the royals were clewed up, and
furled; the top-gallant-sails followed; and presently the
Proserpine was reduced to her three topsails and jib. All
this, finished just as Cuffe reappeared on deck, was done by
the watch, and in about five minutes. As soon as sail was
thus taken in, the helm was put to port, the ship came up to
the wind, on the starboard tack, and the main-topsail was
laid to the mast, bringing the yawl under her lee, and close
alongside of the ship. This manuvre was no sooner
executed
,
than a seaman ran lightly down the vessel's side, and
entered the yawl. After examining forward and aft, he
called out, all right, sir, and shoved the boat off to a
little distance from the frigate. The yard and stay-tackles
fell, at the next instant, were overhauled down, and hooked
by the man in the boat. The boatswain's mate, in the
gangway
,
piped, haul-taut, and the slack of the tackle was
pulled in; then followed a long, steady blow of the call,
piping, sway-away, and the boat, with all in her, rose
from the water, and ascended as high as the
hammock-cloths
in the waist, when the stay-tackles took the strain,
the yard-tackles eased-off, and the boat was landed in the
waist of the ship, as gingerly as if it were made of glass,
and as steadily as if it had no more weight than a seaman's
hammock. Ghita uttered a faint scream, when she found
herself rising into the air, and then she hid her face,
awaiting
the result with dread. As for Carlo Giuntotardi, the
movement aroused him a little from his customary apathy,
and that was all; whereas, Ithuel bethought him seriously
of leaping into the water, and striking out for the land. He
could swim a league, he thought; but there was the certainty
of being followed by boats, and overtaken; a consideration
that effectually curbed his impatience. It is not easy to
describe the sensation with which this man found himself,
once more, standing on the deck of his old prison, with the
additional danger of being detected and treated as a deserter.
It may sound revolting, at the present day, to suppose a case
in which a foreigner was thrown by violence, into the military
service of a nation, and then was put in jeopardy of his life,
because he used a privilege of nature, to fly from such
persecution
,
as soon as circumstances placed the means in his
power. The last age, however, witnessed many scenes of
similar wrongs; and, it is to be feared, in despite of all
the mawkish philanthropy, and unmeaning professions of
eternal peace, that it is now the fashion to array against the
experience of mankind, that the next age will present their
parallels, unless the good sense of this nation infuse into the
federal legislative bodies juster notions of policy, more
extended
views of their own duties, and more accurate opinions
of the conditions of the several communities of Christendom,
than has marked their laws and reasoning for the few past
months. In a word, the subject of all these tribulations
felt an intimate conviction, that his rights, legal and moral,
would avail him but little, on the present occasion. Then a
man never does wrong, even in defence of that which is
inherently his due, without the secret consciousness that
evil may not be done, that good may come of it; and Ithuel
had a certain inward monitor to remind him, that, much as
he had in the way of justifiable complaint, he had carried
the war into the enemy's country.
The boat had no sooner touched the deck, than its cargo
was handed out by the boatswain, who, keeping no watch,
had not yet turned in; and who was almost as important a
functionary, on board the Proserpine, as was Vito Viti, in
the town of Porto Ferrajo. He examined each individual,
as he or she landed, as he called it; Ghita attracting so
much of his attention, as completely to eclipse her
companions
.
The soft air and manner of the girl appeared so
winning
,
indeed, by the light of the moon, which now fell clear
upon the decks, that all near her, including the officers,
submitted to very much the same influence.
So, so, Master Yvard, said Cuffe, in English, if you
do come into an enemy's camp, incog., it is in reasonably
good company. That girl is Italian, Winchester; and she
even seems modest!
Little Ghita! exclaimed Vito Viti, as I hope, one
day, to lie in the bosom of Father Abraham! Belissima
Ghita, what has brought thee here, and in such evil
company
?
Ghita was in tears; but, uncertain how far Raoul was
committed, she struggled for self-command, and did succeed
in suppressing emotions that might, otherwise, have rendered
his situation more dangerous. Drying her eyes, she curtsied
to the vice-governatore and the podest, and then answered
the question.
Signori, she said, it is a relief to meet countrymen
and old acquaintances, on board this strange ship; and I look
to you for protection. I do not call it strange, or evil
company
,
for an orphan niece to be on the water with her uncle,
and one that has ever been a father to her.
Ahsure enough, vice-governatore, this is Carlo
Giuntotardi
,
the uncle; and the man who dwells so much with
the saints, even on earth, that he seldom speaks to a sinner.
But thou knowest, little Ghita, that one of thy watermen is
no less a person than Raoul Yvard, the wickedest corsair
that sails out of France, and the pest and persecution of the
whole Italian coast? Did the church condescend to notice
such an unbelieving republican, it would be to command all
its faithful to unite in their prayers for his destruction.
Raoul Yvard! repeated Ghita, with sufficient
astonishment
in her manner to satisfy any reasonable amount of
wonder, on the part of the other. Are you certain, Signor
Podest, of the truth of what you say?
As certain as the confession of the party, himself, can
make us.
Confession, Signore!
Si, bella Ghita; confessionyour boatmanyour man
of Capriyour lazzarone, confesses himself to be neither
more nor less than the commander of that worker of iniquity,
le Feu-Follet.
Does le Feu-Follet do more than other cruisers of the
enemy?but Ghita felt she was getting to be indiscreet, and
she ceased.
I do believe, Winchester, said Cuffe, that this is the
very girl, and yonder is the very old man, who came into
Nelson's cabin, to-day, with something to say about the
poor prince who was executed this afternoon!
What could such people have in common with the
unfortunate
Caraccioli!
Sure enoughyet, these are the people. The Queen
of the Fleet  our Lady Admiraless, had it all to herself;
and what passed between them, in Italian, I know no more
than if it had been in Greek. She never told
me
, you may
rest assured; and, from the look of her eye, I question a
good deal if she ever told Nelson.
I wish to heaven his lordship would cut adrift from his
moorings alongside of that craft, Captain Cuffe. I do assure
you, sir, the fleet begins to talk loudly on the subject;was
it any other man, there 'd be the devil to pay about itbut,
we can all stand a good deal from Nelson and Bront.
Wellwelllet every man father his own children:
you ought to be quiet, Winchester, for he asked very kindly
about your hurt, to-day, and would have sent you aboard
some knick-knack or other, for the stomach, but I told him
you were all a-tanto again, and at duty. What between
his head, and his arm, and his eye, he 's got to be such a
hulk, himself, that he thinks every wounded man a sort of
a relation. I should not complain, however, if the
smallpox
could lay hold of that beauty.
This has been a bad day's work, for England, depend
on it, Captain Cuffe!
Well, if it has, St. Vincent, and the Nile, were
good
days' works; and we 'll let one balance the other. Inquire
of this young woman, Mr. Griffin, if I had not the pleasure
of seeing her, to-day, on board the Foudroyant?
The question was put, as desired, and Ghita quietly, but
unhesitatingly, answered in the affirmative.
Then ask her to explain how she happened to fall into
the company of Raoul Yvard?
Signori, said Ghita, naturally, for she had nothing to
conceal on this point, we live on Monte Argentaro, where
my uncle is the keeper of the Prince's towers. You know,
we have much to fear from the barbarians along all that
coast; and last season, when the peace with France kept
the Inglesi at a distanceI know not how it is, signori, but
they say, the barbarians are always hardest on the enemies
of Inghilterrabut, the past season a boat from a rover had
seized upon my uncle and myself, and were carrying us off
into captivity, when a Frenchman, and his lugger, rescued us.
From that time we became friends; and our friend has often
stopped near our towers, to visit us. To-day, we found him
in a boat, by the side of the English admiral's ship; and, as
an old acquaintance, he undertook to bring us to the
Sorrentine
shore, where we are, at present, staying with my
mother's sister.
This was told so naturally, as to carry with it the
conviction
of its truth; and, when Griffin had translated it, he did
not fail to assure his superior that he would pledge himself
for the accuracy of the statement.
Ay, you young luffs, Griffin, are never backward with
your vows
for
or
to
pretty girls, answered Cuffe. The
girl does seem honest, however; and, what is more
extraordinary
,
for the company she is in, she seems modest, too.
Tell her she shall not be harmed, though we cannot deprive
ourselves of the pleasure of her company immediately. She
shall have the larboard state-room in my cabin, until
morning
,
where she and her uncle may live a great deal more
comfortably than in one of their out-of-door Neapolitan
rookeries. Monte Argentaro, ha!  That 's a bluff just
beyond
the Roman coast, and it is famously besprinkled with
towers  half a dozen of them, at least, within as many
miles, and who knows but this Jack-o'-Lantern may be
extinguished some fine morning, should we fail of laying
our hands on it, now?
We can hardly fail of the last, Captain Cuffe, having
her commander in our possession.
Orders were then given to dispose of the prisoners,
leaving
the boat on deck. Raoul was sent below, and put in
a canvass state-room, the arms having been removed, even to
the razors, and a sentinel placed at the door. Escape from
such a situation was impossible; and as for self-violence,
when
that
point was considered, Cuffe had coolly remarked
Poor devil; hanged he must be, and if he should be his
own executioner, it will save us the discomfort of having a
scene on board. I suppose Nelson will order him to our
fore-yard-arm, as a jewel-block. I don't see, why he
cannot
use a Neapolitan frigate, for this job, too; they are good
for nothing else.
I rather think, Captain Cuffe, he will swing on board
his own lugger, should we succeed in catching her,
answered
the lieutenant.
By George, you 're right, Griffin; and that 's another
inducement for looking out sharp for the Few-Folly. How
much better it would have been, had we burnt them all, in
a bunch, off the Golo!
Then followed the arrangement by which the prisoner
was put into the gun-room, as mentioned. Ghita and her
uncle were shown into the empty cabin state-room, and
mattresses were provided on which they might repose.
Then the captain and his two guests retired to the
aftercabin
,
whither Griffin was invited to accompany them.
Here the captain recollected that there had been a fourth
individual in the boat, and he sent an order on deck for him
to come down for examination. Ithuel observing the
attention
Vol. II.  2
of the officers occupied by Ghita and her uncle, had
stolen back towards his own yawl, of which he had taken
possession, stretching himself out at length, with the
apparent
design to sleep, but, in reality, to keep himself out of
mind, by remaining out of sight; reserving, in petto, an
intention to jump overboard, should the ship go near enough
to the land to give him a chance for his life, after the moon
set. In this situation he was found, aroused from his lair,
and led into the cabin.
It has been mentioned that Ithuel would not consent to
trust himself near the Proserpine, without disguising his
person. Raoul being well provided with all the materials
for a masquerade, this had been effected by putting a black
curling wig over his own lank, sandy hair, colouring his
whiskers and eye-brows, and trusting the remainder to the
transformation which might be produced by the dress, or
rather undress, of a Neapolitan waterman. The greatest
obstacle to this arrangement had been a certain queue,
which Ithuel habitually wore in a cured eel-skin that he
had brought with him from America, eight years before, and
both of which, queue and eel-skin, he cherished as relics
of better days. Once a week this queue was unbound and
combed, but all the remainder of its existence it continued in
a solid mass quite two feet in length, being as hard, and
about as thick as a rope an inch in diameter. Now, the
queue had undergone its hebdomadal combing just an hour
before Raoul announced his intention to proceed to Naples
in the yawl, and it would have been innovating on the only
thing that Ithuel treated with reverence, to undo the work
until another week had completed its round. The queue,
therefore, was disposed of, under the wig, in the best
manner
that its shape and solidity would allow.
Ithuel was left in the fore-cabin, and his presence was
announced to Cuffe.
It's no doubt some poor devil belonging to the
Few-Folly's
crew, observed the English captain, in a rather
compassionate manner, and we can hardly think of
stringing
him
up, most probably for obeying an order. That would
never do, Griffin; so we 'll just step out and overhaul his
log, in French, and send him off to England to a
prisonship
,
by the first return vessel.
As this was said, the four in the after-cabin left it
together
,
and stood before this new prisoner. Of course Ithuel
understood all that was said in English, while the very idea
of being catechised in French threw him into a cold sweat.
In this strait, the idea suddenly crossed his mind, that his
greatest security would be in feigning dumbness.
Ecoutez, mon ami, commenced Griffin, in very
respectable
English-French, you are to tell me nothing but
the truth, and it may be all the better for you. You belong
to the Feu-Follet, of course?
Ithuel shook his head in strong disgust, and endeavoured
to make a sound that he intended to represent a dumb man
struggling to utter the word Napoli.
What is the fellow after, Griffin? said Cuffe. Can
it be he doesn't understand French! Try him a touch in
Italian, and let us see what he will say to that.
Griffin repeated very much what he had said before,
merely changing the language, and received the same
gagging
sounds for an answer. The gentlemen looked at each
other, as much as to express their surprise. But, unluckily
for Ithuel's plan, he had brought with him from the granite
state, a certain propensity to pass all the modulations of his
voice through his nose; and the effort to make a suppressed
sound brought that member more than usually into
requisition
,
thereby producing a certain disagreeable combination
that destroyed everything like music that commonly
characterizes
the Italian words. Now, Andrea had been struck
with this peculiarity about the tones of the American's voice,
in the interview at Benedetta's wine-house; and the whole
connection between Raoul and this singular person being
associated in his mind, the truth flashed on him, as it might
be, at a glance. His previous success that night had
emboldened
the worthy vice-governatore, and, without any
remark, he walked steadily up to Ithuel, removed the wig,
and permitted the eel-skin queue to resume its natural
position
down the back of its owner.
Ha!  What, veechy, exclaimed Cuffe, laughing
you unearth them like so many foxes, to-night. Now,
Griffin, hang me if I do not think I 've seen that chap
before
!
Isn't he the very man we found at the wheel of la
Voltigeuse, when we boarded her?
Lord bless me, Captain Cuffe  no sir. This fellow is
as long as two of that chapand yet I know the face, too
I wish you 'd let me send for one of the young gentlemen,
sir; they 're worth all the rest of the ship at remembering
faces.
The permission was given, and the cabin steward was
sent on deck to desire Mr. Roller, one of the oldest
midshipmen
,
and who was known to have the watch, to come
below.
Look at this fellow, Mr. Roller, said Griffin, as soon
as the youngster had taken his place in the group, and
tell us if you can make anything of him?
It 's the lazy-rony, sir, we hoisted in, a bit ago, when
we struck the boat on deck.
Ay, no doubt of that  but we think we have seen his
face before;  can
you
make that out.
Roller now walked round the immovable subject of all
these remarks; and he, too, began to think the
singular-looking
object was no stranger to him. As soon, however,
as he got a sight of the queue, he struck Ithuel a smart slap
on the shoulder, and exclaimed
You 're welcome back, my lad; I hope you 'll find your
berth aloft, as much to your mind as it used to be. This
is Bolt, Captain Cuffe, the fore-top-man, who ran from us
when last in England, was caught and put in a guard-ship,
from which they sent us word he stole a boat, and got off
with two or three French prisoners, who happened to be
there at the moment, on some inquiry or other. Don't you
remember it all, Mr. Griffinyou may remember the fellow
pretended to be an American.
Ithuel was now completely exposed, and he at once
perceived
that his wisest way was to submit. Cuffe's
countenance
darkened, for he regarded a deserter with a species
of professional horror, and the impresed deserter to whose
services England had no other right than that of might,
with an additional degree of resentment, that was very
fairly proportioned to the inward consciousness he felt that
a great wrong was done in detaining the man at all. There
is nothing extraordinary in these feelings; a very common
resource, under such circumstances, being to imagine
delinquencies
that justify us to ourselves, by endeavouring to
believe that the subject of any act of our oppression at least
merits the infliction.
Do you dare to deny what this young gentleman has
just said, sirrah? demanded the captain. I now
remember
you, myself; you are Bolt, the fore-top-man, that ran
at Plymouth.
You 'd 'a run, too, Captain Cuffe, had you been in my
place, had the ship been at Jericho.
Enough  no impudence, sir. Send for the
master-at-arms
,
Mr. Griffin, and have the fellow ironed: to-morrow
we 'll look into the affair.
These orders were obeyed, and Ithuel was removed to the
place where the master-at-arms usually reigns on board
ship. Cuffe now gave the lieutenant his cong, and then
withdrew to the inner-cabin, to prepare a despatch for the
rear-admiral. He was near an hour writing a letter to his
mind, but finally succeeded. Its purport was as follows.
He reported the capture of Raoul, explaining the mode, and
the circumstances under which that celebrated
privateersman
had fallen into his hands. He then asked for
instructions
as to the manner in which he was to dispose of his
prisoner. Having communicated this important fact, he
ventured some suggestions as to the probable vicinity of the
lugger, and the hopes he entertained of being able to find
out her precise situation, through the agency of Bolt, whose
condition he also explained, hinting at the same time the
expediency of bringing both delinquents to as speedy trials
as possible, as the most certain manner of using their
apprehensions
in seizing le Feu-Follet. The letter concluded
with an earnest request that another frigate, which was
mentioned, her captain being junior to Cuffe, and a
fast-sailing
sloop that was lying off Naples, might be sent down to
assist him in heading off the lugger, as he feared the
latter was too swift to be overtaken by the Prosperpine alone,
more especially in the light winds which prevailed.
When this letter was written, addressed and sealed, Cuffe
went on deck, again. It was now nine o'clock, or two bells,
and Winchester had the quarter-deck nearly to himself. All
was as tranquil and calm on the deck of that fine frigate,
as a moonlight night, a drowsy watch, a light wind, and
smooth water could render things, in a bay like that of
Naples
.
2 *
Gleamings of fire were occasionally seen over
Vesuvius
,
but things in that direction looked misty and mysterious,
though Capri loomed up, dark and grand, a few miles
to-leeward
,
and Ischia was visible, a confused but distant pile
on the lee-bow. An order from Cuffe, however, set
everybody
in motion. Yard and stay-tackles were overhauled,
and hooked on, the boatswain's-mate piped the orders, and
the first-cutter was hoisted over the waist-cloths, and
lowered
into the water. Away, there, you first-cutters, had
been hoarsely called on the berth-deck, and the crew were
ready to enter the boat, by the time the latter was lowered.
The masts were stepped, Roller appeared, in a pee-jacket,
to guard against the night air, and Cuffe gave him his
instructions
.
Set your sails, and stretch over under the north shore,
Mr. Roller, said the captain, who stood in the lee-gangway,
to give a last word. You will fetch in about Queen Joan's
Palace. There, you had better take to your oars, and pull
up along the land. Remember, sir, to join us by the first
ship that comes out; and, if none is sent, to come down with
the morning breeze, in the boat.
Roller gave the customary ay, ay, sir; the boat shoved
off; as soon as from under the lee of the ship, the luggs
were set, and half an hour later, the night had swallowed
up her form. Cuffe remained an hour longer, walking the
deck with his first-lieutenant, and then, satisfied that the
night would prove propitious, he went below, leaving orders
to keep the ship lying-to, until morning.
As for Roller, he pulled alongside of the Foudroyant, just
as the bells of the fleet were striking eight, or at midnight.
Nelson was still up, writing in his cabin. The despatch
was delivered, and then the secretary of the admiral, with
a clerk or two, were called from their berths, for nothing
lagged that this active-minded man had in charge. Orders
were written, copied, signed, and sent to different ships, by
two o'clock, in order that the morning breeze might not be
lost; and then, and not till then, did the employes think of
rest.
Roller left the flag-ship at two, having eaten a hearty
supper
in Nelson's own cabin, and repaired on board the
Terpsichore
,
a smart little frigate of thirty-two guns,
twelve-pounders
,
with instructions to her captain to receive him.
Two hours later, this ship, in company with another still
smaller, the Ringdove, 18, left her anchorage, under a cloud
of canvass, and stood down the bay, carrying studding-sails
on both sides, with a light wind at north-west, heading
towards
Capri.
CHAPTER II.
Speak to the business, Master Secretary:
Why are we met in council?
King Henry VIII
.
When
the idlers of the Proserpine appeared on deck the
following morning, the ship was about a league to-windward
of Capri, having forged well over towards the north side of
the bay, during the night, wore round, and got thus far back
on the other tack. From the moment light returned,
look-outs
had been aloft with glasses, examining every nook and
corner of the bay, in order to ascertain whether any signs
of the lugger were to be seen, under its bold and picturesque
shore. So great is the extent of this beautiful basin, so
grand the natural objects which surround it, and so clear
the atmosphere, that even the largest ships loom less than
usual on its waters; and it would have been a very possible
thing for le Feu-Follet to anchor near some of the landings,
and lie there unnoticed for a week, by the fleet above,
unless
tidings were carried to the latter by observers on the
shore.
Cuffe was the last to come on deck, six bells, or seven
o'clock, striking, as the occupants of the quarter-deck first
lifted their hats to him. He glanced around him, and then
turned towards Griffin, who was now officer of the watch.
I see two ships coming down the bay, Mr. Griffin, he
said  no signals yet, I suppose, sir?
Certainly not, sir, or they would have been reported
We make out the frigate to be the Terpsichore, and the
sloop, I know by her new royals, is the Ringdove. The
first ship, Captain Cuffe, brags of being able to travel faster
than anything within the Straits!
I 'll bet a month's pay the Few-Folly walks away from
her, on a bow-line, ten knots to her nine. If she can do that
with the Proserpine, she 'll at least do that with Mistress
Terpsichore. There goes a signal from the frigate now, Mr.
Griffin, though a conjuror could hardly read it, tailing directly
on as it does. Well, quarter-master, what do you make it
out to be?
It 's the Terpsichore's number, sir; and the other ship
has just made the Ringdove's.
Show ours, and keep a sharp look-out; there 'll be
something else to tell us presently.
In a few minutes, the Terpsichore expressed a wish to
speak the Proserpine, when Cuffe filled his main-top-sail, and
hauled close upon a wind. An hour later, the three ships
passed within hail of each other, when both the junior
commanders
lowered their gigs and came on board the
Proserpine
to report. Roller followed in the first-cutter, which had
been towed down by the Terpsichore.
The Terpsichore was commanded by Captain Sir
Frederick
Dashwood, a lively young baronet, who preferred the
active life of a sailor, to indolence and six thousand a year
on shore; and who had been rewarded for his enterprise by
promotion and a fast frigate, at the early age of
two-and-twenty
.
The Ringdove was under a master-commandant,
of the name of Lyon, who was just sixty years old, having
worked his way up to his present rank by dint of long and
arduous services, owing his last commission and his
command
to the accident of having been a first-lieutenant at the
battle of Cape St. Vincent. Both these gentlemen appeared
simultaneously on the quarter-deck of the Proserpine, where
they were duly received by the captain and all the
assembled
officers.
Good morrow to you, Cuffe, said Dashwood, giving the
other the tip of his fingers, as soon as the ceremonious part
of the reception was over; and casting a glance,
half-admiring
,
half-critical, at the appearance of things on deck
What has Nelson sent us down here about, this fine
morning
,
and  ha!  how long have you had those brass
ornaments
on your capstan?
They were only put there yesterday, Sir Frederick; a
little slush-money did it all.
Has Nelson seen them? I rather fancy notthey tell
me he 's as savage as an Arab about knick-knackery,
now-a-days
.
What an awkward job that was yesterday
afternoon
,
by the way, Cuffe!
It has been a bad business, and, as an old Agamemnon,
I would give a year's rank that it never had taken place.
A year's rank!that's a great deal; a year would set
me back, hard aground alongside of old Lyon, here. I was
a lieutenant less than three years since, and couldn't afford
half a year. But all you old Agamemnons think as much
of your little Nel. as if he were a pretty girl; isn't it true,
Lyon?
I dare say it may be, Sir Frederick, answered Lyon;
and if you had been the first-lieutenant of a two-decker,
off Cape St. Vincent, on the 14th February, 1797, you would
have thought as much of him, too. Here we were, only
fifteen sail in all,  that is, of vessels of the line  with the
wind at
Oh, hang your battle, Lyon, I 've heard all that, at least
seventeen times!
Well, if ye haave, Sir Frederick, returned Lyon, who
was a Scotchman, it 'll be just once a year since ye war'
born, leaving out the time ye war' in the nursery. But
we 've not come here to enlighten Captain Cuffe in these
particulars, so much as in obedience to an order of the
rear-admiral's
little Nel. as ye 'll be calling him, I suppose,
Sir Frederick Dashwood?
Nay, it 's you old Agamemnons, or old fellows, who
gave him that name
Ye 'll please to excuse me, sir, interrupted Lyon, a
little
dogmaticallyye 've never heard me call him anything
but my lord, since His Majesty, God bless him! was
graciously
pleased to elevate him to the peerage  nothing but
`my lord,' and the `rear-admiral;' naval rank being entitled
to its privileges even on the throne. Many a king has been
a colonel, and I see no disparagement in one's being an
admiral. Won't ye be thinking, Captain Cuffe, that since
my lord is made Duke of Bront, he is entitled to be called
`Your Grace'all the Scottish dukes are so designated, and
I see no reason why the rear-admiral should not have his
just dues, as well as the best of them.
Let him alone for that, said Cuffe, laughing; Nel.
will look out for himself, as well as for the king. But,
gentlemen
,
I suppose you have not come down here merely for
a morning walk  have I any reports to hear?
I beg your pardon, Captain Cuffe, but I was really
forgetting
my errand, answered Dashwood. Here are your
orders for you, and we are both directed to report to you.
The lieutenant who brought the package aboard
me
, said
there would be a spy to try, and a lugger to catch. Did they
tell you anything of this matter, Lyon?
No, Sir Frederick; not being inquisitive, I hear but little
of what is going on in the fleet. My orders are to report
myself and ship to Captain Cuffe, for service, which I have
the honour now to do.
Well, gentlemen, here are further instructions for you.
This is an order to hold a court, composed of Captain
Richard
Cuffe, of the Proserpine, president; Captain Sir Frederick
Dashwood, Bart., of the Terpsichore, &c. &c.; and Lyon,
Winchester, and Spriggs, your first-lieutenant, Sir
Frederick
,
for the trials of Raoul Yvard, a French citizen, on the
charge of being a spy, and Ithuel Bolt, seaman, &c., on the
charge of being a deserter. Here is everything in rule, and
there are your respective orders, gentlemen.
Bless me, I 'd no notion of this! exclaimed Lyon, who
was greatly averse to this part of an officer's duty. I 'd
thought it altogither a trial of speed after a Frenchman, for
which purpose, the rear-admiral, or my lord, or his grace,
whichever it may be right to call him, had seen fit to bring
three of his fastest ships together.
I wish it was nothing but the last, Captain Lyon; but
we have the disagreeable duty of trying a spy and a deserter,
before us. You will return to your ships, gentlemen, and
follow us in to an anchorage. I intend to bring up, at a
single anchor, under the shore at Capri, where we can lie
during the calm, and get through with our courts. The
cases will be clear, and not detain us long, and we can send
look-outs up on the heights to examine the sea and the coast
outside. In the meantime, we must be busy lest we lose the
breeze. You will attend to the signal for the court.
At this order the two visiters got into their boats, and the
Proserpine again filled. The three vessels now made the
best of their way towards the point of destination, anchoring
off the town, or village, in the island of Capri, just as two
bells struck. Ten minutes later, the Proserpine fired a gun,
and ran up the flag which denotes the sitting of a
court-martial
.
Although it has not been deemed necessary to relate them,
the reader will understand that all the details required by
the law, had been observed, as regards these trials; the
promptitude of the proceedings being partly characteristic
of the decision of the admiral, but more in consequence of a
wish to use the charges against the delinquents, as a means
of seizing the true hero of our tale, the little Feu-Follet.
While a mistaken, not to say a mawkish philanthropy,
is unsettling so many of the ancient land-marks of society,
and, among other heresies, is preaching the doctrine that
the object of punishment is the reformation of the
criminal
,
it is a truth which all experience confirms that nothing
renders justice so terrible, and consequently so efficient, as
its promptitude and certainty. When all its requirements
are observed, the speediest exercise of its functions is the
most conducive to the protection of society, the real motive
for the existence of all human regulations of this nature;
and it is a great merit of the much-abused English
ordinances
,
that the laws are rarely made stalking-horses for the
benefit of the murderer or the forger; but, that once fairly
tried and convicted, the expiation of their crimes awaits the
offenders with a certainty and energy that leave the
impression
on the community that punishments were intended to
produce. That this people has done well in liberating itself
from many of their inherited usages and laws, is as certain
as that one age has interests different from another; one set
of circumstances, governing principles at variance with those
which preceded them; but, it would be well, also, to
remember
,
that, while moral changes are as necessary as physical
exercise, there are truths that are eternal, and rules of right
and prudence, which can never be departed from with
impunity
.
When the members of the court mentioned, assembled in
the cabin of the Proserpine, it was with all the forms and
exterior observances that were necessary to command
respect. The officers were in full dress, the oaths were
administered with solemnity, the table was arranged with
taste, and an air of decent gravity reigned over all. Little
time, however, was lost unnecessarily, and the officer to
whom had been assigned the duty of prevt-marshal, was
directed to produce his prisoners.
Raoul Yvard and Ithuel Bolt were brought into the cabin
at the same moment, though they came from different parts
of the ship, and were allowed to hold no communication
with each other. When both were present, they were
arraigned, and the accusations were read to them. Raoul
having admitted his knowledge of English, no interpreter
was sworn, but the proceedings were had in the usual
manner
.
As it was intended to try the Frenchman first, and
Ithuel might be wanted as a witness, the latter was taken
out of the cabin again, courts-martial never permitting one
witness to hear what another has testified, although an
ingenious
substitute for ears has been adopted of late, by
publishing
in the journals, from day to day, whatever passes,
when the length of the proceedings will admit of such a
device.
We will now swear the Signor Andrea Barrofaldi,
commenced the Judge Advocate, as soon as the
preliminaries
were observed. This is a Catholic bible, sir, and I
will put the oaths in Italian, if you will have the goodness
first to swear me in as an interpreter.
This was done, when the oath was duly administered to
the vice-governatore. Then came a few questions as to the
station, country, &c., of the witness, after which more
material
matter was inquired into.
Signor Vice-Governatore, do you know the prisoner by
sight? demanded the Judge Advocate.
Si; I have had the honour to receive him in my
residence
in the island of Elba.
Under what name and circumstances was he known to
you, Signore?
Ehhe called himself Sir Smees, a capitano in the
service
of the English king.
What vessel did he pretend to command?
Ze Ving-y-Vinga lugger, which I have since had
reason
to think is le Feu-Follet, a corsair under the French
flag. Monsieur did me the favour to make two visits to
Porto Ferrajo, in the character of Sir Smees.
And you now know that this is Raoul Yvard, the French
privateersman you have mentioned?
Eh
know?
I know they
say
this is the Signor Yvard,
and that ze Ving-y-Ving is le Feu-Follet.
They
say
, will not do, Signor Barrofaldi. Can you not
say this much of your own knowledge?
Non, Signore.
The court was now cleared; when it re-opened, Vito Viti
was sent for, and properly sworn, his attention being
particularly
directed to the cross on the back of the book.
Did you ever see the prisoner, before this occasion,
Signor Viti, demanded the Judge Advocate, after the
preliminary
questions had been put.
Signore, oftener than it is agreeable to remember. I do
not think that two grave magistrates were ever more
mystified
,
than were the vice-governatore and myself! Eh-h-h
Signori, the wisest sometimes become like sucking children,
when there passes a mist before the understanding.
Relate the circumstances under which this occurred, to
the court, Signor Podest.
Why, Signori, the facts were just these. Andrea
Barrofaldi
,
as you know, is the vice-governatore of Porto
Ferrajo
,
and I am its unworthy podest. Of course, it is our
duty to look into all matters affecting the public weal, and
more especially into the business and occupations of strangers
who come into our island. Well, it is now three weeks or
more since a lugger, or felucca, was seen
Which was it, a felucca, or a lugger? demanded the
judge Advocate, holding his pen ready to write the answer.
Both, Signore; a felucca and a lugger.
Ahthere were two; a felucca and a lugger.
No, Signorebut this felucca was a lugger. Tommaso
Tonti wished to mystify me about that, too; but I have not
been podest in a sea-port, so many years, for nothing. No,
Vol. II.  3
Signori, there are all sorts of feluccas  ship-feluccas,
brig-feluccas
,
and lugger-feluccas.
When this answer was translated, the members of the
court smiled, while Raoul Yvard fairly laughed.
Well, Signor Podest, resumed the Judge Advocate
the prisoner came into Porto Ferrajo in a lugger?
So it was said, Signore. I did not see him actually on
board of her, but he professed to be the commander of a
certain vessel, in the service of the King of Inghilterra,
called ze Ving-y-Ving, and said that his own name was
Smeessiil capitano, or Sir Smees.
Professed?  Do you not know that this lugger was the
notorious French privateer, le Feu-Follet?
I know they say so, now, Signori; but the
vice-governatore
and I supposed her to be ze Ving-y-Ving.
And do you not know that the prisoner is actually Raoul
Yvard; of your own knowledge, I mean?
Corpo di Bacco!How should I know any such thing,
Signor Guideca-Avvocato, exclaimed Vito Viti, who
literally
translated what he understood to be the title of his
interrogator, thereby converting him into a sort of
ship-felucca
how should I know any such thing! I do not
keep company with corsairs, except when they come upon
our island and call themselves `Sir Smees.'
The Judge Advocate and the members of the court
looked gravely at each other. No one in the least doubted
that the prisoner was Raoul Yvard, but it was necessary
legally to prove it, before he could be condemned. Cuffe
was now asked if the prisoner had not confessed his own
identity, but no one could say he had done so in terms,
although much of his conversation would seem to imply as
much. In a word, justice was like to be in what is by no
means an unusual dilemma for that upright functionary;
viz.unable to show a fact that no one doubted. At length
Cuffe recollected Ghita and Ithuel, and he wrote their names
on a piece of paper, and passed them down the table to the
Judge Advocate. The latter nodded his head, as much as
to say he understood the president's meaning; and then he
told the prisoner he might cross-examine the witness, if he
saw fit.
Raoul fully understood his situation. Although he
certainly
had not entered the Bay of Naples with any of the
ordinary views of a spy, he was aware how far he had
committed
himself, and foresaw the readiness with which his
enemies would destroy him, could they find the legal means
of so doing. He also comprehended the dilemma in which
his accusers were placed for the want of testimony, and, at
once, resolved to turn the circumstance as much as possible
to his advantage. Until that moment, the idea of denying
his own identity had never crossed his mind; but perceiving
what he fancied an opening for escape, it was but natural
to avail himself of its protection. Turning, then, to the
podest, he put his questions in English, that they might go
fairly through the same process of interpretation as the rest
of the examination.
You say, Signor Podest, he commenced, that you
saw me in the town of Porto Ferrajo, and in the island of
Elba?
Si  in which town I have the honour to be one of the
authorities.
You say I professed to command a vessel in the service
of the King of England; a felucca, called ze
Ving-and-Ving
?
Size Ving-y-Vingthe commander of that felucca.
I understood you to say, Mr. Podest, put in Lyon,
that the craft was a lugger?
A felucca-lugger, Signor Capitano  nothing more nor
less than that, on my honour.
And all these honourable officers well know, observed
Raoul, ironically, that a felucca-lugger, and a lugger, such
as le Feu-Follet is understood to be, are very different things.
Now, Signore, you have never heard me say that I am a
Frenchman?
Non  you have not been so weak as to confess that to
one who hates the name of the Franese. Cospetto!  If
all the Grand Duke's subjects detested his enemies as I do,
he would be the most powerful prince in Italy!
No doubt, Signore; and, now, suffer me to inquire if
you heard any other name for that felucca, than ze
Ving-and-Ving
.
Did I ever call her le Feu-Follet?
Non  always ze Ving-y-Ving; never anything else;
but
Your pardon, Signore; have the goodness to answer my
questions. I called the felucca ze Ving-and-Ving; and I
called myself le capitaine Smeet; is it not true?
Si  Ving-y-Ving and il capitano Smees  Sir Smees,
a signore of an illustrious English family of that name, if I
remember right.
Raoul smiled, for he was confident this notion proceeded
principally from the self-illusion of the two Italians,
themselves
;
the little he had said on the subject, having been
drawn out more by their suggestions than by any design
on his part. Still, he did not deem it prudent to contradict
the podest, who, as yet, had testified to nothing that could
possibly criminate him.
If a young man has the vanity to wish to be thought
noble, answered Raoul, calmly, it may prove his folly,
but it does not prove him a spy. You did not hear me
confess
myself a Frenchman, you say: now did you not hear
me say I was born in Guernsey?
Sithe Signore did say that the family of Smees came
from that island  as the vice-governatore calls it, though I
acknowledge I never heard of such an island. There are
Sicilia, Sardegna, Elba, Caprea, Ischia, Irlanda, Inghilterra,
Scozia, Malta, Capraya, Pianosa, Gorgona, and America,
with several more in the east; but I never heard of such an
island as Guernsey. Si, Signore; we are humble people,
and I hope modest people in the island of Elba, but we do
know something of the rest of the world, notwithstanding.
If you wish to hear these matters touched on ingeniously,
however, you will do well to call in the vice-governatore,
for half an hour, and invite him to open his stores of
knowledge
.
San Antonio!  I doubt if Italy has his equalat
islands, in particular.
Good, continued Raoul; and now tell these officers,
Signore Podest, if you can say, on your oath, that I had
anything to do with that felucca, ze Ving-and-Ving, at all.
I cannot, Signore, except from your own words. You
were dressed like one of these officers, here, in an English
uniform, and said you commanded ze Ving-y-Ving. While
speaking of islands, Signori, I forgot Palmavola and Ponza,
both of which we passed in this ship, on our voyage from
Elba.
Good  it is always well to be particular under oath.
Now, Signor Podest, the result of all your evidence is,
that you do not know that the felucca you mention was le
Feu-Follet, that I am a Frenchman even, much less that I
am Raoul Yvard, and that I told you I was from Guernsey,
and that my name was Jaques Smeet  is it not so?
Si  you did say your name was Giac Smees, and you
did not say you were Raoul Yvard. But, Signore, I saw
you firing your cannon at the boats of this frigate, with
French colours flying, and that is some signs of an enemy,
as we understand these matters, in Porto Ferrajo.
Raoul felt that this was a direct blow; still, it wanted the
connecting link to make it testimony.
But you did not see
me
doing this?  You mean you
saw ze Ving-and-Ving in a combat with the frigate's boats.
Sithat was itbut you told me you were commander
of ze Ving-y-Ving.
Let us understand you, put in the Judge Advocate
is it the intention of the prisoner to deny his being a
Frenchman and an enemy?
It is my intention, sir, to deny everything that is not
proved.
But your accentyour Englishnay, your appearance,
show that you are a Frenchman.
Your pardon, sir. There are many nations that speak
French, which are not French, to-day. All along the north
frontier of France, is French spoken by foreignersSavoy,
and Geneva, and Vaud  also, the English have French
subjects in the Canadas, besides Guernsey and Jersey. You
will not hang a man because his accent is not from London?
We shall do you justice, prisoner, observed Cuffe,
and you shall have the benefit of every doubt that makes
in your favour. Still, it may be well to inform you that the
impression of your being a Frenchman and Raoul Yvard, is
very strong; and if you can show the contrary, you would
do well to prove it, by direct testimony.
How will this honourable court expect that to be done?
I was taken in a boat, last night, and am tried, this
morning
,
at a notice as short as that which was given to
Caraccioli
.
Give me time to send for witnesses, and I will prove
who and what I am.
3 *
This was said coolly, and with the air of a man assured
of his own innocence, and it produced a slight effect on his
judges; for an appeal to the unvarying principles of right,
seldom falls unheeded on the ear. Nevertheless, there
could be no doubt in the minds of the officers of the
Proserpine
,
in particular, either as to the character of the lugger,
or as to that of the prisoner; and men, under such
circumstances
,
were not likely to allow an enemy who had done
them so much injury to escape. The appeal only rendered
them more cautious, and more determined to protect
themselves
against any charge of unfair proceedings.
Have you any further questions to put to the witness,
prisoner? inquired the president of the court.
None, at present, sir  we will go on, if you please,
gentlemen.
Call Ithuel Bolt, said the Judge Advocate, reading the
new witness's name from a list before him.
Raoul started, for the idea of the American's being brought
forward in this capacity, had never occurred to him. In a
minute Ithuel appeared, was sworn, and took his place at
the foot of the table.
Your name is Ithuel Bolt? observed the Judge
Advocate
,
holding his pen in readiness to record the answer.
So they say aboard here, answered the witness, coolly
though, for my part, I 've no answer to give to such a
question.
Do you deny your name, sir?
I deny nothing  want to say nothing, or to have
anything
to do with this trial, or this ship.
Raoul breathed easier; for, to own the truth, he had not
much confidence in Ithuel's constancy, or disinterestedness;
and he apprehended that he had been purchased, with the
promise
of a pardon for himself.
You will remember that you are under oath, and may
be punished for contumacy, on refusing to answer.
I 've some gineral idees of law, answered Ithuel,
passing
his hand over his queue, to make sure it was right, for
we all do a little at that in Ameriky. I practised some
myself
,
when a young man, though it was only afore a
justicepeace
.
We
used to hold that a witness needn't answer ag'in
himself.
Is it, then, on account of criminating yourself, that you
answer thus vaguely?
I decline answering that question, answered Ithuel, with
an air of dignity.
Witness, have you any personal knowledge of the
prisoner
?
I decline answering that question, too.
Do you know anything of such a person as Raoul
Yvard?
What if I do?  I 'm a native American, and have a
right to form acquaintances, in foreign lands, if I see it 's to
my interest, or it 's agreeable to my feelin's.
Have you never served on board His Majesty's ships?
What majesty?There 's no majesty in Ameriky, as I
know, but the majesty of heaven.
Remember that your answers are all recorded, and may
tell against you, on some other occasion.
Not lawfully; a witness can't be made to give answers
that tell ag'in himself.
Certainly not
made
to do it; still he may
do
it, of his
own accord.
Then it 's the duty of the court to put him on his guard.
I 've heerd that, ag'in and ag'in, in Ameriky.
Did you ever see a vessel called le Feu-Follet?
How, in natur', is a mariner to tell all the vessels he
may happen to see on the wide ocean!
Did you ever serve under the French flag?
I decline entering at all into my private affairs. Being
free, I 'm free to sarve where I please.
It is useless to ask this witness any further questions,
Cuffe quietly observed. The man is well known in this
ship, and his own trial will most probably take place as
soon as this is ended.
The Judge Advocate assented, and Ithuel was permitted
to withdraw, his contumacy being treated with the
indifference
that power is apt to exhibit towards weakness. Still
there was no legal proof on which to convict the prisoner.
No one doubted his guilt, and there were the strongest
reasons
,
short of a downright certainty, for supposing that he
commanded the lugger which had so recently fought the
boats of the very ship in which the court was sitting; but,
notwithstanding, supposition was not the evidence the laws
required; and the recent execution of Caraccioli had made
so much conversation, that few would condemn without
seeing
their justification before them. Things were really
getting
to be seriously awkward, and the court was again
cleared for the purpose of consultation. In the private
discourse
that followed, Cuffe stated all that had occurred,
the manner in which Raoul had been identified, and the
probabilities  nay, moral certainties of the case. At the
same time, he was forced to allow, that he possessed no
direct evidence that the lugger he had chased was a
Frenchman
at all, and least of all le Feu-Follet. It is true, she
had worn the French flag, but she had also worn the
English
,
and the Proserpine had done the same thing. To be
sure, the lugger had
fought
under the
drapeau tricolor
,
which might be taken as a strong circumstance against her;
but it was not absolutely conclusive, for the circumstances
might possibly justify deception to the last moment; and he
admitted that the frigate, herself, had
appeared
to fire at the
batteries, under the same ensign. The case was allowed
to be embarrassing; and, while no one really doubted the
identity of Raoul, those who were behind the curtains greatly
feared they might be compelled to adjourn the trial for want
of evidence, instead of making an immediate sentence the
means of getting possession of the lugger, as had been
hoped. When all these points had been sufficiently
discussed
,
and Cuffe had let his brethren into his view of the
real state of the case, he pointed out a course that he still
trusted would prove effectual. After a few minutes of
further
deliberation on this information, the doors were opened,
and the court resumed its public sitting, as before.
Let a young woman who is known by the name of
Ghita, be brought in, next, said the Judge Advocate,
consulting
his notes.
Raoul started, and a shade of deep concern passed over
his face; but he soon recovered, and seemed unmoved.
Ghita and her uncle had been taken from the cabin
state-room
,
and placed below, in order that the private
consultations
might be perfectly secret, and it was necessary to wait
a few minutes, until she could be summoned. These past,
the door opened and the girl entered the room. She cast a
glance of tender concern at Raoul; but the novelty of her
situation, and the awful character of an oath to one of her
sensitive conscience and utter inexperience, soon drew her
attention entirely to the scene more immediately before her.
The Judge Advocate explained the nature of the oath she
was required to take, and then he administered it. Had
Ghita been taken less by surprise, or had she, in the least,
foreseen the consequences, no human power could have
induced her to submit to be sworn; but, ignorant of all this,
she submitted passively, kissing the cross with reverence,
and even offering to kneel as she made the solemn
protestation
.
All this was painful to the prisoner, who distinctly
foresaw the consequences. Still, so profound was his
reverence
for Ghita's singleness of heart and mind, that he would
not by look or gesture, in any manner endeavour to
undermine
that sacred love of truth, which he knew formed the
very foundations of her character. She was accordingly
sworn, without anything occurring to alarm her affections,
or to apprise her of what might be the sad result of the act.
CHAPTER III.
Hic et ubique? Then we 'll shift our ground:
Come hither, gentlemen,
And lay your hands upon my sword:
Swear by my sword.
Hamlet
.
Your
name is Ghita, commenced the Judge Advocate,
examining his memoranda  Ghita what?
Ghita Caraccioli, Signore, answered the girl, in a voice
so gentle and sweet, as to make a friend of every listener.
The name, however, was not heard, without producing a
general start, and looks of surprise were exchanged among
all in the room; most of the officers of the ship who were
not on duty being present as spectators.
Caraccioli, repeated the Judge Advocate, with
emphasis
.
That is a great name in Italy. Do you assume to
belong to the illustrious house which bears this appellation?
Signore, I assume to own nothing that is illustrious,
being merely an humble girl who lives with her uncle, in
the prince's towers, on Monte Argentaro.
How happens it, then, that you bear the distinguished
name of Caraccioli, signorina?
I dare say, Mr. Medford, observed Cuffe, in English,
of course, that the young woman doesn't know herself,
whence she got the name. These matters are managed
very loosely in Italy.
Signore, resumed Ghita, earnestly, after waiting
respectfully
for the captain to get through, I bear the name of my
father, as is usual with children; but, it is a name on which
a heavy disgrace has fallen, so lately as yesterday;
his
father
having been a sight for the thousands of Naples to gaze on,
as his aged body hung at the yard of one of your ships.
And do you claim to be the grand-daughter of that
unfortunate
admiral?
So I have been taught to consider myself; may his soul
rest in a peace that his foes would not grant to his body!
That criminal, as you doubtless believe him, was my father's
father, though few knew it when he was honoured as a
prince and a high officer of the king's.
A deep silence followed; the singularity of the
circumstance
,
and the air of truth which pervaded the manner of
the girl, uniting to produce a profound sensation.
The admiral had the reputation of being childless,
observed
Cuffe, in an under tone. Doubtless this girl's father
has been the consequence of some irregular connection.
If there has been a promise, or any words of
recognition
uttered before witnesses, muttered Lyon, accordin'
to the laws of Scotland, issue, and a few pairtenant
expressions
,
will splice a couple as strongly as ye 'll be doing it in
England, before either of the archbishops.
As this is Italy, it is not probable that the same law
rules here. Proceed, Mr. Judge Advocate.
Well, Ghita Caraccioliif that be your nameI wish
to know if you have any acquaintance with a certain Raoul
Yvard; a Frenchman, and the commander of a private
lugger-of-war, called le Feu-Follet?Remember, you are
sworn to tell the truth, the
whole
truth, and nothing but the
truth.
Ghita's heart beat violently, and the colour came into her
face with the impetuosity of sensitive alarm. She had no
knowledge of courts, and the object of the inquiry was
unknown
to her. Then followed the triumph of innocence;
the purity of her mind, and the quiet of her conscience
reassuring her, by bringing the strong conviction that she
had no reason to blush for any sentiment she might happen
to entertain.
Signore, she said, dropping her eyes to the floor, for
the gaze of all the court was fastened on her faceI
am
acquainted with Raoul Yvard, the person you mention;
this is he, who sits between those two cannon. He
is
a
Frenchman, and he
does
command the lugger called the
Feu-Follet.
I knew we should get it all by this witness! exclaimed
Cuffe, unable to suppress the relief he felt at obtaining the
required testimony.
You say that you know this, of your own knowledge,
resumed the Judge Advocate
Messieurs, said Raoul, rising, will you grant me
leave to speak? This is a cruel scene; and, rather than
endure itrather than give this dear girl the cause for future
pain, that I know her answers will bring, I ask that you
permit her to retire, when I promise to admit all that you
can possibly prove by her means.
A short consultation followed; then Ghita was told to
withdraw. But the girl had taken the alarm, from the
countenance of Raoul, although she did not understand what
had passed in English; and she was reluctant to quit the
place in ignorance.
Have I said aught to injure thee, Raoul? she anxiously
askedI was sworn on the Word of God, and by the
sacred crosshad I foreseen any harm to thee, the power
of England would not have made me take so solemn an oath,
and then I might have been silent.
It matters not, dearestthe fact must come out, in some
way or other, and, in due time, you shall know all. And
now, Messieurs,the door closing on Ghitathere need
be no further concealment between us. I am Raoul Yvard
the person you take me for, and the person that some of
you must well know me to be. I fought your boats,
Monsieur
Cuffeavoided your
brult
, and led you a merry chase
round Elba. I deceived the Signor Barrofaldi, and his friend
the podest, and all for the love of this beautiful and modest
girl, who has just left the cabin; no other motive having
carried me into Porto Ferrajo, or into this Bay of Naples, on
the honour of a Frenchman.
Umph! muttered Lyonit must be admitted, Sir
Frederick, that the prisoner appeals to a most eligible
standard
!
On another occasion, national antipathy and national
prejudice might have caused the rest of the court to smile at
this sally; but there was an earnestness and sincerity in the
manner and countenance of Raoul, which, if they did not
command entire belief, at least, commanded respect. It was
impossible to deride such a man; and long-cherished
antipathies
were rebuked by his spirited and manly declarations.
There will be no further occasion for witnesses, Mr.
Judge Advocate, if the prisoner be disposed to acknowledge
the whole truth, observed Cuffe. It is proper, however,
Monsieur Yvard, to apprise you of the possible consequences.
You are on trial for your life; the charge being that of
coming on board an English ship in disguise, or rather, into
the centre of an English fleet, you being an alien enemy,
engaged in carrying on open warfare against His Majesty.
I am a Frenchman, Monsieur, and I serve my country,
answered Raoul, with dignity.
Your right to serve your country, no one will dispute;
but you must know it is against the laws of civilized warfare
to act the part of a spy. You are now on your guard, and
will decide for yourself. If you have anything to say, we
will hear it.
Messieurs, there is little more to be said, answered
Raoul. That I am
your
enemy, as I am of all those who
seek the downfall of France, I do not deny. You know
who
I am, and
what
I am, and I have no excuses to make for
being either. As brave Englishmen, you will know how to
allow for the love a Frenchman bears his country. As for
coming on board this ship, you cannot bring that as a charge
against me, since it was at your own invitation I did it. The
rights of hospitality are as sacred as they are general.
The members of the court exchanged significant glances
with each other, and there was a pause of more than a
minute. Then the Judge Advocate resumed his duties, by
saying
I wish you to understand, prisoner, the precise legal
effect of your admissions; then I wish them to be made
formally
and deliberately; else we must proceed to the
examination
of other witnesses. You are said to be Raoul Yvard,
an alien enemy, in arms against the king.
Monsieur, this I have already admitted; it cannot
honourably be denied.
You are accused of coming on board His Majesty's ship
Proserpine disguised, and of calling yourself a boatman of
Capri, when you were Raoul Yvard, an alien enemy, bearing
arms against the king.
This is all true; but I was invited on board the ship, as
I have just stated.
You are furthermore accused of rowing in among the
ships of His Majesty, now lying in the Bay of Naples, and
which ships are under the orders of Rear-Admiral Lord
Nelson, Duke of Bront, in Sicily, you being in the same
disguise, though an alien enemy, with the intent to make
your observations as a spy, and, doubtless, to avail yourself
of information thus obtained, to the injury of His Majesty's
subjects, and to your own advantage, and that of the nation
you serve.
Monsieur, this is not so
parole d'honneur
, I went into
the bay in search of Ghita Caraccioli, who has my whole
heart, and whom I would persuade to become my wife.
Nothing else carried me into the bay; and I wore this dress,
because I might otherwise have been known and arrested.
This is an important fact, if you can prove it; for,
though it might not technically acquit you, it would have its
effect on the commander-in-chief, when he comes to decide
on the sentence of this court.
Raoul hesitated. He did not doubt that Ghita, she whose
testimony had just proved so serious a matter against him,
would testify that she
believed
such was alone his motive;
and this, too, in a way, and with corroborative
circumstances
,
Vol. II.  4
that would carry weight with them, more
particularly
as she could testify that he had done the same thing
before, in the Island of Elba, and was even in the practice
of paying her flying visits at Monte Argentaro.
Nevertheless
,
Raoul felt a strong reluctance to have Ghita again
brought before the court. With the jealous sensitiveness of
true love, he was averse to subjecting its object to the gaze
and comments of the rude of his own sex; then he knew his
power over the feelings of the girl, and had too much
sensibility
not to enter into all the considerations that might
influence a man on a point so delicate; and he could not
relish the idea of publicly laying bare feelings that he wished
to be as sacred to others, as they were to himself.
Can you prove what you have just averred, Raoul
Yvard? demanded the Judge Advocate.
MonsieurI fear it will not be in my power. There is
onebutI much fear it will not be in my powerunless,
indeed, I am permitted to examine my companion; he who
has already been before you.
You mean Ithuel Bolt, I presume. He has not yet been
regularly before us, but you can produce him, or any other
witness; the court reserving to itself the right to decide,
afterwards, on the merits of the testimony.
Then, Monsieur, I could wish to have Etoo-ell here.
The necessary directions were given, and Ithuel soon
stood in the presence of his judges. The oath was tendered,
and Ithuel took it like a man who had done such things
before.
Your name is Ithuel Bolt? commenced the Judge
Advocate
.
So they call me on board this shipbut if I am to be
a witness, let me swear freely; I don't wish to have words
put into my mouth, or idees chained to me with iron.
As this was said, Ithuel raised his arms, and exhibited
his hand-cuffs, which the master-at-arms had refused to
remove, and the officers of the court had overlooked. A
reproachful glance from Cuffe, and a whisper from
Yelverton
,
disposed of the difficultyIthuel was released.
Now I can answer more conscientiously, continued
the witness, grinning sardonically; when iron is eating
into the flesh, a man is apt to swear to what he thinks will
be most agreeable to his masters. Go on 'squire, if you
have anything to say.
You appear to be an Englishman.
Do I? Then I appear to be what I am not. I'm
a native of the Granite state, in North America. My
fathers
went to that region, in times long gone by, to uphold
their religious idees. The whole country, thereabouts, sets
onaccountable store by their privileges.
Do you know the prisoner, Ithuel Bolt, the person who
is called Raoul Yvard?
Ithuel was a little at a loss exactly how to answer this
question. Notwithstanding the high motive which had led
his fathers into the wilderness, and his own peculiar
estimate
of his religious advantages, an oath had got to be a
sort of convertible obligation with him, ever since the day
he had his first connection with a custom-house. A man
who had sworn to so many false invoices, was not likely to
stick at a trifle in order to serve a friend; still, by denying
the acquaintance, he might bring discredit on himself, and
thus put it out of his power to be of use to Raoul on some
more material point. As between himself and the
Frenchman
,
there existed a remarkable moral discrepancy; for,
while he who prided himself on his religious ancestry and
pious education, had a singularly pliable conscience, Raoul,
almost an Atheist in opinion, would have scorned a simple
lie, when placed in a situation that touched his honour. In
the way of warlike artifices, few men were more subtle, or
loved to practise them oftener, that Raoul Yvard; but the
mask aside, or when he fell back on his own native dignity
of mind, death itself could not have extorted an equivocation
from him. On the other hand, Ithuel had an affection for a
lie; more especially if it served himself, or injured his
enemyfinding a mode of reconciling all this to his
spirituality
,
that is somewhat peculiar to fanaticism, as it begins
to grow threadbare. On the present occasion, he was
ready to say whatever he thought would most conform to
his shipmate's wishes, and luckily he construed the
expression
of the other's countenance aright.
I
do
know the prisoner, as you call him, 'squire, Ithuel
answered, after the pause that was necessary to come to his
conclusionI
do
know him
well;
and a master-crittur he
is, when he fairly gets into a current of your English trade.
Had there been a Rule Yvard, on board each of the
Frenchmen
,
at the Nile, over here, in Egypt, Nelson would have
found that his letter stood in need of some post-cripts, I
guess.
Confine your answers, witness, to the purport of the
question, put in Cuffe, with dignity.
Ithuel stood too much in habitual awe of the captain of
his old ship, to venture on an answer; but if looks could
have done harm, that important functionary would not have
escaped altogether uninjured. As he said nothing, the
examination
proceeded.
You know him to be Raoul Yvard, the commander of
the French privateer lugger, le Feu-Follet? continued the
Judge Advocate, deeming it prudent to fortify his record of
the prisoner's confession of identity, with a little collateral
evidence.
WhyI
some
think answered Ithuel, with a peculiar
provincialism, that had a good deal of granite in itthat
is, I kind o' conclude catching an assent from Raoul's
eyeoh! yesof
that
, there is n't the smallest mite of
doubt in the world. He's the captain of the lugger, and a
right down good one he is!
You were with him, in disguise, when he came into the
Bay of Naples yesterday?
I in disguise, 'squire!What have I got to disguise? I
am an American of different callings, all of which I
practyse
,
as convenience demands; being a neutral, I 've no
need of disguises to go anywhere. I am never disguised,
except when my jib is a little bowsed up; and that, you
know, is a come-over that befals most seafaring men, at
times.
You need answer nothing concerning yourself, that will
tend to criminate you. Do you know with what
inducement
,
or on what business, Raoul Yvard came into the Bay
of Naples yesterday?
To own to you the candid truth, 'squire, I do not,
answered Ithuel, simply; for the nature of the tie which
bound the young Frenchman so closely to Ghita, was a
profound
mystery, in all that related to its more sacred feelings,
to a being generally so obtuse on matters of pure sentiment.
Captain Rule is a good deal given to prying about on
the coast; and what particular eend he had in view, in this
expedition, I cannot tell you. His a'r'n'ds inshore, I must
own, be sometimes onaccountable!Witness the island of
Elby, gentlemen.
Ithuel indulged in a small laugh, as he made this allusion;
for, in his own way, he had a humour in which he
occasionally
indulged, after a manner that belonged to the class of
which he was a conspicuous member.
Never mind what occurred at Elba. Prisoner, do you
wish to question the witness?
Etuelle, asked Raoul, do you not know that I love
Ghita Caraccioli?
Why, Captain Rule, I know you
think
so, and
say
so
but I set down all these matters as somewhat various and
onaccountable.
Have I not often landed on the enemy's coast, solely to
see her, and to be near her?
By this time, Ithuel, who was a little puzzled at first to
understand what it all meant, had got his cue, and no
witness
could have acquitted himself better than he did from
that moment.
That you have, he answered; a hundred times, at
least; and right in the teeth of my advice.
Was not my sole object in coming into the Bay
yesterday
,
to find Ghita, and Ghita only?
Just so. Of that, gentlemen, there can be no more
question, than there is about Vesuvius standing up at the
head of the Bay, smoking like a brick-kiln. That
was
Captain Rule's sole a'r'n'd.'
I just understood ye to say, witness, put in Lyon, and
that only a bit since, that ye did not know the prisoner's
motive in coming into the Bay of Naples. Ye called his
behaviour unaccountable.
Very true, sir, and so it is to
me
. I know'd all along,
that
love
was at the bottom of it; but
I
don't call love a
motive
, while I do call it
onaccountable
. That's the
explanation
on 't. Yes, I know'd it was
love
for Miss Gyty, but
then that's not a motive in law.
Answer to the facts. The court will judge of the
motive
for itself. How do you know that love for the young
4 *
woman you mention, was Raoul Yvard's only object in
coming into the Bay?
One finds out such things by keeping company with a
man. Captain Rule went first to look for the young woman
up on the mountain yonder, where her aunt lives, and I
went with him to talk English, if it got to be necessary;
and not finding Gyty at home, we got a boat and followed
her over to Naples. Thus, you see, sir, that I have reason
to know what craft he was in chase of the whole time.
As all this was strictly true, Ithuel related it naturally,
and in a way to gain some credit.
You say you accompanied Raoul Yvard, witness, in a
visit to the aunt of the young woman, called Ghita
Caraccioli
,
observed Cuffe, in a careless way, that was intended
to entrap Ithuel into an unwary answerwhere did you
go from, when you set out on your journey?
That would depend on the place one kept his reckoning
from, and the time of starting. Now,
I
might say I started
from Ameriky, which part of the world I left some years
since; or I might say from Nantes, the port in which we
fitted for sea. As for Captain Rule, he would probably say
Nantes.
In what manner did you come from Nantes? continued
Cuffe, without betraying resentment at an answer that might
be deemed impertinent; or surprise, as if he found it
difficult
to comprehend. You did not make the journey on
horseback, I should think?
Oh, I begin to understand you, Captain Cuffe. Why,
if the truth must be said, we came in the lugger, the
Few-Folly
.
I supposed as much. And when you went to visit this
aunt, where did you leave the lugger?
We did n't leave her at all, sir; being under her
canvass
,
our feet were no sooner in the boat, and the line cast
off, than she left us as if we had been stuck up, like a tree,
on dry ground.
Where did this happen?
Afloat, of course, Captain Cuffe; such a thing would
hardly come to pass, ashore.
All that, I understand; but you say the prisoner left
his vessel, in order to visit an aunt of the young woman's;
thence he went into the Bay, for the sole purpose of finding
the young woman herself. Now, this is an important fact,
as it concerns the prisoner's motives, and may affect his life.
The court must act with all the facts before it; as a
commencement
,
tell us where Raoul Yvard left his lugger, to go
on yonder head-land.
I do not think, Captain Cuffe, you 've got the story
exactly right. Captain Rule did n't go on the mountain,
after all, so much to see the aunt, as to see the niece at the
aunt's dwelling; if one would end right in a story, he must
begin right.
I left le Feu-Follet, Monsieur le Capitaine, Raoul
calmly observed, not two cables' length from the very spot
where your own ship is now lying; but it was at an hour of
the night when the good people of Capri were asleep, and
they knew nothing of our visit. You see the lugger is no
longer here.
And do you confirm this story, under the solemnity of
your oath? demanded Cuffe of Ithuel, little imagining how
easy it was to the witness to confirm anything he saw fit, in
the way he mentioned.
Sartain; every word is true, gentlemen, answered
Ithuel. It was not more than a cable's length from this
very spot, according to my judgment.
And where is the lugger, now? asked Cuffe, betraying
the drift of all his questions, in his eagerness to learn more.
Ithuel was not to be led on so hurriedly, or so blindly.
Affecting a girlish sort of coyness, he answered, simpering,
Why, Captain Cuffe, I cannot think of answering a
question like that, under the solemnity of an oath, as you
call it. No one can know where the little Folly is, but them
that's in her.
Cuffe was a little disconcerted at the answer, while Lyon
smiled ironically; the latter then took upon himself the
office of cross-examining, with an opinion of his own
penetration
and shrewdness, that, at least, ought to have made
him quite equal to encountering one of Ithuel's readiness in
subterfuges.
We do not expect you to tell us, of your own
knowledge
,
witness, he said, precisely the position, by latitude
and longitude, or by the points of the compass, at this
identical
instant, of the craft called by some the le Few-Folly, by
others, the Few-Follay, and, as it would now seem, by
yourself
,
the Little Folly; for that, as ye 've well obsairved, can
be known only to those who are actually on board her; but
ye 'll be remembering, perhaps, the place it was agreed on
between you, where ye were to find the lugger at your
return from this hazardous expedition that ye 've been
making
amang ye, into the Bay of Naples?
I object to that question, as contrary to law, put in
Ithuel, with a spirit and promptitude that caused the Judge
Advocate to start, and the members of the court to look at
each other in surprise.
Nay, if ye object to the question on the ground that a
true ainswer will be criminating yersel', ye 'll be justified in
so doing, by reason and propriety; but then ye 'll consider
well the consequences it may have on your own case, when
that comes to be investigated.
I object on gin'ral principles, said Ithuel. Whatever
Captain Rule may have said on the subject, admitting that
he said anything, just to bear out the argument, (by the
way, Ithuel called this word arg
oo
ment, a pronunciation
against which we enter our solemn protest;) admitting,
I
say, that
he
said anything on the subject, it cannot be
testimony
,
as
hear
say evidence is ag'in law, all the world
over.
The members of the court looked at the Judge Advocate,
who returned the glance with an air of suitable gravity;
then, on a motion of Sir Frederick's, the court was cleared,
to discuss the point in private.
How's this, Mr. Judge Advocate, demanded Cuffe, as
soon as the coast was clear; it is of the last importance
to find where that lugger isdo you hold that the question
is contrary to law?
Its importance makes it pertinent, I think, sir; as for
the legality, I do not see how it can be affected by the
circumstance
that the fact came up in discourse.
D'ye think so? observed Sir Frederick, looking much
more profound than was his wont. Legality is the boast
of English law, and I should dislike excessively to fail in
that great essential. What is
said
, must be
heard
, to be
repeated;
and this seems very like
hearsay
testimony. I
believe it 's admitted all round, we must reject
that
.
What is your opinion, Captain Lyon? demanded the
president.
The case is somewhat knotty, but it may be united,
returned the Scot, with a sneer on his hard features. No
need of Alexander and his sword to cut the rope, I 'm
thinking
,
when we bring common sense to bear on the point.
What is the matter to be ascertained?Why, the place
which was agreed on as the point of rendezvous between
this Rawl Eevart and his people. Now, this arrangement
must have been made orally, or in writing; if orally,
testimony
to the words uttered will not be hearsay, farther than
testimony to what a man has seen will be eyesight.
Quite true, Mr. President and gentlemen! exclaimed
the Judge Advocate, who was not a little relieved at finding
a clue to lead him out of the difficulty. If the agreement
had been made in writing, then that writing would have to
be produced, if possible, as the best evidence the case
affords; but, being made in words, those words can be
sworn to.
Cuffe was much relieved by this opinion, and, as Sir
Frederick did not seem disposed to push his dissent very far,
the matter would have been determined on the spot, but for
a love of disputation that formed part and parcel, to speak
legally on a legal subject, of Lyon's moral temperament.
I'm agreeing with the Judge Advocate, as to his
distinction
about the admissibility of the testimony on the
ground of its not being technically what is called hearsay
evidence, he observed; but a difficulty suggests itself to
my mind touching the pairtenency. A witness is sworn to
speak to the point before the court; but he is not sworn to
discuss all things in heaven and airth. Now, is it pairtenent
to the fact of Rawl Eevart's being a spy, that he made
sairtain
agreements to meet this or that fellow-creature, in this
or that place. Now, as I comprehend the law, it divides
all questions into two great classesthe pairtinent, and the
impairtinent, of which the first are legal, and the second
illegal.
I think it would be a great piece of audacity, said Sir
Frederick, disdainfully, for such a fellow as this Bolt, to
pretend to call any question we can put him, impertinent!
That 's no just the p'int, Sir Frederick; this being
altogether
a matter of law, while ye 'll be thinking of station
and etiquette. Then, there's two classes of the pairtinent,
and two of the impairtenent; one being legal and logical, as
it might be, and the other conventional and civil, as one
may say. There 's a nice distinction, latent, between the
two.
I believe the court is of opinion that the question may
be put, observed Cuffe, who was impatient of the
Scotchman's
subtleties, bowing to Sir Frederick, to ask an
acquiescence
which he immediately received. We will re-open
the doors, and proceed in the examination.
The court is of opinion, witness, resumed the Judge
Advocate, when every one was in his place again, that
you must answer the question. In order that you may
understand it, I will now repeat it. Where was it agreed
between Raoul Yvard and his people, that they should meet
again?
I do not think the people of the lugger had anything to
say in the matter, answered Ithuel, in the most unmoved
manner. If they had, I knew nothing on 't.
The court felt embarrassed; but as it would never do to
be thwarted in this manner, a look of determination was
exchanged between the members, and the examination
proceeded
.
If not the people, the officers, then. Where was it
agreed between the prisoner and his
officers
, that the former
should find the lugger, when he returned from his expedition
into the Bay?
Well, now, gentlemen, answered Ithuel, turning his
quid from one cheek into the other, I
some
conclude,
you 've no great acquaintance with Captain Rule, a'ter all!
He is not apt to enter into any agreements, at all. What
he wants done, he orders; and what he orders, must be
done.
What did he
order
, then, as respects the place where
the lugger was to wait for his return?
I 'm sorry to be troublesome, please the court, returned
the witness, with admirable self-possession; but law is
law, all over the world, and I rather guess this question is
ag'in it. In the Granite state, it is always held that when
a thing can be proved by the person who said any particular
words, that the question must be put to him, and not to a
bystander.
Not if that person is a prisoner, and on his trial,
answered the Judge Advocate, staring to hear such a
distinction
from such a source; though the remark is a
good one, in the cases of witnesses, purely. You must
answer, therefore.
It is unnecessary, again interposed Raoul. I left
my vessel here, where I have told you, and had I made a
certain signal, the last night, from the heights of St. Agata,
le Feu-Follet would have stood in, near to the rocks of the
Sirens, and taken me off again. As the hour is passed, and
the signal is not likely to be made, it is probable my
lieutenant
has gone to another rendezvous, of which the witness
knows nothing, and which, certainly, I shall never betray.
There was so much manliness and quiet dignity in Raoul's
deportment, that, whatever he said made an impression.
His answer disposed of the matter, for the moment at least.
The Judge Advocate, accordingly, turned to other inquiries.
Little remained, however, to be done. The prisoner had
admitted his identity; his capture, with all the attendant
circumstances, were in proof, and his defence came next.
When Raoul rose to speak, he felt a choking emotion;
but it soon left him, and he commenced in a steady, calm
tone, his accent giving point and interest to many of his
expressions.
Messieurs, said he, I will not deny my name, my
character, or my manner of life. I am a Frenchman, and
the enemy of your country. I am, also, the enemy of the
King of Naples, in whose territories you found me. I have
destroyed his and your ships. Put me on board my lugger,
and I should do both again. Whoever is the enemy of
la France, is the enemy of Raoul Yvard. Honourable
seamen
,
like yourselves, Messieurs, can understand this. I am
young. My heart is not made of rock; evil as it may be,
it can love beauty, and modesty, and virtue, in the other
sex. Such has been my fate  I love Ghita Caraccioli;
have endeavoured to make her my wife for more than a
year. She has not authorized me to say that my suit was
favouredthis I must acknowledge; but she is not the less
admirable for that. We differ in our opinions of religion,
and I fear she left Monte Argantaro, because, refusing my
hand, she thought it better, perhaps, that we should not
meet again. It is so with maidens, as you must know,
Messieurs. But it is not usual for us, who are less refined,
to submit to such self-denial. I learned whither Ghita had
come, and followed; my heart was a magnet, that her
beauty drew after it, as our needles are drawn towards the
pole. It was necessary to go into the Bay of Naples,
among the vessels of enemies, to find her I loved; and this
is a very different thing, from engaging in the pitiful
attempts
of a spy. Which of you would not have done the
same, Messieurs? You are braves Anglais, and I know you
would not hesitate. Two of you are still youthful, like
myself, and must still feel the power of beauty; even the
Monsieur that is no longer a young man, has had his
moments
of passion, like all that are born of woman.
Messieurs
,
I have no more to say: you know the rest. If you
condemn me, let it be as an unfortunate Frenchman, whose
heart had its weaknessesnot as an ignominious and
treacherous
spy.
The earnestness and nature with which Raoul spoke,
were not without effect. Could Sir Frederick have had his
way, the prisoner would have been acquitted on the spot.
But, Lyon was sceptical, as to the story of love, a sentiment
about which he knew very little; and there was a spirit of
opposition in him, too, that generally induced him to take
the converse of most propositions that were started. The
prisoner was dismissed, and the court closed its doors, to
make up its decision, by itself, in the usual form.
We should do injustice to Cuffe, if we did not say that he
had some feeling in favour of the gallant foe, who had so
often foiled him. Could he have had his will at that
moment
,
he would have given Raoul his lugger, allowed the
latter a sufficient start, and then gladly have commenced a
chase round the Mediterranean, to settle all questions
between
them. But it was too much to give up the lugger, as
well as the prisoner. Then his oath, as a judge, had its
obligations also, and he felt himself bound to yield to the
arguments
of the Judge Advocate, who was a man of
technicalities
,
and thought no more of sentiment than Lyon,
himself.
The result of the deliberation, which lasted an hour, was
a finding against the prisoner. The court was opened, the
record made up and read, the offender introduced, and the
judgment delivered. The finding was that Raoul Yvard
had been caught in disguise, in the midst of the allied fleets,
and that he was guilty as a spy. The sentence was to
suffer death the succeeding day, by hanging at the
yard-arm
of such ship, as the commander-in-chief might select,
on approving of the sentence.
As Raoul expected little else, he heard his doom with
steadiness, bowing with dignity and courtesy to the court,
as he was led away, to be placed in irons, as befitted one
condemned.
CHAPTER IV.
The world 's all title-page; there 's no contents;
The world 's all face; the man who shows his heart
Is hooted for his nudities, and scorned.
Night Thoughts
.
Bolt
had not been tried. His case had several serious
difficulties, and the orders allowed of a discretion. The
punishment could scarcely be less than death, and, in addition
to the loss of a stout, sinewy man, it involved questions of
natural right, that were not always pleasant to be considered.
Although the impressment of American seamen into the
British ships of war was probably one of the most serious
moral, as well as political wrongs, that one independent
nation ever received at the hands of another, viewed as a
practice of a generation's continuance, it was not wholly
without some relieving points. There was a portion of the
British marine that disdained to practise it at all; leaving it
to the coarser spirits of the profession to discharge a duty
Vol. II.  5
that they, themselves, found repugnant to their feelings and
their habits. Thus, we remember to have heard an
American
seaman say, one who had been present on many
occasions
when his countrymen were torn from under their
flag, that in no instance he ever witnessed, was the officer
who committed the wrong of an air and manner that he
should describe as belonging to the class of gentlemen, on
shore. Whenever one of the latter boarded his vessel, the
crew was permitted to pass unquestioned.
Let this be as it might, there is no question that a strong
and generous feeling existed in the breasts of hundreds in
the British navy, concerning the nature of the wrong that
was done a foreign people, by the practice of impressing
men from under their flag. Although Cuffe was too much
of a martinet to carry his notions on the subject to a very
refined point, he was too much of a man not to be reluctant
to punish another for doing what he felt he would have done
himself, under similar circumstances, and what he could not
but know he would have had a perfect right to do. It was
impossible to mistake one like Ithuel, who had so many of
the Granite peculiarities about him, for anything but what
he was; and so well was his national character established
in the ship, that the
sobriquet
of The Yankee had been
applied
to him, by his shipmates, from the very first. The
fact, therefore, stood him so far in hand, that Cuffe, after a
consultation with Winchester, determined not to put the
alleged deserter on trial; but, after letting him remain a
short time in irons, to turn him to duty, again, under a
pretence
that was often used on such occasions, viz., to give
the man an opportunity of proving his American birth, if he
were really what he so strenuously professed to be. Poor
Ithuel was not the only one who was condemned to this
equivocal servitude, hundreds passing weary years of
probation
,
with the same dim ray of hope, for ever deferred,
gleaming in the distance. It was determined, however, not
to put Ithuel on his trial, until the captain had conversed
with the admiral on the subject, at least; and Nelson,
removed
from the influence of the siren by whom he was
enthralled, was a man inclined to leniency, and of even
chivalrous notions of justice. To such contradictions is
even a great mind subject, when it loses sight of the polar
star of its duties!
When the sentence on Raoul was pronounced, therefore,
and the prisoner was removed, the court adjourned; a boat
being immediately despatched to the Foudroyant with a copy
of the proceedings, for the rear-admiral's approbation. Then
followed a discussion on much the most interesting topic for
them all; the probable position of, and the means of
capturing
the lugger. That le Feu-Follet was near, all were
convinced
;
but where she was to be found, it was hard to tell.
Officers had been sent on the heights of Capri, one of which
towers more than a thousand feet above the sea; but they
returned from a bootless errand. Nothing resembling the
lugger was visible in the offing, among the islands, or in the
bays. A cutter had been sent to look round Campanella,
and another crossed the mouth of the bay, to take a look
to the northward of Ischia, in order to make certain that the
treacherous craft had not gone behind the mountains of that
island, for a refuge. In short, no expedient, likely to discover
the fugitive, was neglected. All failed, however; boat after
boat came back, without success, and officer after officer
returned wearied and disappointed.
Much of the day was passed in this manner, for it was a
calm, and moving either of the ships was out of the question.
In the full expectation of discovering the lugger somewhere
in striking distance, Cuffe had even gone so far as to detail
a party from each vessel, with a view to attack her in boats,
again; feeling no doubt of success, now that he had the
disposable
force of three vessels to send against his enemy.
Winchester was to have commanded, as a right purchased by
his blood; nor was the hope of succeeding, in this way,
abandoned, until the last boat, that which had been sent round
Ischia, returned, and reported its total want of success.
I have heard it said, observed Cuffe, as he and his
brother captains stood conversing together on the
quarterdeck
of the Proserpine, just after this last report had been
madeI have heard it said, that this Raoul Yvard has
actually gone boldly into several of our ports, under English
or neutral colours, and lain there a day or two at a time,
unsuspected; until it has suited him to go out again. Can
it be possible he is up, off the town?There is such a fleet
of craft, in and about the mole, that a little lugger, with her
paint and marks altered,
might
be among them.What
think you, Lyon?
It is sairtainly a law of nature, Captain Cuffe, that
smaller objects should be overlooked, in the presence of
greater; and such a thing
might
happen, therefore; though
I should place it among the improbables, if not absolutely
among the impossibles. 'T would be far safer, nevertheless,
to run in, in the manner you designate, among a hundred or
two of ships, than to venture alone into a haven or a
roadstead
.
If you wish for retirement, Sir Frederick, plunge at
once into the Strand, or take lodgings on Ludgate Hill; but
if you wish to be noticed, and chased, go into a highland
village, and just conceal your name for a bit! Ahhe
knows the difference, well, who has tried both modes of
life!
This is true, Cuffe, observed the Baronet, and yet I
hardly think a Frenchman, big or little, would be apt to
come and anchor under Nelson's nose.
'T would be something like the lion's lying down with
the lamb, certainly, and ought not to be counted on as very
likely. Mr. Winchester, is not that our boat coming round
the sloop's quarter?
Yes, sirshe has got back from Naples
quarter-master
Ay, quarter-master  interrupted Cuffe, sternly  a
pretty look-out is this! Here is our own boat close in upon
us, and not a word from your lips on the interesting subject,
sir!
This word,
sir
, is much used on board a man-of-war, and
in all its convertible significations. From the inferior to the
superior, it comes as natural, as if it were a gift from above;
from equal to equal, it has a ceremonious and
be-on-your-guard
air, that sometimes means respect, sometimes
disrespect
;
while, from a captain to a quarter-master, it always
means reproof, if it do not mean menace. In discussions of
this sort, it is wisest for the weaker party to be silent; and
nowhere is this truth sooner learned, than on ship-board.
The quarter-master, consequently, made no answer, and the
gig came alongside, bringing back the officer who had
carried
the proceedings of the court up to Naples.
Here we have it, said Cuffe, opening the important
document
,
as soon as he and his brother captains were again in
the cabin. `Approvedordered that the sentence be
carried
into execution on board his Majesty's ship, the
Proserpine
,
Captain Cuffe, to-morrow, between the hours of
sunrise
and sun-set.'
Then followed the date, and the well-known signature of
Nelson and Bront. All this was what Cuffe both
wished and expected, though he would have preferred a little
more grace in carrying out the orders. The reader is not
to suppose from this, that our captain was either vengeful
or bloody-minded; or that he really desired to inflict on
Raoul any penalty for the manner in which he had baffled
his own designs and caused his crew to suffer. So far from
this, his intention was to use the sentence to extort from the
prisoner a confession of the orders he had given to those
left in the lugger, and then to use this confession as a means
of obtaining his pardon, with a transfer to a prison-ship.
Cuffe had no great veneration for privateersmen, nor was
his estimate of their morality at all unreasonable, when he
inferred that one, who served with gain for his principal
object, would not long hesitate about purchasing his own life,
by the betrayal of a secret like that he now asked. Had
Raoul belonged even to a republican navy, the English
man-of-war's-man
might have hesitated about carrying out his
plan; but, with the master of a corsair, it appeared to be
the most natural thing imaginable to attempt its execution.
Both Sir Frederick and Lyon viewed the matter in the
same light; and, now that everything was legally done that
was necessary to the design, the capture of the lugger was
deemed more than half accomplished.
It is somewhat afflicting, too, Cuffe, observed Sir
Frederick
,
in his drawling, indolent way; it is somewhat
afflicting, too, Cuffe, to be compelled to betray one's friends,
or to be hanged! In parliament, now, we say we 'll be
hanged if we do, and here you say you 'll be hanged if
you don't.
Poh, poh, Dashwood; no one expects this Raoul Yvard
will come to that fate, for no one thinks he will hold out.
We shall get the lugger, and that will be the end of it. I 'd
give a thousand pounds to see that dd Few-Folly at
5 *
anchor, within pistol-shot of my stern, at this blessed
moment
.
My feelings are in the matter.
Five hundred would be a high price, observed Lyon,
drily. I much doubt if the shares of us three come to as
much as a hundred apiece, even should the craft fall into
our hands.
By the way, gents, put in Sir Frederick, gaping
suppose we toss up, or throw the dice, to see which shall
have all, on the supposition we get her within the next
twenty-four hours, timing the affair by this ship's
chronometers
.
You 've dice on board, I dare say, Cuffe, and we
can make a regular time of it, here, for half an hour, and
no one the wiser.
Your pardon, Captain Dashwood; I can suffer no such
amusement. It is unmilitary, and contrary to regulations;
and, then, hundreds are not as plenty with Lyon and
myself
,
as they are with you. I like to pocket my
prize-money
first, and sport on it, afterwards.
You 're right, Captain Cuffe, said Lyon; though
there can be no great innovation in sporting on Sir
Frederick's
portion, if he see fit to indulge us. Money is an
agreeable acquisition beyond a doubt, and life is sweet to
saint and sinner alike; but I much question your facility in
persuading this Monshure Rawl to tell you his secret
consairning
the lugger, in the manner ye anticipate.
This opinion met with no favour; and after discussing the
point among themselves a little longer, the three captains
were on the point of separating, when Griffin burst into the
cabin, without even knocking, and altogether regardless of
the usual observances.
One would think it blew a typhoon, Mr. Griffin, said
Cuffe, coldly, by the rate at which you run before it.
It 's an ill wind that blows no luck, sir, answered the
lieutenant, actually panting for breath, so great had been
his haste to communicate what he had to say. Our
lookout
,
on the heights above Campanella, has just signalled us
that he sees the lugger to the southward and eastward
somewhere near the point of Piane, I suppose, sir; and what
is better, the wind is coming off-shore earlier than common
this evening.
That
is
news! exclaimed Cuffe, rubbing his hands with
delight. Go on deck, Griffin, and tell Winchester to
unmoor
;
then make a signal to the other ships to do the same.
Now, gentlemen, we have the game in our own hands, and
let us see and play it skilfully. In a couple of hours it will
be dark, and our movements can all be made without being
seen. As the Proserpine is, perhaps, the fastest ship,at
this remark, Sir Frederick smiled ironically, while Lyon
raised his eyebrows like one who saw a marvel  As the
Proserpine is, perhaps, the fastest ship, she ought to go the
farthest to leeward; and I will get under way, and stand
off to sea, keeping well to the northward and eastward, as
if I were running for the straits of Bonifacio, for instance,
until it gets to be dark, when I will haul up south, for a
couple of hours or so; then come up as high as south-east,
until we are to the southward of the gulf of Salerno. This
will be before daylight, if the wind stand. At daylight,
then, you may look out for me, off Piane, say two leagues,
and to seaward, I hope, of the lugger. You shall follow,
Sir Frederick, just as the sun sets, and keep in my wake, as
near as possible; heaving-to, however, at midnight. This
will bring you fairly abreast of the gulf, and about midway
between the two capes, a little west of south from
Campanella
.
Lyon, you can lie here until the night has fairly set
in, when you can pass between Capri and the cape, and run
down south two hours, and heave-to. This will place you
in a position to watch the passage to and from the gulf,
under the northern shore.
And this arrangement completed to your satisfaction,
Captain Cuffe, asked Lyon, deliberately helping himself to
an enormous pinch of snuff, what will be your pleasure in
the posterior evolutions?
Each ship must keep her station until the day has fairly
dawned. Should it turn out, as I trust it may, that we 've
got the le Few-Folly in-shore of us, all we 'll have to do,
will be to close in upon her, and drive her up, higher and
higher, into the Bay. She will naturally run into shallow
water; when we must anchor off, man the boats, send them
north and south of her, and let them board her, under cover
of our fire. If we find the lugger embayed, we 'll have her,
as sure as fate.
Very prettily conceived, Captain Cuffe; and in a way
to be handsomely executed. But if we should happen to
find the heathen outside of us?
Then make sail in chase to seaward, each ship acting
for the best. Come, gentlemen, I do not wish to be
inhospitable
,
but the Proserpine must be off. She has a long
road before her; and the winds of this season of the year
can barely be counted on for an hour at a time.
Cuffe being in such a hurry, his guests departed without
further ceremony. As for Sir Frederick, the first thing he
did, was to order dinner an hour earlier than he had
intended
,
and then to invite his surgeon and marine-officer,
two capital pairs of knives and forks, to come and share it
with him; after which, he sat down to play somewhat
villanously
on a flute. Two hours later, he gave the
necessary
orders to his first-lieutenant; after which, he troubled
himself very little about the frigate he commanded. Lyon,
on the other hand, sat down to a very frugal meal alone, as
soon as he found himself again in his sloop; first ordering
certain old sails to be got on deck, and to be mended for the
eighth or ninth time.
With the Proserpine it was different. Her capstan-bars
flew round, and one anchor was actually catted, by the time
her captain appeared on deck. The other soon followed,
the three topsails fell, were sheeted-home and hoisted, and
then sail was set after sail, until the ship went steadily past
the low promontory of Ana Capri, a cloud of canvass. Her
head was to the westward, inclining a little north; and had
there been any one to the southward, to watch her
movements
,
as there was not, so far as the eye could see, it would
have been supposed that she was standing over towards the
coast of Sardinia, most probably with an intention of passing,
by the Straits of Bonifacio, between that island and Corsica.
The wind being nearly east, and it blowing a good breeze,
the progress of the ship was such as promised to fulfil all
the expectations of her commander.
As the sun set, and darkness diffused itself over the
Mediterranean
,
the lighter steering-sails were taken in, and the
Proserpine brought the wind abeam, standing south. One
of the last things visible from the decks, besides the
mountains
of the islands and of the main, the curling smoke of
Vesuvius, the blue void above and the bluer sea below, was
the speck of the Terpsichore, as that ship followed, as near
as might be, in her wake; Sir Frederick and his friends
still at table, but with a vigilant and industrious
first-lieutenant
on deck, who was sufficient in himself for all that
was required of the vessel, in any emergency. The latter
had his orders, and he executed them with a precision and
attention that promised to leave nothing to be wished for.
On the other hand, the people of the Ringdove were kept at
work mending old sails until the hour to knock-off work
arrived; then the ship unmoored. At the proper time, the
remaining anchor was lifted, and the sloop went through the
pass, between Capri and Campanella, as directed, when
Lyon sent for the first-lieutenant to join him in his cabin.
Look you here, McBean, said Lyon, pointing to the
chart which lay on the table; Captain Cuffe has just run
down off Piane, and will find himself well to leeward, when
the west wind comes to-morrow; Sir Frederick has followed,
famously clear of the land, and won't be in a much better
box. Now, this lugger must be pretty picking, if all they
say of her be true. Ten to one, but she has gold in her.
These corsairs are desperate rogues after the siller, and,
taking hull, sails, armament, head-money, and the scrapings
of the lockers together, I shouldn't marvel, if she come to
something as good as 8 or 10,000. This would be fair
dividing for a sloop, but would amount to a painfully small
trifle, as between the officers of three ships, after deducting
the admiral's share. What are you thinking of, Airchy?
Of just that, Captain Lyon. It would be dividing every
lieutenant's share by three, as well as every captain's.
That 's it, Airchy, and so ye 'll have a shairp look out,
on deck. There 'll be no occasion to run down quite as far
as Captain Cuffe suggested, ye 'll obsairve; for, if in the
bay, the lugger will work her way up towards this
head-land
,
and we 'll be all the more likely to fall in with her, by
keeping near it ourselves. Ye 'll take the idea?
It 's plain enou', Captain Lyon; and I 'll be obsairving
it. How is the law understood as respects dairkness?I
understand that none share but such as are in
sight;
but is
dairkness deemed a legal impediment?
To be sure it is; the idea being that all who can see
may act. Now, if we catch the lugger before Captain Cuffe
and Sir Frederick even know where she is, on what principle
can they aid and sustain us in the capture!".
"And you wish a shairp look-out, the night, Captain
Lyon?"
"That's just it, Airchy. Yell all be doing your best,
in the way of eyes, and we may get the logger alone.
'T would be such a pity, Mr. McBean, to divide by three,
when the sums might be kept entire!"
Such was the state of feeling with which each of these
three officers entered on his present duty. Cuffe was
earnest in the wish to catch his enemy, and this principally
for the credit of the thing, though a little out of a desire to
revenge his own losses; Sir Frederick Dashwood, indifferent
to all but his own pleasures; and Lyon, closely attentive to
the main chance. An hour or two later, or just before Cuffe
turned in, he sent a message to request the presence of his
first-lieutenant, if the latter were still up. Winchester was
writing up his private journal ; closing the book, he obeyed
the order, in that quiet, submissive manner, which a
first-lieutenant
is more apt to use towards his captain, than
towards any one else.
"Good-evening, Winchester," said Cuffe, in a familiar,
friendly way, which satisfied the subordinate that he was not
sent for to be "rattled-down"; "draw a chair, and try a
glass of this Capri wine, with some water. It's not
carrying
sail hard to drink a gallon of it; yet I rather think it
fills up the chinks better than nothing."
"Thank'ee, Captain Cuffe; we like it in the gun-room,
and got off a fresh cask or two, this morning, while the
court was sitting. So they tell me, sir, his lordship has put
his name to it, and that this Frenchman is to swing from
our fore-yard-arm, sometime to-morrow?"
It stands so on
paper
, Winchester ; but if he confess
where his logger lies, all will go smoothly enough with him.
However, as things look,
now
, we'll have her, and thanks
only to ourselves."
"Well, sir, that will be best, on the whole. I do not like
to see a man selling his own people."
There you are right enough, Winchester, and I trust
we shall get along without it; though the lugger must be
ours. I sent for you, by the way, about this Bolt
something
must be done with that fellow.
It 's a clear case of desertion, Captain Cuffe; and, as it
would now seem, of treason, in the bargain. I would rather
hang ten such chaps, than one man like the Frenchman.
Well, it 's clear, Mr. Winchester,
you
do not bear
malice! Have you forgotten Porto Ferrajo, and the boats,
already? or do you love them that despitefully use you?
'T was all fair service, sir, and one never thinks
anything
of that. I owe this Monsieur Yvard no grudge for
what he did; but, now it 's all fairly over, I rather like him
the better for it. But it 's a very different matter as to this
Bolt; a skulking scoundrel, who would let other men fight
his country's battles, while he goes a-privateering against
British commerce.
Ay, there 's the rub, Winchester!
Are
they
his
country's
battles?
Why we took him for an Englishman, sir, and we must
act up to our own professions, in order to be consistent.
And so hang an innocent man for a treason that he
could
not commit?
Why, Captain Cuffe, do you believe the fellow's whining
story about his being a Yankee? If that be true, we have
done him so much injustice already, as to make his case a
very hard one. For my part, I look upon all these fellows
as only so many disaffected Englishmen, and treat them
accordingly.
That is a sure way to quiet one's feelings, Winchester;
but it 's most too serious when it comes to hanging. If Bolt
deserve any punishment, he deserves death; and that is a
matter about which one ought to be tolerably certain, before
he pushes things too far. I 've sometimes had my doubts
about three or four of our people's being Englishmen, after
all.
There can be no certainty in these matters, unless one
could carry a parish register for the whole kingdom, in his
ship, Captain Cuffe. If they are not Englishmen, why do
they not produce satisfactory proofs to show it? That is
but reasonable, you must allow, sir?
I don't know, Winchester; there are two sides to that
question, too. Suppose the King of Naples should seize
you, here, ashore, and call on you to prove that you are not
one of his subjects?How would you go to work to make
it outno parish register being at hand?
Well, then, Captain Cuffe, if we are so very wrong, we
had better give all these men up, at oncethough one of
them is the very best hand in the ship; I think it right to
tell you that, sir.
There is a wide difference, sir, between giving a man
up, and hanging him. We are short-handed as it is, and
cannot spare a single man. I 've been looking over your
station bills, and they never appeared so feeble before. We
want eighteen or nineteen good seamen to make them
respectable
again; and, though this Bolt is no great matter,
as a seaman, he can turn his hand to so many things, that
he was as useful as the boatswain. In a word, we cannot
spare him; either to let him go, or to hang him; even were
the latter just.
I 'm sure, sir, I desire to do nothing unjust, and so act
your pleasure in the affair.
My pleasure is just this then, Winchester. We must
turn Bolt to duty. If the fellow is really an American, it
would be a wretched business even to flog him for desertion;
and as to treason, you know, there can be none without
allegiance. Nelson gives me a discretion, and so we 'll act
on the safe side, and just turn him over to duty again.
When there comes an opportunity, I 'll inquire into the facts
of his case, and if he can make out that he is not an
Englishman
,
why he must be discharged. The ship will be
going home in a year or two, when everything can be
settled fairly and deliberately. I dare say, Bolt will not
object to the terms.
Perhaps not, sir. Then there 's the crew, Captain
Cuffe.They may think it strange, treason and desertion go
unpunished! These fellows talk and reason more than is
always known, aft.
I 've thought of all that, Winchester. I dare say you
have heard of such a thing as a King's evidence?Well,
here has Raoul Yvard been tried and found guilty as a spy;
Bolt having been a witness. A few remarks judiciously
made, may throw everything off on that tack; and
appearances
will be preserved, so far as discipline is concerned.
Yes, sir, that might be done, it 's true; but an uneasy
berth will the poor devil have of it, if the people fancy he
has been a King's evidence! Men of that class hate a
traitor worse than they do crime, Captain Cuffe, and they 'll
ride Bolt down like the main tack.
Perhaps not; and if they do, 'twill not be as bad as
hanging. The fellow must think himself luckily out of a
bad scrape, and thank God for all his mercies. You can
see that he suffers nothing unreasonable, or greatly out of
the way. So send an order to the master-at-arms to knock
the irons off the chap, and send him to duty, before you
turn in, Winchester.
This settled the matter as to Ithuel, for the moment, at
least. Cuffe was one of those men who was indisposed to
push things too far, while he found it difficult to do his
whole duty. There was not an officer in the Proserpine
who had any serious doubts about the true country of Bolt,
though there was not one officer, among them all, who
would openly avow it. There was too much granite
about Ithuel to permit Englishmen long to be deceived,
and that very language on which the impressed man so
much prided himself, would have betrayed his origin, had
other evidence been wanting. Still there was a tenacity
about an English ship of war, in that day, that did not
easily permit an athletic hand to escape its grasp, when it had
once closed upon him. In a great and enterprising service,
like that of Great Britain, an
esprit de corps
existed in the
respective ships, which made them the rivals of each other,
and men being the great essentials of efficiency, a single
seaman was relinquished with a reluctance that must have
been witnessed, fully to be understood. Cuffe, consequently,
could not make up his mind to do full justice to Ithuel, while
he could not make up his mind to push injustice so far as
trial and punishment. Nelson had left him a discretion, as
has been said, and this he chose to use in the manner just
mentioned.
Had the case of the New Hampshire man been fairly
brought before the British Admiral, his discharge would
have been ordered without hesitation. Nelson was too far
removed from the competition of the separate ships, and
ordinarily under the control of too high motives, to be
Vol. II. 6
accessary to the injustice of forcibly detaining a foreigner
in his country's service; for it was only while under the
malign influence to which there has already been allusion,
that he ceased to be high-minded and just. Prejudiced he
was, and in some cases, exceedingly so; America standing
but little better in his eyes than France herself. For the
first of these antipathies he had some apology; since in
addition to the aversion that was naturally produced by the
history of the cis-atlantic Republic, accident had thrown him
in the way, in the West Indies, of ascertaining the frauds,
deceptions, and cupidities of a class of men that never
exhibit
national character in its brightest and most alluring
colours. Still, he was too upright of mind, willingly to
countenance injustice, and too chivalrous to oppress. But
Ithuel had fallen into the hands of one who fell far short of
the high qualities of the Admiral, while, at the same time,
he kept clear of his more prominent weaknesses, and who
was
brought within the sphere of the competition between
the respective ships and their crews.
Winchester, of course, obeyed his orders. He roused the
master-at-arms from his hammock, and directed him to
bring Ithuel Bolt to the quarter-deck.
In consequence of what took place this morning, said
the first-lieutenant, in a voice loud enough to be heard by all
near him, Captain Cuffe has seen fit to order you to be
released, Bolt, and turned to duty again. You will know
how to appreciate this leniency, and will serve with greater
zeal than ever, I make no doubt. Never forget that you
have been with a yard-rope, as it might be, round your neck.
In the morning you will be stationed and berthed anew.
Ithuel was too shrewd to answer. He fully understood the
reason why he escaped punishment, and it increased his
hopes of eventually escaping from the service itself. Still
he gagged a little at the idea of passing for one who peached
or for a
State's
-evidence as he called it; that character
involving more of sin, in vulgar eyes, than the commission
of a thousand legal crimes. This gave Winchester no
concern
.
After dismissing his man, he gossiped a minute or
two with Yelverton, who had the watch, gaped once or twice
somewhat provokingly, and going below, was in a deep sleep
in ten minutes.
CHAPTER V.
White as a white sail on a dusky sea,
When half the horizon 's clouded and half free,
Fluttering between the dun wave and the sky,
Is hope's last gleam in man's extremity.
The Island
.
The
dawning of day, on the morning which succeeded,
was a moment of great interest, on board the different
English
ships which then lay off the Gulf of Salerno. Cuffe
and Lyon were called, according to especial orders left by
themselves, while even Sir Frederick Dashwood allowed
himself to be awakened, to hear the report of the officer of the
deck. The first was up quite half-an-hour before the light
appeared. He even went into the main-top, again, in order
to get as early and as wide a survey of the horizon as he
wished. Griffin went aloft with him, and, together they
stood leaning against the top-mast rigging, watching the
slow approach of those rays which gradually diffused
themselves
over the whole of a panorama that was as bewitching
as the hour and the lovely accessories of an Italian landscape
could render it.
I see nothing,
in-shore
, exclaimed Cuffe, in a tone of
disappointment, when the light permitted a tolerable view of
the coast. If she should be
outside
of us, our work will
be only half done!
There is a white speck close in with the land, sir,
returned Griffin; here, in the direction of those ruins, of
which our gentlemen that have been round in the boats to
look at, tell such marvels; I believe, however, it is only a
felucca or a sparanara. There is a peak to the sail that
does not look lugger-fashion.
What is this, off here at the north-west, Griffin?Is it
too large for the le Few-Folly?
That must be the Terpsichore, sir. It 's just where she
ought
to be, as I understand the orders; and, I suppose, Sir
Frederick has carried her there. But yonder 's a sail, in the
northern board, which may turn out to be the lugger; she 's
fairly within Campanella, and is not far from the north shore
of the bay.
By George!that
must
be she; Monsieur Yvard has
kept her skulking round and about Amalfi, all this time!
Let us go down, and set everything that will draw, at once,
sir.
In two minutes Griffin was on deck, hauling the yards,
and clearing away to make sail. As usual, the wind was
light at the southward, again, and the course would be nearly
before it. Studding-sail booms were to be run out, the sails
set, and the ship's head laid to the northward, keeping a
little to seaward of the chase. At this moment the
Proserpine
had the Point of Piane, and the little village of Abate,
nearly abeam. The ship might have been going four knots
through the water, and the distance across the mouth of the
bay was something like thirty miles. Of course, eight hours
would be necessary to carry the frigate over the intervening
space, should the wind stand, as it probably would not, at
that season of the year. A week later, and strong southerly
winds might be expected, but that week was as interminable
as an age, for any present purpose.
Half-an-hour's trial satisfied all on the deck of the
Proserpine
,
that the chase was keeping off, like themselves, and
that she was standing towards the mountains of Amalfi.
Her progress, too, was about equal to that of the frigate, for,
dead before the wind, the latter ship was merely a good
sailer; her great superiority commencing only when she
brought the breeze forward of the beam. It had been
supposed
that the stranger, when first seen, was about fifteen
miles distant, his canvass appearing both small and
shapeless
;
but some doubts now began to be entertained, equally
as to his rig, his size, and his distance. If a large or a lofty
vessel, of course he must be materially farther off, and if a
large or lofty vessel it could not be le Feu-Follet.
The other frigate took her cue from the Proserpine, and
stood across for the northern side of the gulf; a certain proof
that nothing was visible, from her mast-heads, to lead her
in any other direction. Two hours, however, satisfied all
on board the latter ship, that they were on a wrong scent,
and that the vessel to-leeward was their own consort, the
sloop; Lyon having, in his eagerness to get the prize before
she could be seen from the other ships, carried the Ringdove
quite within the bay, and thus misled Cuffe and Sir
Frederick
.
There can no longer be any doubt! exclaimed the
captain of the Proserpine, dropping his glass, with vexation
too strongly painted in his manner to be mistaken; that is
a ship; and, as you say, Winchester, it must be the Ringdove;
though what the devil Lyon is doing away in there with
her, unless he sees something close under the land, is more
than I can tell. As there is clearly nothing in this quarter,
we will stand on, and take a look for ourselves.
This nearly destroyed the hope of success. The officers
began to suspect that their look-out on Campanella had been
deceived, and that what he had supposed to be a lugger, was,
in truth, a felucca, or perhaps a xebec; a craft which might
well be mistaken for a lugger, at the distance of a few
leagues. The error, however, was with those in the ship.
The officer sent upon the heights was a shrewd, practised
master's-mate, who knew everything about his profession,
that properly came within his line, and knew little else.
But for a habit of drinking, he would long since have been
a lieutenant, being, in truth, an older sailor than
Winchester
;
but, satisfied of his own infirmity, and coming from a
class in life in which preferment was viewed as a God-send,
rather than as a right, he had long settled down into the
belief that he was to live and die in his present station, thereby
losing most of the desire to rise. The name of this man was
Clinch. In consequence of his long experience, within the
circle of his duties, his opinion was greatly respected by his
superiors, when he was sober; and, as he had the precaution
not to be otherwise, when engaged on service, his weakness
seldom brought him into any serious difficulties. Cuffe, as
a last hope, had sent him up on the heights of Campanella,
with a perfect conviction that, if anything were really in
sight, he would not fail to see it. All this confidence,
however
,
had now ended in disappointment; and, half-an-hour
later, when it was announced to Cuffe, that the cutter, with
Mr. Clinch, was coming down the bay towards them, the
former even heard the name of his drunken favourite with
disgust. As was usual with him, when out of humour, he
6 *
went below, as the boat drew near, leaving orders for her
officer to be sent down to him, the instant the latter got on
board. Five minutes later, Clinch thrust his hard-looking,
weather-beaten, but handsome red countenance in at the
cabin-door.
Well, sir, commenced the captain, on a tolerably high
keya dd pretty wild-goose chase you 've sent us all
on, down here, into this bay! The southerly wind is failing,
already, and, in half-an-hour, the ships will be frying the pitch
off their decks, without a breath of air: when the wind does
come, it will come out at west, and bring us all four or five
leagues dead to leeward!
Clinch's experience had taught him the useful man-of-war
lesson, to bow to the tempest, and not to attempt to brave it.
Whenever he was rattled-down, as he called it, he had
the habit of throwing an expression of surprise, comically
blended with contrition, into his countenance, that seemed to
say, what have I done, now?or, if I have done
anything
amiss, you see how sorry I am for it. He met his
irritated commander, on the present occasion, with this
expression
,
and it produced the usual effect of mollifying him,
a little.
Well, sir  explain this matter, if you please,
continued
Cuffe, after a moment's hesitation.
Will you please to tell me, sir, what you wish
explained
?
inquired Clinch, throwing more surprise than
common, even, into his countenance.
That is an extraordinary question, Mr. Clinch! I wish
the signal you made from yonder head-land explained, sir.
Did you not signal the ship, to say that you saw the le
Few-Folly down here, at the southward?
Well, sir, I 'm glad there was no mistake in the matter,
answered Clinch, in a confident and a relieved manner. I
was
afraid, at first, Captain Cuffe, my signal had not been
understood.
Understood!How could it be mistaken? You showed
a black ball, for `the lugger 's in sight.' You 'll not deny
that, I trust?
No, sir  one black ball, for `the lugger 's in sight.'
That 's just what I did show, Captain Cuffe.
And
three
black balls together, for `she bears due south
from Capri.' What do you say to
that?
All right, sir. Three black balls together, for `she
bears due south from Capri.' I didn't tell the distance,
Captain Cuffe, because Mr. Winchester gave me no signals
for that.
And these signals you kept showing every half-hour,
as long as it was light; even until the Proserpine was off.
All according to orders, Captain Cuffe, as Mr.
Winchester
will tell you. I was to repeat every half-hour, as long
as the lugger was in sight, and the day lasted.
Ay, sir; but you were not ordered to send us after a
jack-o'-lantern, or to mistake some xebec or other, from
one of the Greek islands, for a light, handy French lugger.
Nor did I, Captain Cuffe, begging your pardon, sir. I
signalled the Few-Folly, and nothing else, I give you my
word for it.
Cuffe looked hard at the master's-mate for half a minute,
and his ire insensibly lessened as he gazed.
You are too old a seaman, Clinch, not to know what
you were about! If you saw the privateer, be good enough
to tell us what has become of her?
That is more than I can say, Captain Cuffe, though
see
her I did; and that so plainly, as to be able to make out
her jigger, even. You know, sir, we shot away her
jigger-mast
in the chase off Elba, and she got a new one that
steves for'rard uncommonly. I noticed
that
when we fell
in with her in the canal of Piombino; and seeing it again,
could not but know it. But there 's no mistaking the saucy
Folly, for them that has once seen her; and I am certain we
made her out, about four leagues to the southward of the
cape, at the time I first signalled.
Four leagues!  I had thought she must be at least
eight or ten, and kept off that distance, to get her in the net.
Why did you not let us know her distance?
Had no signals for that, Captain Cuffe.
Well, then, why not send a boat to tell us the fact?
Had no orders, sir. Was told by Mr. Winchester just
to signal the lugger and her bearings; and this, you must
own, Captain Cuffe, we did plain enough. Besides, sir
Well; besides
what?
demanded the captain, observing
that the master's-mate hesitated.
Why, sir, how was I to know that any one in the ship
would think a lugger
could
be seen eight or ten leagues?
That 's a long bit of water, sir; and it would take a heavy
ship's spars to rise high enough for such a sight.
The land you were on, Clinch, was much loftier than
any vessel's spars.
Quite true, sir; but not lofty enough for that, Captain
Cuffe. That I saw the Folly, I 'm as certain as I am of
being in this cabin.
What has become of her, then?  You perceive she is
not in the bay now.
I suppose, Captain Cuffe, that she stood in until near
enough for her purpose, and that she must have hauled off
the land, after night set in. There was plenty of room for
her to pass out to sea again between the two frigates, and
not be seen in the dark.
This conjecture was so plausible, as to satisfy Cuffe; and
yet it was not the fact. Clinch had made le Feu-Follet,
from his elevated post, to the southward, as his signal had
said; and he was right in all his statements about her, until
darkness concealed her movements. Instead of passing out
of the Bay, as he imagined, however, she had hauled up
within a quarter of a league of Campanella, doubled that
point, brushed along the coast to the northward of it, fairly
within the Bay of Naples, and pushed out to sea, between
Capri and Ischia; going directly athwart the anchorage the
men-of-war had so recently quitted, in order to do so.
When Raoul quitted his vessel, he ordered her to stand
directly off the land, just keeping Ischia and Capri in view,
lying-to under her jigger. As this was low sail, and a
lugger
shows so little aloft, it was a common expedient with
cruisers of that rig, when they wished to escape observation.
Monsieur Pintard, Raoul's first-lieutenant, had expected a
signal from his commander at the very spot where Clinch
had taken his station; but seeing none, he had swept along
the coast, after dark, in the hope of discovering his position
by the burning of a blue-light. Failing of this, however, he
went off the land again, in time to get an offing before the
return of day, and to save the wind. It was the boldness
of the manuvre, that saved the lugger; Lyon going out
through the pass between Capri and Campanella, about
twenty minutes before Pintard brushed close round the
rocks, under his jigger and jib only, anxiously looking out
for a signal from his captain. The Frenchmen saw the
sloop-of-war quite plainly, and, by the aid of their
night-glasses
,
ascertained her character; mistaking her, however,
for another ship, bound to Sicily or Malta; while their own
vessel escaped observation, owing to the little sail she
carried
,
the want of hamper, and her situation so near the land,
which gave her a back-ground of rocks. Clinch had not
seen the movements of the lugger after dark, in consequence
of his retiring to the village of St. Agata to seek lodgings,
as soon as he perceived that his own ship had gone to sea,
and left him and his boat's crew behind. The following
morning, when he made the ship to the southward, he pushed
off, and pulled towards his proper vessel, as related.
Where did you pass the night, Clinch? demanded the
captain, after they had discussed the probabilities of the
lugger's
escape. Not on the heights, under the canopy of
heaven?
On the heights, and under the great canopy that has
covered us both so often, Captain Cuffe; but with a good
Neapolitan mud-roof between it and my head. As soon as
it was dark, and I saw that the ship was off, I found a
village
named St. Agata, that stands on the heights, just abeam
of those rocks they call the Sirens, and there we were well
berthed until morning.
You are lucky in bringing back all the boat's crew,
Clinch. You know it 's low-water with us as to men, just
now; and our fellows are not all to be trusted ashore, in a
country that is full of stone walls, good wine, and pretty
girls.
I always take a set of regular steady-ones with me,
Captain Cuffe; I have n't lost a man from a boat, these five
years.
You must have some secret, then, worth knowing; for
even the admirals sometimes lose their barge-men. I dare
say, now, yours are all married chaps, that hold on to their
wives, as so many sheet-anchors; they say that is often a
good expedient.
Not at all, sir. I did try that, till I found that half the
fellows would run to get rid of their wives. The Portsmouth
and Plymouth marriages don't always bring large estates
with them, sir, and the bridegrooms like to cut adrift at the
end of the honey-moon. Don't you remember when we
were in the Blenheim together, sir, we lost eleven of the
launch's crew at one time; and nine of them turned out to
be vagabonds, sir, that deserted their weeping wives and
suffering families at home!
Now you mention it, I do remember something of the
sort; draw a chair, Clinch, and take a glass of grog. Tim,
put a bottle of Jamaica before Mr. Clinch. I have heard it
said that you are married yourself, my gallant
master's-mate
?
Lord, Captain Cuffe, that 's one of the young
gentlemen's
stories! If a body believed all they say, the
Christian
religion would soon get athwart-hawse, and mankind be
all adrift in their morals, answered Clinch, smacking his
lips, after a very grateful draught. We 've a regular set
of high-flyers, aboard this ship, at this blessed minute,
Captain
Cuffe, sir, and Mr. Winchester has his hands full of
them! I often wonder at his patience, sir.
We were young once ourselves, Clinch, and ought to
be indulgent to the follies of youth. But, what sort of a
berth did you find last night, upon the rocks yonder?
Why, sir, as good as one can expect out of Old
England
.
I fell in with an elderly woman calling herself
Giuntotardi
which
is regular-built Italian, isn't it, sir?
That it is  but, you speak the language, I believe,
Clinch?
Why, sir, I 've been drifting about the world so long,
that I speak a little of everything, finding it convenient
when I stand in need of victuals and drink. The old lady
on the hill and I overhauled a famous yarn between us, sir.
It seems she has a niece and a brother at Naples, who ought
to have been back night before last; and she was in lots of
tribulation about them, wanting to know if our ship had seen
anything of the rovers?
By George, Clinch, you were on soundings, there, had
you but known it! Our prisoner has been in that part of
the world, and we might get some clue to his manuvres,
by questioning the old woman closely. I hope you parted
good friends?
The best in the world, Captain Cuffe. No one that
feeds and lodges
me
well, need dread me as an enemy.
I 'll warrant it! That 's the reason you are so loyal,
Clinch.
The hard, red face of the master's-mate worked a little,
and, though he could not well look all sorts of colours, he
looked all ways, but in his captain's eye. It was now ten
years since he ought to have been a lieutenant, having once
actually outranked Cuffe, in the way of date of service at
least; and his conscience told him two things, quite distinctly;
first, the fact of his long and weary probation; and second,
that it was, in a great degree, his own fault.
I love His Majesty, sir, Clinch observed, after giving
a gulp, and I never lay anything that goes hard with
myself
to his account. Still, memory will be memory; and
spite of all I can do, sir, I sometimes remember what I
might
have been, as well as what I
am
. If His Majesty
does
feed me, it is with the spoon of a master's-mate; and
if he
does
lodge me, it is in the cockpit.
I have been your shipmate, often, and for years at a
time, answered Cuffe, good-naturedly, though a little in
the manner of a superior; and no one knows your history
better. It is not your friends who have failed you, at need,
so much as a certain enemy, with whom you will insist on
associating, though he harms them most, who love him
best.
Ay, ay, sir  that can't be denied, Captain Cuffe; yet
it 's a hard life that passes altogether without hope.
This was uttered with an expression of melancholy that
said more for Clinch's character than Cuffe had witnessed
in the man for years, and it revived many early impressions
in his favour. Clinch and he had once been messmates,
even; and, though years of a decided disparity in rank had
since interposed their barrier of etiquette and feeling, Cuffe
never could entirely forget the circumstance.
It is hard, indeed, to live as you say, without hope,
returned the captain; but hope
ought
to be the last thing
to die. You should make one more rally, Clinch, before
you throw up, in despair.
It's not so much for myself, Captain Cuffe, that I mind
it, as for some that live ashore. My father was as
reputable
a tradesman as there was in Plymouth, and when he got
me on the quarter-deck, he thought he was about to make a
gentleman of me, instead of leaving me to pass a life, in a
situation that may be said to be even beneath what his own
was.
Now you undervalue your station, Clinch. The berth
of a master's-mate, in one of His Majesty's finest frigates, is
something to be proud of; I was once a master's-mate
nay, Nelson has doubtless filled the same station. For that
matter, one of His Majesty's own sons may have gone through
the rank.
Ay, gone
through
it, as you say, sir, returned Clinch,
with a husky voice. It does well enough for them that go
through
it, but it 's death to them that
stick
. It 's a feather
in a midshipman's cap to be rated a mate; but it 's no
honour to be a mate, at my time of life, Captain Cuffe.
What is your age, Clinch?  You are not much my
senior.
Your senior, sir!The difference in our years is not as
great as in our rank, certainly, though I never shall see
thirty-two, again. But it 's not so much
that
, after all, as
the thoughts of my poor mother, who set her heart on seeing
me with His Majesty's commission in my pocket; and of
another, who set her heart on one that I 'm afraid was never
worthy her affection.
This is new to me, Clinch, returned the captain, with
interest. One so seldom thinks of a master's-mate
marrying
,
that the idea of your being in that way has never
crossed my mind, except in the manner of a joke.
Master's-mates
have
married, Captain Cuffe, and they
have ended in being very miserable. But Jane, as well as
myself, has made up her mind to live single, unless we can
see brighter prospects before us than what my present hopes
afford.
Is it quite right, Jack, to keep a poor young woman,
towing along in this uncertainty, during the period of life
when her chances for making a good connection are the
best?
Clinch stared at his commander, until his eyes filled with
tears. The glass had not touched his lips since the
conversation
took its present direction; and the usual, hard,
settled
character of his face was becoming expressive, once
more, with human emotions.
It 's not my fault, Captain Cuffe, he answered, in a
low voice; it 's now quite six years, since I insisted on
her giving me up; but she wouldn't hear of the thing. A
very respectable attorney wished to have her, and I even
prayed her to accept his offer; and the only unkind glance
I ever got from her eye, was when she heard me make a
request that she told me sounded impiously, almost, to her
ears. She would be a sailor's wife, or die a maid.
The girl has unfortunately got some romantic notions
concerning the profession, Clinch, and they are ever the
hardest to be convinced of what is for their own good.
Jane Weston!  Not she, sir  There is not as much
romance about her, as in the fly-leaves of a prayer-book.
She is all
heart
, poor Jane; and how I came to get such a
hold of it, Captain Cuffe, is a great mystery to myself. I
certainly do not
deserve
half her affection, and I now begin
to despair of ever being able to repay her for it.
Clinch was still a handsome man, though exposure and his
habits had made some inroads on a countenance, that by
nature was frank, open, and prepossessing. It now
expressed
the anguish that occasionally came over his heart,
as the helplessness of his situation presented itself fully to
his mind. Cuffe's feelings were touched, for he
remembered
the time when they were messmates, with a future before
them, that promised no more to the one than to the other,
the difference in the chances which birth afforded the
captain
,
alone excepted. Clinch was a prime seaman, and as
brave as a lion, too; qualities that secured to him a degree
of respect, that his occasional self-forgetfulness had never
entirely forfeited. Some persons thought him the most
skilful mariner the Proserpine contained; and, perhaps,
this was true, if the professional skill were confined strictly
to the handling of a ship, or to taking care of her on critical
occasions. All these circumstances induced Cuffe to enter
more closely into the master-mate's present distress than he
might otherwise have done. Instead of shoving the bottle
to him, however, as if conscious how much disappointed
Vol. II.  7
hope had already driven the other to its indiscreet use, he
pushed it gently aside, and taking his old messmate's hand,
with a momentary forgetfulness of the difference in rank, he
said in a tone of kindness and confidence, that had long
been strangers to Clinch's ears
Jack, my honest fellow, there is good stuff in you yet,
if you will only give it fair play. Make a manly rally,
respect yourself for a few months, and something will turn
up, that will yet give you your Jane, and gladden your old
mother's heart.
There are periods in the lives of men, when a few kind
words, backed by a friendly act or two, might save
thousands
of human beings from destruction. Such was the
crisis in the fate of Clinch. He had almost given up hope,
though it did occasionally revive in him, whenever he got a
cheering letter from the constant Jane, who pertinaciously
refused to believe anything to his prejudice, and religiously
abstained from all reproaches. But, it is necessary to
understand
the influence of rank, on board a man-of-war, fully
to comprehend the effect, which was now produced on the
master's-mate, by the captain's language and manner.
Tears streamed out of the eyes of Clinch, and he grasped
the hand of his commander, almost convulsively.
What can I do, sir?Captain Cuffe, what can I do?
he exclaimed. My duty is never neglected; but there
are
moments of despair, when I find the burthen too hard to be
borne, without calling upon the bottle for support.
Whenever a man drinks with such a motive, Clinch, I
would advise him to abstain altogether. He cannot trust
himself; and that which he terms his friend, is, in truth, his
direst enemy. Refuse your rations, even; determine to be
free. One week, nay, one day, may give a strength that
will enable you to conquer, by leaving your reason
unimpaired
.
Absence from the ship has accidentally befriended
you, for the little you have taken here, has not been
sufficient
to do any harm. We are now engaged on a most
interesting duty, and I will throw service into your way,
that may be of importance to you. Get your name once
fairly in a despatch, and your commission is safe. Nelson
loves to prefer old tars; and nothing would make him
happier, than to be able to serve
you
. Put it in my power
to ask it of him, and I 'll answer for the result. Something
may yet come out of your visit to the cottage of this woman,
and do you be mindful to keep yourself in fortune's way.
God bless you, Captain Cuffe  God bless you, sir,
answered Clinch, nearly choked,I 'll endeavour to do as
you wish.
Remember Jane and your mother. With such a woman
dependent for her happiness on his existence, a man must
be a brute, not to struggle hard.
Clinch groaned, for Cuffe probed his wound deep; though
it was done with an honest desire to cure. After wiping
the perspiration from his face, and writhing on his chair,
however, he recovered a little of his self-command, and
became
comparatively composed.
If a friend could only point out the way by which I
might recover some of the lost ground, he said, my
gratitude
to him would last as long as life, Captain Cuffe.
Here is an opening then, Clinch. Nelson attaches as
much importance to our catching this lugger as he ever did
to falling in with a fleet. The officer who is serviceable on
this occasion may be sure of being remembered, and I will
give you every chance in my power. Go, dress yourself in
your best; make yourself look as you know you can; then
be ready for boat service. I have some duty for you now,
which will be but the beginning of good luck, if you only
remain true to your mother, to Jane, and to yourself.
A new life was infused into Clinch. For years he had
been overlooked; apparently forgotten, except when
thorough
seamanship was required; and even his experiment
of getting transferred to a vessel commanded by an old
messmate had seemingly failed. Here was a change,
however
,
and a ray, brighter than common, shone athwart the
darkness of his future. Even Cuffe was struck with the
cheerfulness of his countenance, and the alacrity of the
master's-mate's movements, and he reproached himself with
having so long been indifferent to the best interests of one
who certainly had some claims on his friendship. Still,
there was nothing unusual in the present relations between
these old messmates. Favoured by family and friends,
Cuffe had never been permitted to fall into despondency, and
had pursued his career successfully and with spirit; while
the other, unsupported, and failing of any immediate
opportunity
for getting ahead, had fallen into evil ways, and come
to be, by slow degrees, the man he was. Such instances as
the latter, are of not unfrequent occurrence even in a marine
in which promotion is as regular as our own, though it is
rare indeed that a man recovers his lost ground, when placed
in circumstances so trying.
In half an hour Clinch was ready, dressed in his best.
The gentlemen of the quarter-deck saw all these
preparations
with surprise; for, of late, the master's-mate had
seldom
been seen in that part of the ship at all. But, in a
man-of-war, discipline is a matter of faith, and no one
presumed
to ask questions. Clinch was closeted with the
Captain for a few minutes, received his orders, and went
over the ship's side with a cheerful countenance, actually
entering the Captain's gig, the fastest rowing boat of the
ship. As soon as seated, he shoved off, and held his way
towards the point of Campanella, then distant about three
leagues. No one knew whither he was bound, though all
believed it was on duty that related to the lugger, and duty
that required a seaman's judgment. As for Cuffe, his
manner
,
which had begun to be uneasy and wandering, became
more composed when he saw his old messmate fairly off,
and that too, at a rate which would carry him even to
Naples, in the course of a few hours should his voyage
happen to be so long.
CHAPTER VI.
His honour's link'd
Unto his life; he that will seek the one
Must venture for the other, or lose both.
Tatham
.
It
was now certain that le Feu-Follet was not in the Bay
of Salerno. By means of the lofty spars of the ship, and
the aid of glasses, the whole coast had been effectually
surveyed
,
and no signs of such a craft were visible. Even
Lyon had given it up, had wore round, and was standing
along the land again, towards Campanella, a disappointed
man. As Cuffe expected the next wind from the westward,
he continued on to the northward, however, intending to go
off Amalfi, and question any fisherman he might fall in with.
Leaving the ship slowly pursuing her course in that
direction
,
then, we will turn our attention to the state of the
prisoners.
Ghita and her uncle had been properly cared for, all this
time. The gunner's wife lived on board, and, being a
respectable woman, Cuffe had the delicacy to send the poor
girl forward to the state-room and mess of this woman.
Her uncle was provided for near by, and, as neither was
considered in any degree criminal, it was the intention to
put them ashore, as soon as it was certain that no
information
concerning the lugger was to be obtained from them.
Ithuel was at duty again, having passed half the morning in
the fore-top. The shore-boat, which was in the way on
deck, was now struck into the water, and was towing astern,
in waiting for the moment when Carlo Giuntotardi and his
niece were to be put in possession of it again, and permitted
to depart. This moment was delayed, however, until the
ship should again double Campanella, and be once more in
the Bay of Naples, as it would have been cruel to send two
such persons as the uncle and niece adrift, at any material
distance from their proper place of landing.
It was very different with Raoul Yvard, however. He
was under the charge of a sentry on the berth-deck, in
waiting for the fearful moment when he should be brought
forth for execution. His sentence was generally known in
the ship, and with a few he was an object of interest;
though punishment, deaths in battle, and all the other
casualties of nautical life, were much too familiar in such a
war to awaken anything like a sensation in an active
cruising frigate. Still, some had a thought for the prisoner's
situation. Winchester was a humane man, and, to his
credit, he bore no malice for his own defeat and sufferings;
while in his capacity of first-lieutenant, it was in his power
to do much towards adding to the comfort of the condemned.
He had placed the prisoner between two open ports, where
7 *
the air circulated freely, no trifling consideration in so warm
a climate, and had ordered a canvass bulk-head to be placed
around him, giving Raoul the benefit of a state-room for his
meditations at so awful a moment. His irons, too, had
been removed as useless; though care had been had to take
away from the prisoner everything by which he might
attempt his own life. The probability of his jumping
through a port had been discussed between the first and
second lieutenants; but the sentry was admonished to be on
his guard against any such attempt, and little apprehension
was felt, Raoul being so composed and so unlikely to do
anything precipitately. Then it would be easy to pick him
up, while the vessel moved so slowly. To own the truth,
too, many would prefer his drowning himself, to seeing him
swinging at a yard-arm.
In this narrow prison, then, Raoul passed the night and
morning. It would be representing him as more stoical
than the truth, if we said he was unmoved. So far from this,
his moments were bitter, and his anguish would have been
extreme, were it not for a high resolution which prompted
him to die, as he fancied it, like
un Franais
. The
numerous
executions by the guillotine, had brought fortitude
under such circumstances, into a sort of fashion, and there
were few who did not meet death with decorum. With our
prisoner, however, it was still different; for, sustained by a
dauntless spirit, he would have faced the great tyrant of the
race, even in his most ruthless mood, with firmness, if not
with disdain. But, to a young man and a lover, the last
great change could not well approach without bringing with
it a feeling of hopelessness, that, in the case of Raoul, was
unrelieved by any cheering expectations for the future. He
fully believed his doom to be sealed, and that, less on
account of his imaginary offence as a spy, than on account
of the known and extensive injuries he had done to the
English
commerce. Raoul was a good hater; and, according
to the fashion of past times, which we apprehend, in spite of
a vast deal of equivocal philanthropy that now circulates
freely from mouth to mouth, and from pen to pen, will
continue
to be the fashion of times to come, he heartily disliked
the people with whom he was at war, and consequently, was
ready to believe anything to their prejudice that political
rivalry might invent; a frame of mind that led him to think
his life would be viewed as a trifle, when put in the scales
against English ascendency, or English profit. He was
accustomed to think of the people of Great Britain as a
nation of shop-keepers, and, while engaged himself in a
calling that bears the brand of rapacity on its very brow,
he looked upon his own pursuit as comparatively martial
and honourable; qualities, in sooth, it was far from being
without, as he himself had exercised its functions. In a
word, Raoul understood Cuffe, as little as Cuffe understood
him; facts that will sufficiently appear in the interview
which it has now become our office to relate.
The prisoner received one or two friendly visits in the
course of the morning; Griffin, in particular, conceiving it
to be his duty to try to cheer the condemned man, on
account of his own knowledge of foreign tongues. On these
occasions, the conversation was prevented from falling into
anything like the sombre, by the firmness of the prisoner's
manner. With a view to do the thing handsomely,
Winchester
had caused the canvass bulk-head to include the guns
on each side, which of course gave more air and light within
the narrow apartment, as it brought both ports into the little
room. Raoul adverted to this circumstance, as, seated on
one stool, he invited Griffin, in the last of his visits, to take
another.
You find me, here, supported by a piece of eighteen on
each side, observed the prisoner, smiling, as becomes a
seaman who is about to die. Were my death to come from
the mouths of your cannon, Monsieur Lieutenant, it would
only meet me a few months, or perhaps a few days sooner
than it might happen by the same mode, in the ordinary
course of events.
We know how to feel for a brave man in your
situation
,
answered Griffin, with emotion; and nothing would
make us all happier than to have it as you say; you in a
good warm frigate, on our broadside, and we in this of our
own, contending fairly for the honour of our respective
countries.
Monsieur, the fortune of war has ordered it otherwise
but, you are not seated, Monsieur Lieutenant.
Mon pardon
Captain Cuffe has sent me to request you
will favour him with your company, in his cabin, as soon as
it may be agreeable to yourself, Monsieur Yvard.
There is something in the polished expressions of the
French language, that would have rendered it difficult for
Griffin to have been other than delicate in his
communications
with the prisoner, had he been so disposed; but, such
was not his inclination; for, now that their gallant
adversary
was at their mercy, all the brave men in the Proserpine
felt a disposition to deal tenderly with him. Raoul was
touched with these indications of generosity, and, as he had
witnessed Griffin's spirit in the different attempts made on
his lugger, it inclined him to think better of his foes. Rising,
he professed his readiness to attend the captain, at that very
moment.
Cuffe was waiting in the after-cabin. When Griffin and
the prisoner entered, he courteously requested both to be
seated, the former being invited to remain, not only as a
witness of what might occur, but to act as interpreter in
case of need. A short pause succeeded, and then the
captain
opened the dialogue, which was carried on in English,
with occasional assistance from Griffin, whenever it became
necessary.
I greatly regret, Monsieur Yvard, to see a brave man
in your situation, commenced Cuffe, who, sooth to say,
apart from the particular object he had in view, uttered no
more than the truth. We have done full justice to your
spirit and judgment, while we have tried the hardest to get
you into our power. But the laws of war are severe,
necessarily
,
and we English have a commander-in-chief who is
not disposed to trifle in matters of duty.
This was said, partly in policy, and partly from a habit
of standing in awe of the character of Nelson. Raoul
received it, however, in the most favourable light; though
the politic portion of the motive was altogether thrown away,
as will be seen in the sequel.
Monsieur, un Franais knows how to die in the cause
of liberty and his country, answered Raoul, courteously,
yet with emphasis.
I do not doubt it, Monsieur; still, I see no necessity of
things being pushed to that extremity. England is as liberal
of her rewards, as she is powerful to resent injuries.
Perhaps
some plan may be adopted which will avert the
necessity
of sacrificing the life of a brave man, in so cruel a
mode.
I shall not affect to play the hero, Monsieur le Capitaine.
If any proper mode of relieving me, in my present crisis,
can be discovered, my gratitude will be in proportion to the
service rendered.
This is talking sensibly, and to the purpose: I make no
doubt, when we come to a right understanding, everything
will be amicably arranged between us. Griffin, do me the
favour to help yourself to a glass of wine and water, which
you will find refreshing this warm day. Monsieur Yvard
will join us; the wine coming from Capri, and being far
from bad; though some do prefer the Lachrym Christi
that grows about the foot of Vesuvius, I believe.
Griffin did as desired, though his own countenance was
far from expressing all the satisfaction that was obvious in
the face of Cuffe. Raoul declined the offer; waiting for the
forthcoming explanation with an interest he did not affect to
conceal. Cuffe seemed disappointed and reluctant to
proceed
;
but, finding his two companions silent, he was obliged
to make his proposal.
Oui, Monsieur, he added, England is powerful to
resent, but ready to forgive. You are very fortunate in
having it in your power, at so serious a moment, to secure
her pardon for an offence that is always visited in war with
a punishment graver than any other.
In what way can this be done, Monsieur le Capitaine!
I am not one who despises life; more especially when it is
in danger of being lost by a disgraceful death.
I am rejoiced, Monsieur Yvard, to find you in this frame
of mind; it will relieve me from the discharge of a most
painful duty, and be the means of smoothing over many
difficulties. Without doubt, you have heard of the character
of our celebrated admiral, Nelson?
His name is known to every seaman, Monsieur,
answered Raoul, stiffly; his natural antipathies being far
from cured by the extremity of his situation. He has
written it on the waters of the Nile, in letters of blood!
Ay, his deeds,
there
, or elsewhere, will not soon be
forgotten
.
He is a man of an iron will; when his heart is set
on a thing, he sticks at no risk to obtain it, especially if the
means be lawful, and the end is glory. To be frank,
Monsieur
,
he wishes much for your lugger, the le Few-Folly.
Ah! exclaimed Raoul, smiling ironicallyNelson is
not the only English admiral who has had the same desire.
Le Feu-Follet, Monsieur le Capitaine, is so charming, that
she has many admirers!
Among whom Nelson is one of the warmest. Now, this
makes your case so much the easier to be disposed of. You
have nothing to do but put the lugger into our hands, when
you will be pardoned, and be treated as a prisoner of war.
Does Monsieur Nelson authorize you to make this
proposal
to me? asked Raoul, gravely.
He does. Intrusted with the care of his country's
interests
,
he is willing to overlook the offence against her, under
the law of nations, to deprive the enemy of the means of
doing so much harm. Put the lugger into our hands, and
you shall be sent to an ordinary prison-ship. Nay, merely
let us into the secret of her position, and
we
will see to her
capture.
Monsieur Nelson doubtless does no more than his duty,
answered Raoul, quietly, but with an air of severe
self-respect
.
It is his business to have a care for English
commerce, and he has every right to make this bargain.
But the treaty will not be conducted on equal terms; while
he is doing no more than his duty, I have no powers.
How?You have the power of speech; that will suffice
to let us into the secret of the orders you have given the
lugger, and where she is probably to be found, at this
moment
.
Non, Monsieur; I have not even
that
power. I can
do nothing that must cover me with so much infamy. My
tongue is under laws that I never made, when treachery is
in question.
Had Raoul assumed a theatrical tone and manner, as
might have been expected, probably it would have made very
little impression on Cuffe; but his quiet simplicity and
steadiness carried conviction with them. To say the truth,
the captain was disappointed. He would have hesitated
about making his proposition to an officer of the regular
French marine, low as even these stood, at that day, in the
estimation of Nelson's fleet, in particular; but from a
privateersman
,
he expected a greedy acquiescence, in a plan that
offered life as a reward, in exchange for a treachery like
that he proposed. At first he felt disposed to taunt Raoul
with the contradiction between what he, Cuffe, conceived to
be his general pursuits, and his present assumption of
principles
;
but, the unpretending calmness of the other's manner,
and the truth of his feelings, prevented it. Then, to do
Cuffe, himself, justice, he was too generous to abuse the
power he had over his prisoner.
You may do well to think of this, Monsieur Yvard
observed the captain, after a pause of quite a minute. The
interest at stake is so heavy, that reflection may yet induce
you to change your mind.
Monsieur Cuffe, I pardon you, if you can pardon
yourself
,
answered Raoul, with severe dignity in his manner,
rising as he spoke, as if disdaining civilities which came
from his tempter. I know what you think of us corsairs
but an officer in an honourable service, should hesitate long,
before he tempts a man to do an act like this. The fact that
the life of your prisoner is at stake, ought to make a brave
seaman still more delicate how he tries to work on his
terrors
or his principles. But, I repeat, I forgive you, Monsieur,
if you can forgive yourself.
Cuffe stood confounded. The blood rushed to his heart;
after which, it appeared as if about to gush through the pores
of his face. A feeling of fierce resentment almost consumed
him; then he became himself again, and began to see things,
as was his wont, in cooler moments. Still he could not
speak, pacing the cabin to recover his self-command.
Monsieur Yvard, he at length said, I ask your
forgiveness
,
sincerely, and from the bottom of my heart. I
did not know you, or such a proposal would never have
insulted you, or disgraced a British officer, in my person.
Nelson, too, is the last man living, to wound the feelings of
an honourable enemy; but we did not know you. All
privateersmen
are not of your way of thinking, and it was
there
we fell into our mistake.
Touchez-la
, said Raoul, frankly extending his hand.
Monsieur le Capitaine, you and I ought to meet in two
fine frigates, each for his country's honour; let what would
be the result, it would lay the foundations of an eternal
friendship. I have lived long enough in
votre Angleterre
,
to understand how little you know
notre France; mais
n'importe
. Brave men can understand one another, all over
the world; for the little time which is left me, we shall be
friends.
Cuffe seized Raoul's hand, and even a tear escaped him,
as he squeezed it warmly.
This has been a dd miserable business, Griffin, said
the captain, as soon as he could speak without betraying
weakness, and one no man will ever find me employed in
again, though a fleet as large as that up in the Bay yonder
were the price.
I never thought it would succeed, sir; and, to say the
truth, I never hoped it would. You 'll excuse me, Captain
Cuffe, but we English don't give the continentals exactly
the credit they deserve; and particularly the French. I
thought it wouldn't do, from the first.
Cuffe now repeated his apologies; and after a few
expressions
of friendly esteem on both sides, Raoul returned to his
little room, declining the captain's offer to occupy one of the
cabin state-rooms. Griffin was soon back again, and then
the conversation was resumed between the two officers.
This is altogether a most painful business, Griffin,
observed Cuffe. There is no doubt that Monsieur Yvard
is technically a spy, and guilty, according to the forms of
law; but I entertain not the smallest doubt of the truth of
his whole story. This Ghita Caraccioli, as the girl calls
herself, is the very picture of truth; and was actually in
Nelson's cabin the day before yesterday, under
circumstances
that leave no doubt of the simplicity and truth of
her character, while every part of the tale corresponds with
the other. Even the veechy, and this pursy old podest,
confirm the account; for they have seen Ghita in Porto
Ferrajo, and begin to think the Frenchman came in there
solely on her account.
I make no doubt, Captain Cuffe, that Lord Nelson will
give a respite, or even a pardon, were the facts fairly laid
before him, observed Griffin, who felt a generous interest
in preserving the life of Raoul, the very man he had
endeavoured
to destroy by fire only a few weeks before; but such
is the waywardness of man, and such are the mixed feelings
generated by war.
This is the most serious part of the affair, Griffin.
The sentence is approved; with an order that it shall be
carried into effect this very day, between the hours of
sunrise
and sunset; while here it is already noon, and we are
to the southward of Campanella, and so distant from the
flag-ship, as to put signals out of the question.
Griffin started; all the grave difficulties of the case
glancing
upon his mind in a moment. An order, according to
the habits of the service, and more especially an order of
this serious character, was not to be questioned; yet here
was a dilemma in which there appeared no means of
relief.
Good God, Captain Cuffe, how unlucky! Cannot an
express be sent across by land, so as yet to reach the
flag-ship
in time?
I have thought of that, Griffin, and Clinch has gone
precisely on that errand.
Clinch!Pardon me, sir; but such a duty requires a
very active and
sober
officer!
Clinch is active enough, and I
know
his besetting
weakness
will have no power over him to-day. I have opened
the way for a commission to him, and no one in the ship
can go to Naples in a boat sooner than Clinch, if he really
try. He will make the most of the afternoon's breeze,
should there be any, and I have arranged a signal with him,
by which he may let us know the result even at the distance
of eight or ten miles.
Has Lord Nelson left no discretion in the orders, sir?
None; unless Raoul Yvard distinctly consent to give
up the lugger. In that case, I have a letter, which
authorizes
me to delay the execution, until I can communicate
directly with the commander-in-chief.
How very unlucky it has been, all round! Is there no
possibility, sir, of making up a case that might render this
discretion available?
That might do among you irresponsibles, Mr. Griffin,
answered Cuffe, a little sharply; but I would rather hang
forty Frenchmen than be Brontd by Nelson, for neglect of
duty.
Vol. II.  8
Cuffe spoke more strongly than he intended, perhaps; but,
the commander of a ship-of-war does not always stop to weigh
his words, when he condescends to discuss a point with an
inferior. The reply put a check upon Griffin's zeal,
however
,
though the discourse did not the less proceed.
Well, sir, the lieutenant answered, I'm sure we are
all as anxious as you can be, to avert this affair from our
ship. 'T was but the other day, we were boasting in the
gun-room, to some of the Lapwing's officers that were on a
visit here, that the Proserpine never had an execution or a
court-martial flogging on board her, though she had now
been under the British ensign near four years, and had been
seven times under fire!
God send, Griffin, that Clinch find the admiral, and get
back in time!
How would it do, sir, to send the vice-governatore to
try the prisoner; perhaps
he
might persuade him to
seem
to
consentor, some such thing, you know, sir, as might justify
a delay. They say the Corsicans are the keenest-witted
fellows in all these seas; and Elba is so near to Corsica,
that one cannot fancy there is much difference between their
people.
Ay, your veechy is a regular witch!He made out so
well in his first interview with Yvard, that no one can doubt
his ability to overlay him, in another!
One never knows, Captain Cuffe. The Italian has
more resources than most men; and the Signor Barrofaldi
is a discreet, sensible man, when he acts with his eyes open.
Le Feu-Follet has cheated others besides the
vice-governatore
,
and the podest!
Ay, these dd Jack-o'-Lanterns are never to be
trusted. It would hardly surprise me to see the Folly
coming
down, wing-and-wing, from under the land, and passing
out to sea, with a six-knot breeze, while we lay as still as a
cathedral, with not air enough to turn the smoke of the
galley-fire
from the perpendicular.
She's not inside of us, Captain Cuffe; of that we may
be certain. I have been on the main-top-gallant-yard, with
the best glass in the ship, and have swept the whole coast,
from the ruins over against us, here to the eastward, up to
the town of Salerno; there is nothing to be seen, as large
as a sparanara.
One would think, too, this Monsieur Yvard might give
up, to save his own life, after all!
We
should hardly do it, I hope, Captain Cuffe?
I believe you are right, Griffin; one feels forced to
respect the privateersman, in spite of his trade. Who knows
but something might be got out of that Bolt? He must
know as much about the lugger as Yvard himself.
Quite true, sir; I was thinking of proposing something
of the sort, not a minute since. Now, that 's a fellow one
may take pleasure in riding down, as one would ride down
the main tack. Shall I have him sent for, Captain Cuffe?
The captain hesitated; for the previous experiments on
Ithuel's selfishness had failed. Still, the preservation of
Raoul's life, and the capture of the lugger, were now objects
of nearly equal interest with Cuffe, and he felt disposed to
neglect no plausible means of effecting either. A sign of
approbation was all the lieutenant needed; and, in a few
minutes, Ithuel stood, again, in the presence of his captain.
Here is an opportunity for you to fetch up a good deal
of lee-way, Master Bolt, commenced the captain; and I
am willing to give you a chance to help yourself. You
know where you last left the Few-Folly, I suppose?
I don't know but I might, sir, answered Ithuel, rolling
his eyes around him, curious to ascertain what the other
would be at. I don't know but I might remember, on a
pinch, sir; though, to own the truth, my memory is none
of the most desperate best.
Well, then, where was it? Recollect that the life of
your late friend, Raoul Yvard, may depend on your
answer.
I want to know!Well, this Europe
is
a curious part
of the world, as all must admit, that come from Ameriky.
What has Captain Rule done now, sir, that he stands in such
jeopardy?
You know that he is convicted as a spy; and my orders
are to have him executed, unless we can get his lugger.
Then
, indeed, we may possibly show him a little favour;
as we do not make war so much on individuals, as on
nations.
Cuffe would probably have been puzzled to explain the
application of his own sentiment to the case before him; but,
presuming on his having to deal with one who was neither
very philosophical nor logical himself, he was somewhat
indifferent to his own mode of proceeding, so that it effected
the object. Ithuel, however, was not understood. Love for
Raoul, or the lugger, or, indeed, for anything else, himself
excepted, formed no part of his character; while hatred of
England had got to be incorporated with the whole of his
moral system; if such a man could be said to have a moral
system at all. He saw nothing to be gained by serving
Raoul, in particular; though this he might have done did
nothing interfere to prevent it; while he had so strong an
aversion to suffering the English to get le Feu-Follet, as to
be willing even to risk his own life, in order to prevent it.
His care, therefore, was to accomplish his purpose, with the
least hazard to himself.
And, if the lugger can be had, sir, you intend to let
Captain Rule go? he asked, with an air of interest.
Ay, we
may
do that; though it will depend on the
admiral. Can you tell us where you left her, and where
she probably now is?
Captain Rule has said the first, already, sir. He told
the truth, about that, before the court. But, as to telling
where the lugger is now, I 'll defy any man to do it! Why,
sir, I 've turned in, at eight bells, and left her, say ten or
fifteen leagues dead to leeward of an island, or a light-house,
perhaps; and on turning out at eight bells, in the morning,
found her, just as far to windward of the same object.
She 's as oncalculating craft as I ever put foot aboard of.
Indeed! said Cuffe, ironically; I do not wonder that
her captain's in a scrape.
Scrape, sir!The Folly is nothing
but
a scrape. I 've
tried my hand at keeping her reck'nin'.
You!
Yes, sir, I; Ithuel Bolt, that 's my name, at hum' or
abroad, and I've tried to keep the Folly's reck'nin', with all
the advantage of thermometer, and lead-lines, and
logarithms
,
and such necessaries, you know, Captain Cuffe;
and
I
never yet could place her within a hundred miles of
the spot where she was actually seen to be.
I am not at all surprised to hear this, Bolt; but what I
want at present, is to know what you think may be the
precise
position of the lugger, without the aid of the
thermometer
,
and of logarithms; I've a notion you would make out
better, by letting such things alone?
Well, who knows but I might, sir! My idee of the
Folly, just now, sir, is that she is somewhere off Capri,
under short canvass, waiting for Captain Rule and I to join
her, and keeping a sharp look-out after the inimies' cruisers.
Now, this was not only precisely the position of the lugger
at that very moment, but it was what Ithuel actually
believed
to be her position. Still, nothing was farther from
this man's intention than to betray his former messmates.
He was so very cunning, as to have detected how little
Cuffe was disposed to believe him; and he told the truth, as
the most certain means of averting mischief from the lugger.
Nor did his
ruse
fail of its object. His whole manner had
so much deceit and low cunning about it, that neither Cuffe
nor Griffin believed a word he said; and after a little more
pumping, the fellow was dismissed in disgust, with a sharp
intimation that it would be singularly for his interest to look
out how he discharged his general duties in the ship.
This will never do, Griffin, exclaimed the captain, vexed
and disappointed. Should anything occur to Clinch, or
should the admiral happen to be off, with the king, on one
of his shooting excursions, we shall be in a most serious
dilemma. Would to God, we had not left the anchorage, at
Capri!
Then
, one might communicate with the flag, with
some certainty. I shall never forgive myself, if anything
fatal actually take place!
When one does all for the best, Captain Cuffe, his mind
ought to be at ease, and you could not possibly foresee
what has happened. Might notone wouldn't like either
butnecessity is a hard master
Out with it, Griffinanything is better than suspense.
Well, sir, I was just thinking that possibly this young
Italian girl might know something about the lugger, and, as
she clearly loves the Frenchman, we should get a strong
purchase on her tongue, by means of her heart.
Cuffe looked intently at his lieutenant, for half a minute;
then he shook his head in disapprobation.
8 *
No, Griffin, no, he said, to this I never can consent.
As for this quibbling, equivocating Yankee, if Yankee he
be, one wouldn't feel many scruples of delicacy; but to
probe the affections of a poor, innocent girl, in this way,
would be going too far. The heart of a young girl should
be sacred, under every circumstance.
Griffin coloured, and he bit his lip. No one likes to be
outdone, in the appearance of generosity, at least; and he
felt vexed that he should have ventured on a proposition
that his superior treated as unbecoming.
Nevertheless, sir, she might think the lugger cheaply
sold, he said, with emphasis, provided her lover's life
was what she got in exchange. It would be a very
different
thing were we to ask her to sell her admirer, instead
of a mere privateer.
No matter, Griffin. We will not meddle with the
private feelings of a young female, that chance has thrown
into our hands. As soon as we get near enough in with
the land, I intend to let the old man take his boat, and carry
his niece ashore. That will be getting rid of
them
, at least,
honourably and fairly. God knows what is to become of the
Frenchman.
This terminated the conference. Griffin went on deck,
where duty now called him; and Cuffe sat down to
re-peruse
,
for the ninth or tenth time, the instructions of the
admiral.
CHAPTER VII.
I have no dread,
And feel the curse to have no natural fear,
Nor fluttering throb, that beats with hopes or wishes,
Or lurking love of something on the earth.
Manfred
.
By
this time, the day had materially advanced, and there
were grave grounds for the uneasiness which Cuffe began so
seriously to feel. All three of the ships were still in the Bay
of Salerno, gathering in towards its northern shore, however.
The Proserpine, the deepest embayed, the Terpsichore, and
the Ringdove, having hauled out towards Campanella, as soon
as satisfied nothing was to be seen in-shore of them. The
heights, which line the coast, from the immediate vicinity of
the town of Salerno, to the head-land that ends near Capri,
have long been celebrated, not only for their beauty and
grandeur, but in connection with the lore of the middle ages.
As the Proserpine had never been in this bay before, or never
so near its head, her officers found some temporary relief
from the very general uneasiness that was felt on account
of their prisoner, in viewing scenery that is remarkable even
in that remarkable section of the globe. The ship had gone
up abreast of Amalfi, and so close in, as to be less than a
mile from the shore. The object was to communicate with
some fishermen, which had been done; the information
received
going to establish the fact, that no craft resembling
the lugger had been in that part of the Bay. The vessel's
head was now laid to the southward and westward, in
waiting
for the zephyr, which might soon be expected. The
gallant
frigate, seen from the impending rocks, looked like a
light merchantman, in all but her symmetry and warlike
guise; nature being moulded on so grand a scale all along
that coast, as to render objects of human art, unusually
diminutive
to the eye. On the other hand, the country-houses,
churches, hermitages, convents, and villages, clustered all
along the mountain sides, presented equally delusive forms,
though they gave an affluence to the views, that left the
spectator in a strange doubt, which most to admire, their
wildness, or their picturesque beauty. The little air that
remained, was still at the southward, and as the ship moved
slowly along this scene of singular attraction, each ravine
seemed to give up a town, each shelf of rock, a human
habitation
,
and each natural terrace, a villa and a garden.
Of all men, sailors get to be the most
blazs
in the way of
the sensations produced by novelties, and fine scenery. It
appears
to be a part of their calling, to suppress the emotions of
a greenhorn; and, generally, they look upon anything that is
a little out of the ordinary track, with the coolness of those
who feel it is an admission of inferiority to betray surprise.
It seldom happens with them, that anything occurs, or
anything
is seen to which the last cruise, or, if the vessel be
engaged
in trade, the last voyage, did not at least furnish a
parallel; usually the past event, or the more distant
object
,
has the advantage. He who has a sufficient store of
this reserved knowledge and experience, it will at once be
seen, enjoys a great superiority over him who has not, and
is placed above the necessity of avowing a sensation as
humiliating
as wonder. On the present occasion, however,
but few held out against the novelty of the actual situation
of the ship; most on board being willing enough to allow
that they had never before been beneath cliffs that had such
a union of the magnificent, the picturesque, and the soft;
though a few continued firm, acting up to the old characters,
with the consistency of settled obstinacy.
Strand, the boatswain, was one of those who, on all such
occasions, died hard. He was the last man in the ship
who ever gave up a prejudice; and this for three several
reasons: he was a cockney, and believed himself born in
the centre of human knowledge; he was a seaman, and
understood
the world; he was a boatswain, and stood upon his
dignity.
As the Proserpine fanned slowly along the land, this
personage
took a position between the knight-heads, on the
bowsprit, where he could overlook the scene, and at the
same time hear the dialogue of the forecastle; and both with
suitable decorum. Strand was as much of a monarch
forward
,
as Cuffe was aft; though the appearance of a
lieutenant
,
or of the master, now and then, a little dimmed the
lustre of his reign. Still, Strand succumbed completely to
only two of the officersthe captain and the first-lieutenant;
and not always to these, in what he conceived to be purely
matters of sentiment. In the way of duty, he understood
himself too well, ever to hesitate about obeying an order;
but when it came to opinions, he was a man who could
maintain his own, even in the presence of Nelson.
The first captain of the forecastle, was an old seaman of
the name of Catfall. At the precise moment when Strand
occupied the position named, between the knight-heads, this
personage was holding a discourse with three or four of the
forecastle-men, who stood on the heel of the bowsprit,
inboard  the etiquette of the ship not permitting these
worthies
to show their heads above the nettings. Each of the
party had his arms folded; each chewed tobacco; each had
his hair in a queue; and each occasionally hitched up his
trousers, in a way to prove that he did not require the aid
of suspenders in keeping his nether garments in their proper
place. It may be mentioned, indeed, that the point of
division
between the jacket and the trousers, was marked in
each by a bellying line of a clean white shirt, that served to
relieve the blue of the dress, as a species of marine facing.
As was due to his greater experience and his rank, Catfall
was the principal speaker among those who lined the heel
of the bowsprit.
This here coast is moun
tain
ious, as one may own,
observed the captain of the forecastle; but what I say is,
that it 's not
as
moun
tain
ious as some I 've seen. Now,
when I went round the 'arth with Captain Cook, we fell in
with islands that were so topped off with rocks, and the like
o' that, that these here affairs, alongside on 'em, wouldn't
pass for anything more than a sort of jury mountains.
There you 're right, Catfall, said Strand, in a
patronizing
way; as anybody knows as has been round the Horn.
I didn't sail with Captain Cook, seeing that I was then the
boatswain of the Hussar, and she couldn't have made one
of Cook's squadron, being a post-ship, and commanded by
a full-built captain; but I
was
in them seas when a younker,
and can back Catfall's account of the matter by my largest
anchor, in the way of history. De, if I think these
hillocks
would be called even jury mountains, in that quarter
of the world. They tell me there's several noblemen's and
gentlemen's parks near Lunnun, where they make
mountains
just to look at; that must be much of a muchness with
these here chaps. I never drift far from Wappin', when
I'm at home, and so I can't say I 've seen these artifice
hills, as they calls them, myself; but there's one Joseph
Shirk, that lives near St. Katharine's Lane, that makes
trips regularly into the neighbourhood, who gives quite a
particular account of the matter.
I dare to say it's all true, Mr. Strand, answered the
captain of the forecastle, for I 've know'd some of them
travelling chaps who have seen stranger sights than that.
No, sir, I calls these mountains no great matter; and as to
the houses and villages on 'em, where you see one, here,
you might say you could see two on some of the desert
islands
A very marvellous account of Cook's Discoveries was
suddenly checked by the appearance of Cuffe on the
forecastle
.
It was not often the captain visited that part of the
ship; but he was considered a privileged person, let him go
where he would. At his appearance, all the old salts
quitted the heel of the spar, tarpaulins came fairly down to
a level with the bag-reefs of the shirts, and even Strand
stepped into the nettings, leaving the place between the
knight-heads clear. To this spot Cuffe ascended with a
light, steady step, for he was but six-and-twenty, just
touching
his hat, in return to the boatswain's bow.
A boatswain, on board an English ship-of-war, is a more
important personage than he is apt to be on board an
American
.
Neither the captain nor the first-lieutenant disdains
conversing with him, on occasions; and he is sometimes
seen promenading the starboard side of the quarter-deck, in
deep discourse with one or the other of those high
functionaries
.
It has been said that Cuffe and Strand were old
shipmates
,
the latter having actually been boatswain of the ship
in which the former first sailed. This circumstance was
constantly borne in mind by both parties, the captain seldom
coming near his inferior, in moments of relaxation, without
having something to say to him.
Rather a remarkable coast, this, Strand, he commenced,
on the present occasion, as soon as fairly placed between
the knight-heads; something one might look for a week, in
England, without finding it.
I beg your pardon, sir, but I'm not of the same way of
thinking. I was just telling the forecastle lads, down there,
that there's many a nobleman and gentleman, at home, as
has finer hills than these, made by hand, in his parks and
gardens, just to look at.
The dl you have!And what did the forecastle
lads, down there, say to that?
What could they, sir? It just showed the superiority
of an Englishman to an Italian; and that ended the matter.
Don't you remember the Injees, sir?
The Indies!  Why the coast between Bombay and
Calcutta is as flat as a pancake, most of the distance.
Not them Injees, sir, but t' other  the West, I mean.
The islands and mountains we passed and went into in the
Rattler; your honour was only a young gentleman, then,
but was too much aloft to miss the sight of anythingand
all along America, too.
As Strand was speaking, he glanced complacently round,
as if to intimate to the listeners what an old friend of the
captain's they enjoyed in the person of their boatswain.
Oh! the West-Indiesyou 're nearer right there, Strand;
and yet they have nothing to compare to this. Why, here
are mountains, alive with habitations, that fairly come up to
the sea!
Well, sir, as to habitations, what's these to a street in
Lunnun? Begin on the starboard hand, for instance, as
you walk down Cheapside, and count as you go; my life
for it, you 'll reel off more houses, in half an hour's walk,
than are to be found in all that there village yonder.
Then you 'll remember, sir, that the starboard hand only has
half, every Jack having his Jenny. I look upon Lunnun as
the finest sight in nature, Captain Cuffe, after all I have
seen in many cruises!
I don't know, Mr. Strand.In the way of coast, one
may very well be satisfied with this. Yonder town, now,
is called Amalfi; it was once a place of great commerce,
they say.
Of commerce, sir!why it's nothing but a bit of a
village
,
or at most, of a borough, built in a hollow.No haven,
no docks, no comfortable place, even, for setting up the
frame of a ship on the beach. The commerce of such a
town must have been mainly carried on by means of mules
and jackasses, as one reads of in the trade of the Bible.
Carried on as it might be, trade it once had.There
does not seem to be any hiding-place, along this shore, for
a lugger like the Folly, after all, Strand.
The boatswain smiled, with a knowing look, while, at the
same time, the expression of his countenance was like that
of a man who did not choose to let others into all his
secrets.
The Folly is a craft we are not likely to see, again,
Captain Cuffe, he then answered, if it were only out of
respect to his superior.
Why so?The Proserpine generally takes a good look
at everything she chases.
Ay, ay, sir; that may be true, as a rule, but I never
knew a craft found, after a third look for her. Everything
seems to go by thirds, in this world, sir; and I always look
upon a third chase as final. Now, sir, there are three
classes of admirals, and three sets of flags; a ship has three
masts; the biggest ships are three deckers; then there are
three planets
The dl there are!How do you make
that
out,
Strand?
Why, sir, there's the sun, moon and stars; that makes
just three, by my count.
Ay, but what do you say to Jupiter, Saturn, Venus, and
all the rest of them, the earth included?
Why, sir, they 're all the rest of the stars, and not
planets, at all. Then, sir, look around you, and you 'll find
everything going by threes. There are three topsails, three
jibs, and three top-gallant-sails
And two courses, said the captain, gravely, to whom
this theory of the threes was new.
Quite true, sir, in name, but your honour will recollect
the spanker is nothing but a fore-and-aft course, rigged to a
mast, instead of to a jack-yard, as it used to be.
There are neither three captains nor three boatswains,
to a ship, Master Strand.
Certainly not, sir; that would be oppressive, and they
would stand in each other's way; still, Captain Cuffe, the
thirds hold out wonderfully, even in all these little matters.
There's the three lieutenants; and there's the boatswain,
gunner and carpenterand
Sail-maker, armourer, and captain of the mast,
interrupted
Cuffe, laughing.
Well, sir, you may make anything seem doubtful, by
bringing forward a plenty of reasons; but all my experience
says, a third chase never comes to anything, unless it turns
out successful; but that
after
a third chase, all may as well
be given up.
I fancy, Lord Nelson holds a different doctrine, Strand.
He tells us to follow a Frenchman round the earth, rather
than let him escape.
No doubt, sir. Follow him round three earths, if you
can keep him in sight; but not round
four
. That is all I
contend for, Captain Cuffe. Even women, they tell me,
take what is called their thirds, in a fellow's forti'n.
Well, well, Strand, I suppose there must be some truth
in your doctrine, or you wouldn't hold out for it so
strenuously
;
and, as for this coast, I must give it up, too, for I
never expect to see another like it; much less a third.
It 's my duty to give up to your honour; but I ask
permission
to think a third chase should always be the last
one. That 's a melancholy sight to a man of feelin',
Captain
Cuffe, the object between the two midship-guns, on the
starboard, side of the main-deck, sir?
You mean the prisoner?I wish, with all my heart, he
was not there, Strand. I think I would rather he were in
his lugger again, to run the chances of that fourth chase of
which you seem to think so lightly.
Your hanging ships are not often lucky ships, Captain
Cuffe. In my judgment, asking your pardon, sir, there
ought to be a floating gaol in every fleet, where all the courts
and all the executions should be held.
It would be robbing the boatswains of no small part of
their duty, were the punishments to be sent out of the
different
vessels, answered Cuffe, smiling.
Ay, ay, sirthe punishments, I grant, your honour;
but hanging is an
execution
, and not a punishment. God
forbid that, at my time of life, I should be ordered to sail in
a ship that has no punishment on board; but I'm really
getting
to be too old to look at executions with any sort of
pleasure. Duty that isn't done with pleasure, is but poor
duty, at the best, sir.
There are many disagreeable, and some painful duties
to be performed, Strand; this of executing a man, let the
offence be what it may, is among the most painful.
For my part, Captain Cuffe, I do not mind hanging a
mutineer so very much, for he is a being that the world
ought not to harbour; but it is a different thing with an
enemy, and a spy. It's our duty to spy as much as we
Vol. II.  9
can for our king and country, and one ought never to bear
too hard on such as does their duty. With a fellow that
can't obey orders, and who puts his own will above the
pleasure of his superiors, I have no patience; but I do not
so much understand why the gentlemen of the courts are so
hard on such as do a little more reconn'itrin' than
common
.
That is because ships are less exposed to the attempts
of spies than armies, Strand. A soldier hates a spy, as
much as you do a mutineer. The reason is, that he may
be surprised by an enemy through his means, and butchered
in his sleep. Nothing is so unpleasant to a soldier as a
surprise; and the law against spies, though a general law of
war, originated with soldiers, rather than with us sailors, I
should think.
Yes, sir,  I dare say your honour is right. He's a
rum 'un a soldier, at the best; and this opinion proves it.
Now, sir, Captain Cuffe, just suppose a Frenchman of about
our own metal, took it into his head to surprise the
Proserpine
,
some dark night: what would come of it, after all?
There's the guns, and it's only to turn the hands up, to set
'em at work, just the same as if there wasn't a spy in the
world. And should they prefer to come on board us, and
to try their luck at close quarters, I rather think, sir, the
surprise would meet 'em face to face. Nonosir; spies
is nothing to us, though it might teach 'em manners to
keelhaul
one, once-and-a-while.
Cuffe now became thoughtful and silent, and even Strand
did not presume to speak, when the Captain was in this
humour. The latter descended to the forecastle, and walked
aft, his hands behind his back, and his head inclining
downward. Every one he met made way for him, as a
matter of course; in that mood, he moved among the throng
of a ship of war, as a man tabooed. Even Winchester
respected
his commander's abstraction, although he had a
serious request to make, which it is time to explain.
Andrea Barrofaldi and Vito Viti remained on board the
frigate, inmates of the cabin, and gradually becoming more
accustomed to their novel situation. They did not escape
the jokes of a man-of-war, but, on the whole, they were well
treated, and were tolerably satisfied; more especially as the
hope of capturing le Feu-Follet began to revive. As a
matter
of course, they were apprised of the condition of Raoul,
and, both kind and benevolent men in the main, they were
desirous of conversing with the prisoner, and of proving to
him that they bore no malice. Winchester was spoken to
on the subject, but before he granted the permission, he
thought it safest to consult the Captain in the matter. At
length an opportunity offered, Cuffe suddenly rousing
himself
,
and giving an order in relation to the canvass the ship
was under.
Here are the two Italian gentlemen, Captain Cuffe,
observed Winchester, desirous of speaking to the prisoner.
I did not think it right, sir, to let him have communication
with any one, without first ascertaining your pleasure.
Poor fellow!His time is getting very short, unless we
hear from Clinch; and there can be no harm in granting
him every indulgence. I have been thinking of this matter,
and do not possibly see how I can escape ordering the
execution, unless it be countermanded from Nelson
himself
.
Certainly not, sir. But Mr. Clinch is an active and
experienced seaman, when he is in earnest; we may still
hope something from him. What is to be done with the
Italians, sir?
Let them, or any one else that poor Yvard is willing to
see, go below.
Do you mean to include old Giuntotardi and his niece,
Captain Cuffe?  and this deserter of our own, Bolt,  he,
too, has had something to say of a wish to take leave of his
late shipmate?
We might be justified in denying the request of the
last, Mr. Winchester, but hardly of the others. Still, if Raoul
Yvard wishes to see even him, his desire may as well be
granted.
Thus authorized, Winchester no longer hesitated about
granting the several permissions. An order was sent to
the sentinel, through the corporal of the guard, to allow any
one to enter the prisoner's room, whom the latter might wish
to receive. A ship was not like a prison on shore, escape
being next to impossible, more especially from a vessel at
sea. The parties accordingly received intimation that they
might visit the condemned man, should the latter be disposed
to receive them.
By this time, something like a general gloom had settled
on the ship. The actual state of things was known to all
on board, and few believed it possible that Clinch could reach
the Foudroyant, receive his orders, and be back in time to
prevent the execution. It wanted now but three hours of
sunset, and the minutes appeared to fly, instead of dragging.
The human mind is so constituted, that uncertainty increases
most of its sensations;the apprehension of death even,
very usually exciting a livelier emotion than its positive
approach. Thus it was with the officers and people of the
Proserpine: had there been no hope of escaping the
execution
,
they would have made up their minds to submit to the
evil, as unavoidable; but the slight chance which did
actually
exist, created a feverish excitement that soon extended
to all hands; and this as completely as if a chase were in
sight, and each individual was bent on overtaking her. As
minute after minute flew by, the feeling increased, until it
would not much exceed the bounds of truth to say, that,
under none of the vicissitudes of war, did there ever exist so
feverish an hour, on board his Britannic Majesty's ship, the
Proserpine, as the very period of which we are now writing.
Eyes were constantly turned towards the sun, and several
of the young gentlemen collected on the forecastle, with no
other view than to be as near as possible to the head-land,
around which the boat of Clinch was expected to make her
re-appearance, as behind it she had last been seen.
The zephyr had come at the usual hour, but it was light,
and the ship was so close to the mountains, as to feel very
little of its force. It was different with the two other
vessels. Lyon had gone about in time, to get clear of the
highest mountains, and his lofty sails took enough of the
breeze, to carry him out to sea, three or four hours before;
while the Terpsichore, under Sir Frederick Dashwood, had
never got near enough in with the land, to be becalmed at
all. Her head had been laid to the south-west, at the first
appearance of the afternoon wind; and that frigate was now
hull-down to sea-wardactually making a free wind of it,
as she shaped her course up between Ischia and Capri. As
for the Proserpine, when the bell struck three, in the first
dog-watch, she was just abeam of the celebrated little islets
of the Sirens, the western breeze now beginning to die
away, though, getting more of it, the ship was drawing
ahead, faster than she had been since the turn of the day.
Three bells, in the first dog-watch, indicate the hour of
half-past five. At that season of the year, the sun sets a
few minutes past six. Of course, there remained but little
more than half-an-hour, in which to execute the sentence of
the law. Cuffe had never quitted the deck, and he actually
started, when he heard the first sound of the clapper.
Winchester
turned towards him, with an inquiring look;
for every thing had been previously arranged between
them; he received merely a significant gesture in return.
This, however, was sufficient. Certain orders were privately
issued. Then there appeared a stir among the
fore-top-men
,
and on the forecastle, where a rope was rove at the
fore-yard-arm, and a grating was rigged for a platform
unerring signs of the approaching execution.
Accustomed as these hardy mariners were to brave
dangers
of all sorts, and to witness human suffering of nearly
every degree, a feeling of singular humanity had come over
the whole crew. Raoul was their enemy, it is true, and he
had been sincerely detested by all hands, eight-and-forty
hours before; but circumstances had entirely changed the
ancient animosity into a more generous and manly
sentiment
.
In the first place, a successful and a triumphant
enemy was an object very different from a man in their
own power, and who lay entirely at their mercy. Then,
the personal appearance of the young privateersman was
unusually attractive, and altogether different from what it
had been previously represented, and that, too, by an active
rivalry, that was not altogether free from bitterness. But
chiefly, was the generous sentiment awakened by the
conviction
that the master-passion, and none of the usual
inducements
of a spy, had brought their enemy into this
strait; and though clearly guilty, in a technical point of
view, that he was influenced by no pitiful wages, even
allowing
that he blended with the pursuit of his love, some of
the motives of his ordinary warfare. All these
considerations
,
coupled with the reluctance that seamen ever feel to
having an execution in their ship, had entirely turned the
9*
tables; and there, where Raoul would have found so lately,
between two and three hundred active and formidable
enemies
,
he might almost be said now to have as many
sympathizing
friends.
No wonder, then, that the preparations of the
fore-top-men
were regarded with unfavourable eyes. The unseen
hand of authority, nevertheless, held all in restraint. Cuffe
himself did not dare to hesitate any longer. The necessary
orders were given, though with deep reluctance, and then
the captain went below, as if to hide himself from human
eyes.
The ten minutes that succeeded were minutes of intense
concern. All hands were called, the preparations had been
completed, and Winchester waited only for the
re-appearance
of Cuffe, to issue the order to have the prisoner placed
on the grating. A midshipman was sent into the cabin,
after which, the commanding officer came slowly, and with
a lingering step, upon the quarter-deck. The crew was
assembled on the forecastle and in the waists; the marine
guard was under arms; the officers clustered around the
capstan; and a solemn, uneasy expectation, pervaded the
whole ship. The lightest foot-fall was audible. Andrea
and his friend stood apart, near the taffrail, but no one saw
Carlo Giuntotardi, or his niece.
There is yet some five-and-twenty minutes of sun, I
should think, Mr. Winchester, observed Cuffe, feverishly
glancing his eye at the western margin of the sea, towards
which the orb of day was slowly settling, gilding all that
side of the vault of heaven with the mellow lustre of the
hour and the latitude.
Not more than twenty, I fear, sir, was the reluctant
answer.
I should think five might suffice, at the worst; especially,
if the men made a swift run. This was said in a half
whisper, and thick, husky, tones, the Captain looking
anxiously at the lieutenant the while.
Winchester shrugged his shoulders, and turned away
unwilling to reply.
Cuffe now had a short consultation with the surgeon, the
object of which was to ascertain the minimum of time a man
might live, suspended by the neck at the yard-arm of a
frigate. The result was not favourable; for a sing followed
to bring forth the prisoner.
Raoul came on deck, in charge of the master-at-arms,
and the officer who had acted as prevost-martial. He was
clad in his clean white lazzarone garb, wearing the red
Phrygian cap already mentioned. Though his face was
pale, no man could detect any tremor in the well-turned
muscles that his loose attire exposed to view. He raised his
cap courteously to the group of officers, and threw an
understanding
glance forward, at the fearful arrangement on
the fore-yard. That he was shocked, when the grating and
the rope met his eye, is unquestionable; but, rallying in an
instant, he smiled, bowed to Cuffe, and moved towards the
scene of his contemplated execution, firmly, but without the
smallest signs of bravado in his manner.
A death-like stillness prevailed, while the subordinates
adjusted the rope, and placed the condemned man on the
grating. Then the slack of the rope was drawn in, by
hand, and the men were ordered to lay hold of the
instrument
of death, and to stretch it along the deck.
Stand by, my lads, to make a swift run, and a strong
jerk, at your first pull, said Winchester in a low voice, as
he passed down the line. Rapidity is mercy, at such a
moment.
Good God! muttered Cuffe, can the man die in this
manner, without a prayer; without even a glance towards
heaven, as if asking for mercy?
He is an unbeliever, I hear, sir, returned Griffin. We
have offered him all the religious consolation we could; but
he seems to wish for none.
Hail the top-gallant yards once more, Mr. Winchester,
said Cuffe, huskily.
Fore-top-gallant yard, there!
Sir?
Any signs of the boatlook well into the bay of Naples
we are opening Campanella now sufficiently to give you
a good look up towards the head.
A pause of a minute succeeded. Then the look-out aloft
shook his head in the negative, as if unwilling to speak.
Winchester glanced at Cuffe, who turned anxiously, mounted
a gun, and strained his eyes in a gaze to the northward.
All ready, sir, said the first-lieutenant, when another
minute elapsed.
Cuffe was in the act of raising his hand, which would
have been the signal of death, when the dull, heavy report
of a distant gun, came booming down from the direction of
the town of Naples.
Stand fast! shouted Cuffe, fearful the men might get
the start of him. Make your mates take their calls from
their mouths, sir. Two more guns, Winchester, and I am
the happiest man in Nelson's fleet!
A second gun
did
come, just as these words were uttered:
then followed a breathless pause of half a minute, when a
third, smothered, but unequivocal report succeeded.
It must be a salute, sir, Griffin uttered, inquiringly.
The interval is too long. Listen! I hope to God, we
have had the last!
Every ear in the ship listened intently, Cuffe holding his
watch in his hand. Two entire minutes passed, and no
fourth gun was heard. As second after second went by,
the expression of the captain's countenance changed, and
then he waved his hand in triumph.
It's as it should be, gentlemen, he said. Take the
prisoner below, Mr. Winchester. Unreeve the rope, and
send that dd granting off the gun. Mr. Strand, pipe
down the people.
Raoul was immediately led below. As he passed through
the after-hatch, all the officers on the quarter-deck bowed to
him; and not a man was there in the ship, who did not feel
the happier for the reprieve.
CHAPTER VIII.
He saw with his own eyes the moon was round,
Was also certain that the earth was square,
Because he 'd journey'd fifty miles, and found
No sign that it was circular anywhere.
Don Juan
.
Raoul Yvard
was indebted to a piece of forethought in
Clinch, for his life. But for the three guns, fired so
opportunely
from the Foudroyant, the execution could not have
been stayed; and but for a prudent care on the part of the
master's-mate, the guns would never have been fired. The
explanation is this: When Cuffe was giving his subordinate
instructions how to proceed, the possibility of detention struck
the latter, and he bethought him of some expedient by which
such an evil might be remedied. At his suggestion, then,
the signal of the guns was mentioned by the captain, in his
letter to the commander-in-chief, and its importance pointed
out. When Clinch reached the fleet, Nelson was at Castel
a Mare, and it became necessary to follow him to that place
by land. Here Clinch found him in the palace of
Qui-Si-Sane
,
in attendance on the court, and delivered his
despatches
.
Nothing gave the British admiral greater
pleasure
,
than to be able to show mercy; the instance to the
contrary already introduced, existing as an exception in his
private character and his public career; and it is possible
that an occurrence so recent, and so opposed to his habits,
may have induced him the more willingly now to submit to
his ordinary impulses, and to grant the respite asked, with
the greater promptitude.
Your captain tells me, here, sir, observed Nelson, after
he had read Cuffe's letter a second time, little doubt exists
that Yvard was in the Bay on a love affair, and that his
purposes were not those of a spy, after all?
Such is the opinion aboard us, my lord, answered the
master's-mate. There are an old man and a very
charming
young woman in his company, whom Captain Cuffe
says were in the cabin of this ship, on a visit to your
lordship
,
only a few days since.
Nelson started, and his face flushed. Then he seized a
pen, and, with the only hand he had, scratched a letter,
directing a reprieve until further orders. This he signed,
and handed to Clinch, saying, as he did so
Get into your boat, sir, and pull back to the frigate as
fast as possible; God forbid that any man suffer
wrongfully
!
I beg your pardon, my lord  but there is not time,
now, for me to reach the ship before the sun set. I have
a signal prepared in the boat, it is true; but the frigate may
not come round Campanella before the last moment, and
then all these pains will be lost. Does not Captain Cuffe
speak of some guns to be fired from the flag-ship, my lord?
He does, sir; and this may be the safest mode of
communicating
,
after all. With this light westerly air, a gun
will be heard a long distance at sea. Take the pen, and
write as I dictate, sir.
Clinch seized the pen, which the admiral, who had lost
his right arm only a few years before, really felt unable to
use, and wrote as follows
SirImmediately on receipt of this, you will fire three
heavy guns, at intervals of half-a-minute, as a signal to the
Proserpine to suspend an execution.
To the Commanding Officer of His Majesty's Ship
Foudroyant.
As soon as the magical words of Nelson and Bronte
were affixed to this order, with a date, Clinch rose to depart.
After he had made his bows, he stood with his hand on the
lock of the door, as if uncertain whether to prefer a request
or not.
This is a matter of moment, sir, and no time is to be
lost, added Nelson. I feel great anxiety about it, and
wish you to desire Captain Cuffe to send you back with a
report of all that has passed, as soon as convenient.
I will report your wishes, my lord, answered Clinch,
brightening up; for he only wanted an opportunity to speak
of his own promotion, and this was now offered in
perspective
.
May I tell the commanding officer of the
flag-ship
to use the lower-deck guns, my lord?
He will do that of his own accord, after reading those
orders  heavy guns, mean the heaviest. Good-afternoon,
sir; for God's sake, lose no time.
Clinch obeyed this injunction to the letter. He reached
the Foudroyant, some time before sunset, and immediately
placed the order in her captain's hands. A few words of
explanation set everything in motion, and the three guns
were fired on the side of the ship towards Capri, most
opportunely for our hero.
The half-hour that succeeded, on board the Proserpine,
was one of gaiety and merriment. Every person was glad
that the ship had escaped an execution; and then, it was
the hour for piping down the hammocks, and for shifting
the dog-watches. Cuffe recovered all his animation, and
conversed cheerfully, having Griffin for an interpreter, with
his two Italian guests. These last had been prevented from
paying their visit to the prisoner, on account of the latter's
wish to be alone; but the intention was now renewed; and
sending below, to ascertain if it would be agreeable, they
proceeded together on their friendly mission. As the two
worthies, who had not altogether got their sea-legs, slowly
descended the ladder, and threaded their way among the
throng of a ship, the discourse did not flag between them.
Cospetto! exclaimed the podest; Signor Andrea,
we live in a world of wonders! A man can hardly say
whether he is actually alive, or not. To think how near
this false Sir Smees was to death, half an hour since; and,
now, doubtless he is as much alive, and as merry as any
of us!
It would be more useful, friend Vito Viti, answered the
philosophical vice-governatore, to remember how near
those who live are always to death, who has only to open
his gates, to cause the strongest and fairest to pass at once
into the tombs.
By San Stefano, but you have a way with you,
vice-governatore
,
that would become a cardinal! It 's a
thousand
pities the church was robbed of such a support; though
I do think, Signor Andrea, if your mind would dwell less on
another state of being, it would be more cheerful; and I
may say more cheering to those with whom you discourse.
There are evils enough, in this life, without thinking so
much of death.
There are philosophers who pretend, good Vito, that
nothing that we see around us actually has an existence.
That we
fancy
everything: fancy that this is a sea called
the Mediterranean; fancy this is a ship  yonder is the
land; fancy that we live; and even fancy death.
Corpo di Bacco! Signor Andrea, exclaimed the other,
stopping short at the foot of the ladder, and seizing his
companion
by a button, afraid he would desert him in the midst
of a strange delusion, you would not trifle in such a matter
with an old friend  one who has known you from
childhood
?
Fancy
that I am alive!
Si
I have told you only the truth. The imagination
is very strong, and may easily give the semblance of reality
to unreal things.
And that I am not a podest in fact, but one only in
fancy!
Just so, friend Vito; and that I am only a
vice-governatore
,
too, in the imagination.
And that Elba is not a real island, or Porto Ferrajo a
real town; and that even all our iron, of which we
seem
to
send so much about the world, in good, wholesome ships, is
only a sort of ghost of solid substantial metal!
Sisi
that everything which appears to be material,
is, in fact, imaginary; iron, gold, or flesh.
And then I am not Vito Viti, but an impostor? What
a rascally philosophy is this! Why, both of us are as bad
as this Sir Smees, if what you say be true, vice-governatore
or make-believe vice-governatore.
Not an impostor, friend Vito; for there is no real being
of thy name, if thou art not he.
Diavolo! A pretty theory this, which would teach the
young people of Elba that there is no actual podest in the
island, but only a poor miserable sham one; and no Vito
Viti on earth. If they get to think this, God help the place,
as to order and sobriety.
I do not think, neighbour, that you fully understand the
matter, which may be owing to a want of clearness on my
part; but as we are now on our way to visit an unfortunate
prisoner, we may as well postpone the discussion to another
time. There are many leisure moments on board a ship, to
the language of which one is a stranger, that might be
usefully
and agreeably relieved by going into the subject more
at large.
Your pardon, Signor Andrea;but there is no time like
the present. Then, if the theory be true, there is no
prisoner
at allor, at the most, an imaginary oneand it can
do Sir Smees no harm to wait; while, on the other hand, I
shall not have a moment's peace, until I learn whether there
is such a man as Vito Viti, or not, and whether I am he.
Brother Vito, thou art impatient; these things are not
learned in a moment; moreover, every system has a
beginning
and an end, like a book; and who would ever become
learned, that should attempt to read a treatise backward?
I know what is due to you, Signor Andrea, both on
account of your higher rank, and on account of your greater
wisdom, and will say no more at present; though to keep
from
thinking
on a philosophy that teaches I am not a
podest, or you a vice-governatore, is more than flesh and
blood can bear.
Andrea Barrofaldi, glad that his companion was
momentarily
appeased, now proceeded towards Raoul's little prison,
and was immediately admitted by the sentry, who had his
orders to that effect. The prisoner received his guests
courteously and cheerfully; for we are far from wishing to
represent him as so heroic as not to rejoice exceedingly at
having escaped death by hanging, even though it might
prove to be a respite, rather than a pardon. At such a
moment, the young man could have excused a much more
offensive intrusion, and the sudden change in his prospects
disposed him a little to be jocular; for truth compels us to
add, that gratitude to God entered but little into his
emotions
.
The escape from death, like his capture, and the
other incidents of his cruise, were viewed simply as the
results of the fortune of war.
Winchester had directed that Raoul's state-room should
be supplied with every little convenience that his situation
required, and, among other things, it had two common
ship's stools. One of these was given to each of the
Italians
,
while the prisoner took a seat on the gun-tackle of one
Vol. II.  10
of the two guns that formed the sides of his apartment. It
was now night, and a mist had gathered over the arch above,
which hid the stars, and rendered it quite dark. Still,
Raoul had neither lamp, nor candles; and, though they had
been offered him, he declined their use, as he had found
stranger eyes occasionally peeping through the openings in
the canvass, with the idle curiosity of the vulgar, to
ascertain
the appearance and employments of one condemned to
die. He had experienced a good deal of annoyance from
this feeling, the previous night; and the same desire existing
to see how a criminal could bear a respite, he had
determined
to pass his evening in obscurity. There was a
lantern, or two, however, on the gun-deck, which threw a
dim light, even beyond the limits of the canvass bulk-heads.
As has been said already, these bulk-heads extended from
gun to gun, so as to admit light and air from the ports.
This brought the tackles, on one side, into the room; and
on one of these Raoul now took his seat.
Andrea Barrofaldi, from his superior condition in life, as
well as from his better education, and nicer natural tact, far
surpassed his companion in courtesy of demeanour. The
latter would have plunged in
medias res
at once, but the
vice-governatore commenced a conversation on general
matters, intending to offer his congratulations for the recent
respite, when he conceived that a suitable occasion should
offer. This was an unfortunate delay in one respect; for
Vito Viti no sooner found that the main object of the visit
was to be postponed, than he turned with eagerness to the
subject in discussion, which had been interrupted in order to
enter the state-room.
Here has the vice-governatore come forward with a
theory, Sir Smees, he commenced, the moment a pause in
the discourse left him an openinghere has the
vice-governatore
come forward with a theory, that I insist the
church would call damnable, and at which human nature
revolts
Nay, good Vito, thou dost not state the case fairly,
interrupted Andrea, whose spirit was a little aroused at so
abrupt an assault. The theory is not mine; it is that of
a certain English philosopher, in particular, who, let it be
said, too, was a bishop.
A Lutheran!was it not so, honourable Signor
Andrea
?a
bishop so called?
Why, to confess the truth, he
was
a heretic, and not
to be considered as an apostle of the true church.
Ay  I would have sworn to that. No true son of
the church would ever broach such a doctrine. Only
fancy, signori, the number of imaginary fires, tongues, and
other instruments of torture that would become necessary
to carry on punishment under such a system! To be
consistent
,
even the devils ought to be imaginary.
Comment, signori! exclaimed Raoul, smiling, and
arousing to a sudden interest in the discourse; did any
English bishop ever broach such a doctrine? Imaginary
devils, and imaginary places of punishment, are coming near
to our revolutionary France! After this, I hope our much
abused philosophy will meet with more respect.
My neighbour has not understood the theory of which
he speaks, answered Andrea, too good a churchman not to
feel uneasiness at the direction things were taking; and so,
worthy Vito Viti, I feel the necessity of explaining the whole
matter, at some length. Sir Smees, so the Italians called
Raoul, out of courtesy, still, it being awkward for them,
after all that had passed, to address him by his real name
Sir Smees will excuse us, for a few minutes; perhaps it
may serve to amuse him, to hear to what a flight the
imagination
of a subtle-minded man can soar.
Raoul civilly expressed the satisfaction it would give him
to listen, and stretching himself on the gun-tackle, in order
to be more at ease, he leaned back with his head fairly within
the port, while his feet were braced against the inner truck
of the gun-carriage. This threw him into a somewhat
recumbent
attitude, but it being understood as intended to
render what was but an inconvenient seat at the best,
tolerably
comfortable, no one thought it improper.
It is unnecessary for us to repeat, here, all that Andrea
Barrofaldi thought proper to say, in his own justification, and
in explanation of the celebrated theory of Bishop Berkely.
Such a task was not performed in a minute; and, in truth,
prolixity, whenever he got upon a favourite theme, was apt
to be one of the vice-governatore's weaknesses. He was far
from acquiescing in the doctrine, though he annoyed his old
neighbour exceedingly, by presenting the subject in such a
way as to render it respectable in appearance, if not
conclusive
in argument. To the latter, it was peculiarly unpleasant
to imagine, even for the sake of argument, that there was no
such island as Elba, and that he was not its podest; and
all his personal and egotistical propensities came in aid
of his official reluctance, to disgust him thoroughly with a
theory that he did not hesitate to say, was an outrage on
every honest man's nature.
There are fellows in the world, Signor Andrea, the
straight-forward podest urged, in continuation of his
objections
,
who might be glad enough to find everything
imaginary
,
as you saychaps that cannot sleep of nights, for bad
consciences, and to whom it would be a great blessing if the
earth would throw them overboard, as they say in this ship,
and let them fall into the great ocean of oblivion. But they
are baroni in grain, and ought not to pass for anything
material, among honest people. I 've known several of those
rogues at Livorno, and, I dare say, Napoli is not altogether
without them; but that is a very different matter from telling
a handsome and virtuous young maiden, that her beauty
and modesty are both seeming; and respectable magistrates,
that they are as great impostors as the very rogues they
send to the prisons; or, perhaps, to the galleys.
To speeches like these, Andrea opposed his explanations
and his philosophy, until the discussion became animated,
and the dialogue loud. It is rather a peculiarity of Italy,
that one of the softest languages of Christendom is frequently
rendered harsh and unpleasant, by the mode of using it. On
this occasion, certainly, the animation of the disputants did
not mitigate the evil. Griffin happened to pass the spot, on
the outside of the canvass, just at this moment, and,
catching
some of the words, he stopped to listen. His smiles and
translations soon collected a group of officers, and the sentry
respectfully dropping a little on one side, the deck around
the state-room of the prisoner became a sort of parquet to
a very amusing representation. Several of the young
gentlemen
understood a little Italian, and Griffin translating
rapidly, though in an under-tone, the whole affair was deemed
to be particularly diverting.
This is a rum way of consoling a man who is
condemned
to die, muttered the master; I wonder the
Frenchman
stands all their nonsense.
O! rejoined the marine officer, drill will do anything.
These Revolutionists are so drilled into hypocrisy, that, I
dare say, the fellow is grinning, the whole time, as if
perfectly
delighted.
Raoul, in fact, listened with no little amusement. At
first, his voice was occasionally heard in the discussion,
evidently aiming at exciting the disputants; but the warmth
of the latter soon silenced him, and he was fain to do nothing
but listen. Shortly after the discussion got to be warm,
and just as Griffin was collecting his group, the prisoner
stretched himself still further into the port, to enjoy the
coolness
of the evening breeze, when, to his surprise, a hand
was laid gently on his forehead.
Hush! whispered a voice close to his ear, it is the
AmericanIthuelbe cool;now is the moment to pull
for life.
Raoul had too much self-command to betray his
astonishment
,
but, in an instant, every faculty he possessed was on
the alert. Ithuel, he knew, was a man for exigencies.
Experience had taught him a profound respect for his
enterprise
and daring, when it became necessary to act.
Something
must certainly be in the wind, worthy of his attention,
or this cautious person would not have exposed himself in a
situation which would be sure to lead to punishment, if
detected
.
Ithuel was seated astride of one of the chains,
beneath the main-channel of the ship, a position which might
be maintained without detection, possibly, so long as it
continued
dark; but which, in itself, if seen, would have been
taken as a proof of an evil intention.
What would you have, Etooelle? whispered Raoul,
who perceived that his companions were too much occupied
to observe his movements, or to hear his words.
The
Eye
talian, and his niece, are about to go ashore.
Everything is ready and understood. I 've consaited you
might pass out of the port, in the dark, and escape in the
boat. Keep quietwe shall see.
Raoul understood his respite to be a thing of doubtful
termination. Under the most favourable results, an English
prison remained in perspective, and then the other side of
10 *
the picture offered the image of Ghita to his eye! He was
in a tumult of feeling, but, accustomed to self-command, still
no exclamation escaped him.
Whencher Etooelle?
when?
he asked, his whisper
being tremulous, in spite of every effort to command
himself
.
Now
too-der-sweet
(
tout-de-suite
)the boat is at the
gangway, and old Giuntotardi is in herthey are rigging a
chair for the gal.Aythere she swings off!don't you
hear the call?
Raoul did hear the whistle of the boatswain, which was
piping lower away, at that very moment. He listened
intently, as he lay stretched upon the gun-tackles; and then
he heard the splash in the water, as the boat was hauled
closer to, in order to be brought beneath the chair. The
rattling of oars, too, was audible, as Ghita left the seat, and
moved aft. Round in, called out the officer of the deck;
after which Carlo Giuntotardi was left in quiet possession of
his own boat.
The moment was exceedingly critical. Some one, in all
probability, was watching the boat from the deck; and,
though the night was dark, it required the utmost caution to
proceed with any hopes of success. At this instant, Ithuel
again whispered
The time 's near. Old Carlo has his orders, and little
Ghita is alive to see them obeyed. All now depends on
silence and activity. In less than five minutes, the boat will
be under the port.
Raoul understood the plan; but, it struck him as
hopeless
.
It seemed impossible that Ghita could be permitted to
quit the ship, without a hundred eyes watching her
movements
;
and though it was dark, it was far from being
sufficiently
so, to suppose it practicable for any one to join her
and not be seen. Yet this risk must be taken, or escape
was out of the question. An order given through the
trumpet, was encouraging; it announced that the officer of
the watch was employed at some duty that must draw his
attention another way. This was a great deal; few
presuming
to look aside, while this functionary was inviting
their attention in another direction.
Raoul's brain was in a whirl. The two Italians were at
the height of their discussion; and fortunately, the clamour
they made was at the loudest. Even the suppressed laughter
of the officers on the outside of the canvass, was audible to
him;
though the disputants could hear nothing but their
own voices. Every knock of the boat against the ship's
side, every sound of the oars, as Carlo's foot rattled them
about, and the wash of the water, were audible. It seemed
as if all the interests of life  the future, the past, and the
present, together with the emotions of his whole heart, were
compressed into that single instant. Ignorant of what was
expected, he asked Ithuel, in French, the course he ought to
take.
Am I to fall, head-foremost, into the water? What
would you have of me? he whispered.
Lie quiet, till I tell you to move. I'll make the signal,
Captain Rule; let the Eyetalians blaze away.
Raoul could not see the water, as he lay with his head
fairly in the port; and he had to trust entirely to the single
sense of hearing. Knock, knock, knock; the boat dropped
slowly along the ship's side, as if preparing to shove off.
All this, Carlo Giuntotardi managed exceedingly well. When
he lay immediately beneath the main-channels, it would not
have been an easy thing to see his boat, even had there
been any one on the look-out. Here he held on; for he
was not so lost to external things, as not fully to understand
what was expected of him. Perhaps he was less attended
to, by those on deck, from the circumstance that no one
believed him capable of so much worldly care.
Is everything safe for a movement, inboard?
whispered
Ithuel.
Raoul raised his head and looked about him. That a
group was collected around the state-room, he understood
by the movements, the low conversation, and the suppressed
laughter; still, no one seemed to be paying any attention to
himself. As he had not spoken for some time, however, he
thought it might be well to let his voice be heard; and,
taking care that it should sound well within the port, he
made one of the light objections to the vice-governatore's
theory, that he had urged at the commencement of the
controversy
.
This was little heeded, as he expected; but it
served to make those without know that he was in his prison,
and might prevent an untimely discovery. Everything else
seemed propitious; and laying down again, at his length,
his face came within a few inches of Ithuel's.
All safe, he whispered; what would you have me
do?
Nothing, but shove yourself ahead carefully, by means
of your feet.
This Raoul did; at first, as it might be, inch by inch,
until Ithuel put the end of a rope into his hands, telling him
it was well fast to the channel above. The rope rendered
the rest easy; the only danger now being of too much
precipitation
.
Nothing would have been easier, than for Raoul
to drag his body out at the port, and to drop into the boat;
but, to escape, it was still necessary to avoid observation.
The ship was quite half-a-league from the point of
Campanella
,
and directly abreast of it; and there was no security
to the fugitives unless they got some distance the start of
any pursuers. This consideration induced the utmost
caution
on the part of Ithuel; nor was it entirely lost on his
friend. By this time, however, Raoul found he was so
completely master of his movements, as to be able to swing
his legs out of the port, by a very trifling effort; then the
descent into the boat would be the easiest thing imaginable.
But a pressure from the hand of Ithuel checked him.
Wait a little, whispered the latter, till the Eyetalians
are at it, cat and dog fashion.
The discussion was now so loud and warm, that it was
not necessary to lose much time. Ithuel gave the signal,
and Raoul dragged his head and shoulders up by his arms,
while he placed his feet against the gun; the next moment
he was hanging perpendicularly, beneath the main-chains.
To drop lightly and noiselessly into the boat, took but a
second. When his feet touched a thwart, he found that the
American was there before him. The latter dragged him
down to his side, and the two lay concealed in the bottom
of the yawl, with a cloak of Ghita's thrown over their
persons
.
Carlo Giuntotardi was accustomed to the
management
of a craft like that in which he now found himself;
simply releasing his boat-hook from one of the chains, the
ship passed slowly ahead, leaving him, in about a minute,
fairly in her wake, a hundred feet astern.
So far, everything had succeeded surprisingly. The night
was so dark, as to embolden the two fugitives now to rise,
and to take their seats on the thwarts; though all this was
done with exceeding caution, and without the least noise.
The oars were soon out, Carlo took the tiller, and a feeling
of exultation glowed at the heart of Raoul, as he bent to his
ashen implement, and felt the boat quiver with the impulse.
Take it coolly, Captain Rule, said Ithuel, in a low
voice; it's a long pull, and we are still within ear-shot of
the frigate. In five minutes more we shall be dropped so
far, as to be beyond sight; then we may pull directly out
to sea, if we wish.
Just then the bell of the Proserpine struck four; the signal
it was eight o'clock. Immediately after, the watch was
called, and a stir succeeded in the ship.
They only turn the hands up, said Raoul, who perceived
that his companion paused, like one uneasy.
That is an uncommon movement for shifting the watch!
What is
that?
It was clearly the overhauling of tackles; the plash of a
boat, as it struck the water, followed.
CHAPTER IX.
Our dangers, and delights, are near allies;
From the same stem the rose and prickle rise.
Alleyn
.
It
has been seen that a generous sympathy had taken
place of hostile feeling, as respects Raoul, in the minds of
most on board the Proserpine. Under the influence of this
sentiment, an order had been passed through the sentries,
not to molest their prisoner, by too frequent or unnecessary
an examination of the state-room. With a view to a proper
regard to both delicacy and watchfulness, however,
Winchester
had directed that the angle of the canvass nearest
the cabin-door lantern, should be opened a few inches, and
that the sentinel should look in, every half-hour; or as often
as the ship's bell told the progress of time. The object
was simply to be certain that the prisoner was in his room,
and that he was making no attempt on his own life; a step
that had been particularly apprehended previously to the
respite. Now, the whole of the dispute between the two
Italians, and that which had passed beneath the ship's
channels
,
did not occupy but six or seven minutes; and the
little cluster of officers was still gaining recruits, when
Raoul was fairly in the yawl of his own lugger. At this
moment the ship's bell struck the hour of half-past seven.
The marine advanced, with the respect of a subordinate,
but with the steadiness of a man on post, to examine the
state-room. Although the gentlemen believed this caution
unnecessary, the loud voices of Andrea and Vito Viti being
of themselves a sort of guarantee that the prisoner was in
his cage, they gave way to a man, fully understanding that
a sentinel was never to be resisted. The canvass was opened
a few inches, the light of the lantern at the cabin-door shot
in, and there sat the vice-governatore and the podest,
gesticulating
,
and staring into each other's face, still in hot
dispute;but the place of Raoul Yvard was empty!
Yelverton happened to look into the room with the
sentinel
.
He was a young man of strong powers of
perception
,
with all the phrenological bumps that are necessary to
the character, and he saw, at a glance, that the bird had
flown. The first impression was, that the prisoner had
thrown himself into the sea, and he rushed on deck, without
speaking to those around him, made a hurried statement to
the officer of the deck, and had a quarter-boat in the water
in a surprisingly short time. His astonished companions
below, were less precipitate, though the material fact was
soon known to them. Griffin gave a hasty order, and the
canvass bulk-head came down, as it might be, at a single
jerk, leaving the two disputants in full view, utterly
unconscious
of the escape of their late companion, sputtering and
gesticulating, furiously.
Halloo! vice-governatore, cried Griffin, abruptly, for
he saw that the moment was not one for ceremony; what
have you done with the Frenchman?  where is Raoul
Yvard?
Il Signor, Sir Smees? Monsieur Yvard, if you will?
Neighbour Vito, what, indeed, has become of the man who
so lately sat
there?
Cospetto!according to your doctrine, Signor Andrea,
there never was a man there at allonly the imagination of
one; it is not surprising that such a being should be missed.
But, I protest against any inferences being drawn from this
accident. All Frenchmen are flighty and easily carried
away, and now that they are no longer ballasted by
religion
,
they are so many moral feathers. No, no  let a
man of respectable information, of sound principles, and
a love for the saints, with a good, substantial body, like
myself, vanish only once, and then I may confess, it will tell
in favour of your logic, vice-governatore.
An obstinate man, neighbour Vito, is a type of the
imperfections
that a
Your pardon, Signor Barrofaldi,interrupted Griffin
this is not a moment for philosophical theories, but for us
seamen to do our duty. What has become of Raoul Yvard
your Sir Smees?
Signor Tenente, as I hope to be saved, I have not the
smallest idea! There he was, a minute or two since, seated
by that cannon, apparently an attentive and much edified
auditor of a discussion we were holding on the celebrated
theory of a certain bishop of your own country; which
theory, rightly consideredmind I say
rightly considered
,
neighbour Vito; for the view you have taken of this matter
is
Enough of this, for the present, Signoriadded Griffin.
The Frenchman was in this place when you came here?
He was, Signor Tenente, and seemed greatly to enjoy
the discussion in which
And you have not seen him quit youthrough the
canvass
,
or the port?
Not I, on my honour,  I did suppose him too much
entertained to leave us.
Ah! Sir Smees has just vanished into the imagination,
growled the podest, which is going home to the great
logical family of which he is an ideal member! There
being no lugger, no corsair, no sea, and no frigate, it seems
to me that we are all making a stir about nothing.
Griffin did not stop to question farther. He was quickly
on deck, where he found Cuffe, who had just been brought
out of his cabin by a hurried report.
What the dl is the meaning of all this, gentlemen?
demanded the latter, in that tone which a commander so
naturally assumes when things go wrong. Whoever has
suffered the prisoner to escape may expect to hear from the
Admiral directly, on the subject.
He is not in his state-room, sir, answered Griffin, and
I directed the boatswain to pipe away all the boats'-crews
as I came up the ladder.
As this was said, boat after boat was falling, and, in two
or three minutes, no less than five were in the water,
including
that in which Yelverton was already rowing round the
ship to catch the presumed swimmer, or drowning man.
The Frenchman is gone, sir, said Winchester, and he
must have passed out of the port. I have sent one of the
gentlemen to examine if he is not stowed away about the
chains.
Where is the boat of the old Italian and his niece?
A pause succeeded this question, and light broke in upon
all at the same instant.
That yawl
was
alongside, cried Griffin,no one
was in her, however, but Giuntotardi and the girl
Beg your pardon, sir, said a young fore-top-man, who
had just descended the rigging,I saw the boat from aloft,
sir, and it hung some time, sir, under the starboard
mainchains
.It
is so dark I couldn't fairly make it out; but
summat seemed to be passed into it, from a port. I didn't
like the look of the thing, and so our captain just told me to
come on deck and report it, sir.
Send Ithuel Bolt here, Mr. Winchesterbear a hand,
sir, and let us have a look at that gentleman.
It is needless to say that the call was unanswered; and
then all on board began to understand the mode of the
escape. Officers rushed into the several boats, and no less
than five different parties commenced the pursuit. At the
same time the ship hoisted a lantern, as a signal for the boats
to rally to.
It has been said that the Proserpine, when this incident
occurred, was off the point of the Campanella, distant about
half a marine league. The wind was light at east, or was what
is called the land breeze, and the vessel had about three
knots way on her. The head-land was nearly abeam, and
she was looking up through the pass which separates Capri
from the main, hauling round into the Bay of Naples;
intending
to anchor in the berth she had left the previous day.
The night was too dark to permit an object small as a boat
to be seen at any distance, but the black mass of Capri was
plainly visible in its outlines, towering into the air near two
thousand feet; while the formation of the coast on the other
side, might be traced with tolerable certainty and
distinctness
.
Such was the state of things when the five boats
mentioned quitted the ship.
Yelverton had acted as if a man were overboard; or, he
had not waited for orders. While pulling round the ship
alone, he caught sight, though very dimly, of the yawl, as
it moved in towards the land, and without communicating
with any on board, the truth flashed on his mind also, and
he gave chase. When the other boats were ready, the two
that were on the outside of the ship pulled off to seaward a
short distance, to look about them in that direction; while
the two others, hearing the oars of the light gig, in which
Yelverton was glancing ahead, followed the sound, under
the impression that they were in pursuit of the yawl. Such
was the state of things at the commencement of an
exceedingly
vigorous and hot pursuit.
As Raoul and Ithuel had been at work, while time was
lost in doubt in and around the ship, they had got about
three hundred yards the start of even Yelverton. Their
boat pulled unusually well, and being intended for only two
oars, it might be deemed full manned, with two as vigorous
hands in it as those it had. Still it was not a match for the
second gig, and the four chosen men who composed its crew,
which was the boat taken by Yelverton, in the hurry of the
moment. In a pull of a mile and a half, the yawl was
certain
to be overtaken, and the practised ears of Raoul soon
assured him of the fact. His own oars were muffled. He
determined to profit by the circumstance, and turn aside, in
the hope that his fleet pursuers would pass him unseen. A
sheer was accordingly given to the boat, and instead of
pulling
directly towards the land, the fugitives inclined to the
westward; the sea appearing the most obscure in that
Vol. II.  11
direction, on account of the proximity of Capri. This
artifice
was completely successful. Yelverton was so eager in
the chase, that he kept his eyes riveted before him,
fancying
,
from time to time, that he saw the boat ahead, and he
passed within a hundred and fifty yards of the yawl, without
in the least suspecting her vicinity. Raoul and Ithuel ceased
rowing, to permit this exchange of position, and the former
had a few sarcastic remarks on the stupidity of his enemies,
as some relief to the feelings of the moment. None of the
English had muffled oars. On the contrary, the sounds of the
regular man-of-war jerks were quite audible in every
direction
;
but so familiar were they to the ears of the Proserpines,
that the crews of the two boats that came next after
Yelverton
,
actually followed the sounds of his oars, under the
belief that they were in the wake of the fugitives. In this
manner, then, Raoul suffered three of the five boats to pass
ahead of him. The remaining two were so distant as not
to be heard, and when those in advance were sufficiently in
advance, he and Ithuel followed them, with a leisurely stroke,
reserving themselves for any emergency that might occur.
It was a fair race between the gig and the two cutters
that pursued her. The last had the sounds of the former's
oars in the ears of their crews to urge them to exertion; it
being supposed they came from the strokes of the pursued,
while Yelverton was burning with the desire to outstrip
those who followed, and to secure the prize for himself.
This made easy work for those in the yawl, which was soon
left more than a cable's-length astern.
One would think, Ghita, said Raoul, laughing, though
he had the precaution to speak in an under-toneone
would think that your old friends, the vice-governatore and
the podest, commanded the boats in-shore of us, were it not
known that they are this very moment quarrelling about the
fact, whether there is such a place as Elba on this great
planet of ours, or not.
Ah! Raoul, remember the last dreadful eight-and-forty
hours! do not stop to trifle, until we are once more fairly
beyond the power of your enemies.
Peste!I shall be obliged to own, hereafter, that there
is some generosity in an Englishman. I cannot deny their
treatment, and yet I had rather it had been more ferocious.
This is an unkind feeling; you should strive to tear it
from your heart.
It's a great deal to allow to an Englishman, Captain
Rule, to allow him gineros'ty, interrupted Ithuel. They 're
a fierce race, and fatten on mortal misery.
Mais, bon Etooelle, your back has escaped this time;
you ought to be thankful.
They 're short-handed, and didn't like to cripple a
top-man
,
answered he of the Granite state, unwilling to
concede
anything to liberal or just sentiments. Had the
ship's complement been full, they wouldn't have left as
much skin on my back as would cover the smallest-sized
pin-cushion. I owe 'em no thanks, therefore.
Bien; quant  moi, I shall speak well of the bridge
which carries me over, said Raoul. Monsieur Cuffe has
given me good food, good wine, good words, a good
state-room
,
a good bed, and a most timely reprieve.
Is not your heart grateful to God for the last, dear
Raoul? asked Ghita, in a voice so gentle and tender, that
the young man could have bowed down and worshipped her.
After a pause, however, he answered, as if intentionally
to avoid the question by levity.
I forgot the philosophy, too, he said.
That
was no
small part of the good cheer. Ciel! it was worth some risk
to have the advantage of attending such a school. Did you
understand the matter in dispute between the two Italians,
brave Etooelle?
I heerd their
Eye
-talian jabber, answered Ithuel; but
supposed it was all about saints' days, and eating fish. No
reasonable man makes so much noise when he is talking
sense.
Pardieit was
philosophy!
They laugh at us French
for living by the rules of reason, rather than those of
prejudice
;
and then to hear what
they
call philosophy! You
would scarce think it, Ghita, continued Raoul, who was
now light of heart, and full of the scene he had so recently
witnessedyou would hardly think it, Ghita, but Signor
Andrea, sensible and learned as he is, maintained that it
was not folly to believe in a philosophy which teaches that
nothing we see or do actually exists, but that everything
was mere seeming. In short, that we live in an imaginary
world, with imaginary people in it; float on an imaginary
sea, and cruise in imaginary ships.
And was all that noise about an idee, Captain Rule?
Sibut men will quarrel about an ideaan imaginary
thing, Etooelle, as stoutly as about substantials. Hist!
They will chase imaginary things, too, as are the boats
ahead of us at this moment.
There are others following us, observed Carlo
Giuntotardi
,
who was more alive to surrounding objects than
common
;
and who, from his habitual silence, often heard that
which escaped the senses of others. I have noticed the
sound of their oars some time.
This produced a pause, and even a cessation in the
rowing
,
in order that the two seamen might listen. Sure
enough, the sound of oars was audible outside, as well as
in-shore, leaving no doubt that some pursuers were still
behind them. This was bringing the fugitives between two
fires, as it might be; and Ithuel proposed pulling off at right
angles to the course again, in order to get into the rear of
the whole party. But to this, Raoul objected. He thought
the boats astern were still so distant as to enable them to
reach the shore in time to escape. Once on the rocks,
there could be little danger of being overtaken in the
darkness
.
Still, as it was a first object with Raoul to rejoin his
lugger as soon as possible, after landing Ghita, he did not
wish to place his boat in any situation of much risk. This
induced some deliberation; and it was finally determined to
take a middle course, by steering into the pass between
Capri and Campanella, in the expectation that, when the
leading English boats reached the point of the latter, they
would abandon the pursuit as hopeless, and return to the
ship.
We can land you, dearest Ghita, at the Marina Grande
of Sorrento; then your walk to St. Agata will be neither
long nor painful.
Do not mind me, Raoul; put me on the land at the
nearest place, and go you to your vessel. God has relieved
you from this great jeopardy, and your duty is to strive to
act as it is evident he intends you to do. As for me, leagues
will be light, if I can only be satisfied that thou art in
safety.
Angel!  Thou never thinkest of self! But not a foot
this side of Sorrento will I quit thee. We can pull thither
in an hour or two; then I shall feel that I have done a duty.
Once ashore, Etooelle and I can set our little sail, and will
run out to sea between the two islands. No fear but what
we can do that, with this land breeze; after which, a few
rockets burned, will tell us where to find le Feu-Follet.
Ghita again remonstrated, but in vain. Raoul persisted,
and she was obliged to submit. The conversation now
ceased; the two men plying the oars diligently, and to good
effect. Occasionally they ceased, and listened to the sounds
of the oars in the frigate's boats, all which were evidently
collecting in the vicinity of the point or cape. By this time,
the yawl had the extremity of the land abeam, and it soon
passed so far into the Bay, as to bring most, if not all, of
the pursuers astern. In the darkness, with no other guide
than the sounds mentioned, and with so many pursuers,
there was some uncertainty, of course, as to the position of
all the boats; but there was little doubt that most of them
were now somewhere in the immediate vicinity of
Campanella
.
As Raoul gave this point a good berth, and his own
progress was noiseless, this was bringing himself and
companions
,
after their recent dangers, into comparative
security.
More than an hour of steady rowing followed, during
which time the yawl was making swift way towards the
Marina Grande of Sorrento. After passing Massa, Raoul
felt no further uneasiness, and he requested Carlo
Giuntotardi
to sheer in towards the land, where less resistance from
the breeze was met with, and where it was also easier to
know the precise position. Apprehension of the boats now
ceased, though Ithuel fancied, from time to time, that he
heard smothered sounds, like those of oars imperfectly
muffled
.
Raoul laughed at his conceits and apprehensions, and,
to confess the truth, he became negligent of his duty, again,
in the soothing delight of finding himself, once more, free, in
all but heart, in the company of Ghita. In this manner
the yawl moved ahead, though with materially diminished
speed, until, by the formation of the heights, and the
appearance
of the lamps and candles on the piano, Ghita knew
11 *
that they were drawing quite near to the indentation of the
coast on which is situate the town of Sorrento.
As soon as my uncle and myself have landed at the
Marina Grande, Raoul, said Ghita, thou and the
American
will be certain to seek thy lugger; then thou promisest
to quit the coast?
Why ask promises of one that thou dost not sufficiently
respect to think he will keep them?
I do not deserve this, Raoul; between thee and me, no
promise has ever been broken.
It is not easy to break vows with one who will neither
give nor accept them. I cannot boast of keeping such idle
faith as this! Go with me before some priest, Ghita, ask
all that man ever has or can swear to, and then thou shalt
see how a sailor can be true to his vow.
And why before a priest? Thou know'st, Raoul, that,
in thine eyes, all the offices of the church are mummery;
that nothing is more sacred, with thee, for being sworn to at
the altar of God, and with one of his holy ministers for a
witness!
Every oath or promise made to
thee
, Ghita, is sacred,
in my eyes. It wanteth not any witness, or any consecrated
place, to make it more binding than thy truth and tenderness
can insure. Thou art my
priest
my
altar
my
Forbear! exclaimed Ghita, in alarm, lest he should
utter the name of that holy Being towards whom her heart
was even at that moment swelling with gratitude for his own
recent escape from death. Thou know'st not the meaning
of thine own words, and mightst add that which would give
me more pain than I can express.
Boat, ahoy! cried a deep, nautical voice, within twenty
yards of them, and in-shore; the hail coming in the sudden,
quick demand that distinguishes the call of a
man-of-war's-man
.
A pause of half a minute succeeded, for they in the yawl
were completely taken by surprise.
At length Ithuel, who felt the necessity of saying
something
,
if he would not bring the stranger close alongside of
them, answered in the customary manner of the Italians.
Clinch, for it was he, scouring the shore in quest of the
lugger, on his way back to the Proserpine, gave a growl,
when he found that he must speak in a foreign tongue, if he
would continue the discourse; then he mustered all the
Italian of which he was master for the occasion. Having
cruised long on the station, this was sufficient, however, for
his present purpose.
Is that a boat from Massa or from Capri? he inquired.
Neither, S'nore, answered Raoul, afraid to trust Carlo's
conscience with the management of such a dialogue. We
come round the cape, from St. Agata, and carry figs to
Napoli.
St. Agata! ay, that is the village on the heights; I
passed a night there, myself, in the house of one Maria
Giuntotardi
Who can this be? murmured Ghitamy aunt knows
no forestieri!
An Inglese, by his thick speech and accent. I hope he
will not ask for figs for his supper!
Clinch was thinking of other things, at that moment; and
when he continued, it was to follow the train of his own
thoughts.
Have you seen anything of a barone-looking lugger,
he asked, French-rigged, and French manned, skulking
anywhere about this coast?
Si
she went north, into the Gulf of Gaeta, just as the
sun was setting, and is, no doubt, gone to anchor under the
cannon of her countrymen.
If she has, she 'll find herself in hot water, answered
Clinch, in English. We 've craft enough, up there, to
hoist her in and dub her down to a jolly-boat's size, in a
single watch. Did you see anything of a frigate, this
evening
,
near the Point of Campanella?An Inglese, I mean; a
tight six-and-thirty, with three new topsails.
Si
the light you see, here, just in a range with Capri,
is at her gaff; we have seen her the whole afternoon and
evening. In fact, she towed us kindly round the cape, until
we got fairly into this Bay.
Then you are the people for me!Was there a man
hanged on board her or not, about sunset?
This question was put with so much interest, that Raoul
cursed his interrogator, in his heart; imagining that he was
burning with the wish to learn his own execution. He was
also now aware that this was the boat which had left the
Proserpine about noon.
I can tell you there was not, s'noreif that will gladden
your heart. A man was all
ready
to be hanged, when
Capitaine Cuffe was pleased to order him taken down.
Just as three heavy guns were fired up at townwas it
not so? Clinch eagerly inquired.
Diable! this man may have been my preserver, after
all!You say true, s'nore; it
was
just as three guns were
fired up at Naples, though I did not know those guns had
anything to do with the intended execution. Can you tell
me if they had?
If they had!  Why I touched them off with my own
hands; they were signals made by the admiral to spare
poor Raoul Yvard, for a few days, at least. I am rejoiced
to hear that all my great efforts to reach the fleet were not
in vain. I don't like this hanging, Mr. Italian.
S'nore, you show a kind heart, and will one day reap
the reward of such generous feelings. I wish I knew the
name of so humane a gentleman, that I might mention him
in my prayers.
They 'll never fancy that Captain Rule said
that
,
muttered
Ithuel, grinning.
As for my name, friend, it 's no great matter. They
call me Clinch, which is a good fast word to sail under, too;
but it has no handle to it, other than of a poor devil of a
master's-mate; and that, too, at an age when some men
carry broad-pennants.
This was said bitterly, and in English; when uttered, the
supposed Italian was wished a buona sera, and the gig
proceeded.
That is
un brave
, said Raoul, with emphasis, as they
parted. If ever I meet with Monsieur Cleench, he will
learn that I do not forget his good wishes.
Peste!
if there
were a hundred such men in the British marine, Etooelle,
we might love it.
They 're fiery sarpents, Captain Rule, and not to be
trusted, any on 'em. As for fine words, I might have
fancied
myself a cousin of the king's, if I 'd only put my name
to their shipping articles. This Mr. Clinch is well enough
in the main; being his own worst inimy, in the way of the
grog pitcher.
Boat, ahoy! shouted Clinch again, now about a hundred
yards distant, having passed towards the cape. Raoul and
Ithuel mechanically ceased rowing, under the impression
that the master's-mate had still something to communicate.
Boat, ahoy!Answer at once, or you 'll hear from
me, repeated Clinch.
Ay, ay, answered another voice, which, in fact, was
Yelverton's; Clinch, is that you?
Ay, ay, sirMr. Yelverton, is it not?I think I know
the voice, sir.
You are quite right; but make less noise  who was
that you hailed, a minute or two since?
Clinch began to answer; but, as the two gigs were
approaching each other all the time, they were soon so near
as to render it unnecessary to speak loud enough to be
heard at any distance. All this time, Raoul and Ithuel lay
on their oars, almost afraid to stir the water, and listening
with an attention that was nearly breathless. They were
satisfied that the oars of the English were now muffled; a
sign that they were in earnest in the pursuit, and bent on
making a thorough search. The two gigs could not be more
than a hundred yards from the yawl, and Ithuel knew that
they were the two fastest-rowing boats of the English fleet
so fast, indeed, that Cuffe and his lieutenants had made
several successful matches with them, against the officers of
different vessels.
Hist! said Ghita, whose heart was in her mouth.
Oh! Raoul, they come!
Coming, indeed, were they; and that with vast velocity.
So careful, however, was the stroke, that they were within
two hundred feet of the yawl, before Raoul and his
companion
took the alarm, and plunged their own oars again
into the water. Then, indeed, the gigs might be dimly seen;
though the shadows of the land deepened the obscurity of
night so far, as to render objects at even a less distance
quite indistinct. The suddenness and imminency of the
danger appeared to arouse all there was of life in Carlo
Giuntotardi. He steered, and steered well, being
accustomed
to the office, by living so long on the coast; and he
sheered in for the rocks, with the double view of landing, if
necessary, and of getting still deeper within the shadows.
It was soon evident the English gained. Four oars
against two were fearful odds; and it was plainly apparent
the yawl must be overtaken.
Oh! uncle, towards the arch and water-cavern of the
point, whispered Ghita, whose hands were clasped on her
breast, as if to keep down her emotions.
That
may yet
save him!
The yawl was in the act of whirling round the rocks,
which form the deep cove, on which the Marina Grande of
Sorrento lies. Carlo caught his niece's idea, and he kept
his tiller hard a-port; telling Raoul and Ithuel, at the same
time, to take in their oars, as quick as possible. The men
obeyed, supposing it was the intention to land, and take to
the heights for shelter. But just as they supposed the boat
was about to strike against some perpendicular rocks, and
Raoul was muttering his surprise that such a spot should be
chosen to land at, it glided through a low natural arch, and
entered a little basin, as noiselessly as a bubble floating in a
current. The next minute, the two gigs came whirling
round the rocks; one following the shore, close in, to prevent
the fugitives from landing, and the other steering more
obliquely athwart the bay. In still another minute, they
had passed a hundred yards ahead, and the sound of their
movements was lost.
CHAPTER X.
And chiefly thou, O spirit, that dost prefer,
Before all temples, the upright heart and pure,
Instruct me; for thou know'st.
Milton
.
The
spot in which Carlo Giuntotardi had taken refuge,
is well known on the Sorrentine shore, as the water-cavern,
at the ruins of Queen Joan's country-house. Cavern it is
not, though the entrance is beneath a low, natural arch;
the basin within being open to the heavens, and the place
resembling an artificial excavation, made to shelter boats in;
profiting by the natural passage to obtain an entrance. Let
the origin of this little haven be what it may, art could not
have devised a more convenient, or a more perfect refuge
than it afforded to our fugitives at a most critical moment.
Once through the arch, the boat would have been effectually
concealed from her pursuers, under a noon-day sun; nor
would any, who were unacquainted with the peculiarities of
the entrance, dream of a boat's lying, as it might be, buried
in the rocks of the little promontory. Neither Ghita nor
her uncle any longer felt concern; but, the former
announced
her intention to land here, assuring Raoul that she
could easily find her way into the bridle-path which leads to
St. Agata.
The desperate character of the recent chase, aided by his
late almost miraculous escape from death, joined to the
necessity of parting from his mistress, rendered our hero
melancholy, if not moody. He could not ask Ghita to share
his dangers any longer; and yet he felt, if he permitted her
now to quit him, the separation might be for ever. Still he
made no objection; but, leaving Ithuel in charge of the boat,
he assisted Ghita up the funnel-like sides of the basin, and
prepared to accompany her on her way to the road. Carlo
preceded the pair; telling his niece that she would find him
at a cottage on the way, that was well known to both.
The obscurity was not so great as to render the walking
very difficult; and Raoul and Ghita pursued their course
slowly along the rocks, each oppressed with the same
sensation
of regret at parting, though influenced by nearly
opposing views for the future. The girl took the young
man's arm without hesitation; and there was a tenderness
in the tones of her voice, as well as in her general manner,
that betrayed how nearly her heart was interested in what
was passing. Still, principle was ever uppermost in her
thoughts; and she determined, now, to speak plainly, and
to the purpose.
Raoul, she said, after listening to some one of those
fervent
declarations of love that were peculiarly agreeable to one
of her affectionate and sincere nature, even when she most felt
the necessity of repelling the insinuating suit; there must
be an end of this. I can never go through, again, the scenes
I have lately witnessed, nor allow you to run such fearful
risks. The sooner we understand each other, and I may
say, the sooner we part, it will be the wiser, and the better
for the interests of both. I blame myself, for suffering the
intimacy to last so long, and for proceeding so far.
And this is said by a fervent-souled Italian girl!One
of eighteen years;who comes of a region in which it is
the boast, that the heart is even warmer than the sun; of a
race, among whom it is hard to find
oneoui
, even a poor
one
who is not ready to sacrifice home, country, hopes,
fortune, nay, life itself, to give happiness to the man who
has chosen her from all the rest of her sex.
It
would
seem to
me
easy to do all this, Raoul.
Si
I
think I could sacrifice everything you have named, to make
you
happy! Home I have not, unless the Prince's Towers
can thus be called; country, since the sad event of this week,
I feel as if I had altogether lost; of hopes, I have few in this
world, with which your image has not been connected; but,
those which were once so precious to me, are now, I fear,
lost; you know I have no fortune, to tempt me to stay, or
you to follow; as for my life, I fear it will soon be very
valuelessam sure it will be miserable.
Then why not decide at once, dearest Ghita, to throw
the weight of your sorrows on the shoulders of one strong
enough to bear them? You care not for dress, or gay
appearances
,
and can take a bridegroom even with the
miserable
aspect of a lazzarone, when you know the heart is right.
You will not despise me because I am not decked as I might
be for the bridal. Nothing is easier than to find an altar
and a priest among these monasteries; and the hour for
saying mass is not very distant. Give me a right to claim
you, and I will appoint a place of rendezvous, bring in the
lugger to-morrow night, and carry you off in triumph to our
gay Provence; where you will find hearts gentle as your
own, to welcome you with joy, and call you sister.
Raoul was earnest in his manner, and it was not possible
to doubt his sincerity. Though an air of self-satisfaction
gleamed in his face, when he alluded to his present personal
appearance, for he well knew all his advantages in that way,
in spite of the dress of a lazzarone.
Urge me not, dear Raoul, Ghita answered, though,
unconsciously to herself, she pressed closer to his side, and
both sadness and love were in the very tones of her voice;
urge me not, dear Raoul; this can never be. I have
already told you the gulf that lies between us; you
will
not
cross it, to join
me
, and I
cannot
cross it, to join
you
.
Nothing but
that
could separate us; but that, to my eyes,
grows broader and deeper every hour.
Ah, Ghita, thou deceivest me, and thyself. Were thy
feelings as thou fanciest, no human inducement could lead
thee to reject me.
It is not a human inducement, Raoul; it is one above
earth, and all it holds.
Peste!These priests are scourges sent to torment men
in every shape! They inflict hard lessons in childhood,
teach asperity in youth, and make us superstitious and silly
in age. I do not wonder that my brave compatriots drove
them from France; they did nothing but devour like locusts,
and deface the beauties of providence.
Raoul, thou art speaking of the ministers of God!
Ghita observed meekly, but in sorrow.
Pardon me, dearest Ghita; I have no patience when I
remember what a trifle, after all, threatens to tear us
asunder
.
Thou pretendest to love me?
It is not pretence, Raoul, but a deep, and I fear, a
painful
reality.
To think that a girl so frank, with a heart so tender,
and a soul so true, will allow any secondary thing to divide
her from the man of her choice!
It is not a secondary, but a primary thing, Raoul; oh!
that I could make thee think so. The question is between
thee and Godwere it aught else, thou might'st indeed
prevail
.
Why trouble thyself about my religion, at all? Are
there not thousands of wives who tell their beads, and repeat
their aves, while their husbands think of anything but
heaven
?
Thou and I can overlook this difference; others
overlook them, and keep but one heart between them still.
I never would molest thee, Ghita, in thy gentle worship.
Vol. II.  12
It is not thou that I dread, Raoul, but myself;
answered
the girl, with streaming eyes, though she succeeded
in suppressing the sobs that struggled for utterance. `A
house divided against itself cannot stand,' they say; how
could a heart that was filled with thee, find place for the
love it ought to bear the author of its being. When the
husband lives only for the world, it is hard for the wife to
think of heaven as she ought.
Raoul was deeply touched with the feeling Ghita betrayed,
while he was ready to adore her for the confiding sincerity
with which she confessed his power over her heart. His
answer was given with seductive tenderness of manner,
which proved that he was not altogether unworthy of the
strange conflict he had created in so gentle a breast.
Thy God will never desert
thee
, Ghita, he said; thou
hast nothing to fear as my wife, or that of any other man.
None but a brute could ever think of molesting thee in thy
worship, or in doing aught that thy opinions render
necessary
,
or proper. I would tear the tongue from my mouth,
before reproach, sneer, or argument, should be used to bring
thee pain, after I once felt that thou leanedst on me for
support
.
All that I
have
said has come from the wish that
thou would'st not misunderstand me, in a matter that I
know thou think'st important.
Ah! Raoul, little dost thou understand the hearts of
women. If thy power is so great over me to-day, as almost
to incline me from the most solemn of all my duties, what
would it become when the love of a girl should turn into the
absorbing affection of a wife! I find it hard, even now, to
reconcile the love I bear to God, with the strong feeling thou
hast created in my heart. A year of wedded life would
endanger more than I can express to you in words.
And, then, the fear of losing thy salvation, is stronger
than thy earthly attachments?
Nay, Raoul, it is not
that
. I am not selfish, or cowardly
as respects myself, I hope; nor do I think, at all, of any
punishment
that might follow from a marriage with an
unbeliever
;
what I most apprehend is being taught to love my
God less than I feel I now do, or than, as the creature of his
mercy, I ought.
Thou speakest as if man could rival the being whom
thou worshippest. I have always understood, that the love
we bear the Deity, and that we bear each other, are of a
very different quality. I can see no necessity for their
interfering
with each other.
Nothing can be less alike, Raoul; yet one may impair,
if not destroy the other. Oh! if thou would'st but believe
that thy Saviour was thy God, if thou could'st but be dead
to his love, and not active against him, I might hope for
better things; but I
dare
not pledge all my earthly duties
to one who is openly an enemy of my own great Master and
Redeemer.
I will not, cannot deceive thee, Ghita
that
I leave to
the priests. Thou know'st my opinions, and must take me
as I am, or wholly reject me. This I say, though I feel
that disappointment, if you persist in your cruelty, will drive
me to some desperate act, by means of which I shall yet
taste of the mercies of these English.
Say not so, Raoul; be prudent for the sake of your
country
But not for thine, Ghita?
Yes, Raoul, and for mine also. I wish not to conceal
how much happier I shall be in hearing of your welfare and
peace of mind. I fear, though an enemy, it will ever give
me pleasure to learn that thou art victorious. But, here is
the road, yonder the cottage where my uncle waits for me,
and we must part. Heaven bless thee, Raoul; my prayers
will be full of thee. Do notdo not, risk more to see me,
but, if The heart of the girl was so full, that emotion
choked her. Raoul listened intently for the next word, but
he listened in vain.
If what, dear Ghita? Thou wert about to utter
something
that I feel is encouraging.
Oh! how I hope it may be so, my poor Raoul! I was
going to add, if God ever touches thy heart, and thou
would'st stand before his altar, a believer, with one at thy
side who is ready and anxious to devote all to thee, but her
love of the Being who created her, and her treasures of
future happiness, seek Ghita; thou wilt find
her
thou
would'st have.
Raoul stretched forth his arms to clasp the tender girl to
his bosom; but, fearful of herself, she avoided him, and fled
along the path like one terrified with the apprehension of
pursuit. The young man paused a moment, half inclined
to follow; then prudence regained its influence, and he
bethought
him of the necessity of getting to a place of safety
while it was yet night. The future was still before him, in
hope, and that hope led him to look forward to other
occasions
to press his suit.
Little, however, did Raoul Yvard, much as he prized her,
know Ghita Caraccioli. Her nature was full of womanly
sensibilities, it is true, and her heart replete with tenderness
for him in particular; but the adoration she paid to God,
was of that lasting character which endures to the end. In
all she said and felt, she was truth itself; and while no
false shame interposed to cause her to conceal her
attachment
,
there was a moral armour thrown about her purposes,
that rendered them impregnable to the assaults of the world.
Our hero found Ithuel sleeping in the boat, in perfect
security. The graniteman thoroughly understood his
situation
,
and foreseeing a long row before him, he had quietly
lain down in the stern-sheet of the yawl, and was taking his
rest, as tranquilly as he had ever done in his berth on board
le Feu-Follet. He was even aroused with difficulty, and he
resumed the oar with reluctance. Before descending the
funnel, Raoul had taken a survey of the water from the
rocks above. He listened intently, to catch any sounds that
might arise from the English boats. But nothing was visible
in the obscurity, while distance, or caution, prevented
anything
from being audible. Satisfied that all was safe
outside
,
he determined to row out into the Bay, and, making a
circuit to avoid his enemies, push to the westward, in the
expectation of finding his lugger in the offing. As there
was now a considerable land-breeze, and the yawl was
lightened of so much of her freight, there was little doubt
of his being able to effect his purpose, so far as getting out
of sight was concerned, at least, long ere the return of light.
Pardie
, Etooelle? Raoul exclaimed, after he had given
the American, jog the third, you sleep like a friar who is
paid for saying masses at midnight. Come, ami; now is
our time to move, for all is clear outside.
Well, natur', they say, is a good workman, Captain
Rule, answered Ithuel, gaping and rubbing his eyes; and
never did she turn off a prettier hiding-place than this. One
sleeps so quietly in it! Heigho! I suppose the ash must be
kept moving, or we may yet miss our passage back to
France. Shove her bows round, Captain Rule; here is the
hole, which is almost as hard to find, as it is to thread a
needle with a cable. A good shove, and she will shoot out
into the open water.
Raoul did as desired. Ithuel touching the tiller, the yawl
glided through the opening, and felt the long ground-swell
of the glorious Bay. The two adventurers looked about
them with some concern, as they issued from their-hiding
place, but the obscurity was too deep to bring anything in
view on the face of the waters. The flashing that
occasionally
illuminated the summit of Vesuvius, resembled
heat-lightning
,
and would have plainly indicated the position of
that celebrated mountain, had not its dark outlines been
visible, exposing a black mass at the head of the Bay. The
ragged mountain-tops, behind and above Castel a Mare,
were also to be traced, as was the whole range of the
nearer coast, though that opposite was only discoverable
by the faint glimmerings of a thousand lights, that were
appearing and disappearing, like stars eclipsed, on the other
side of the broad sheet of placid water. On the Bay itself,
little could be discerned; under the near coast, nothing, the
shadows of the rocks obscuring its borders with a wide belt
of darkness.
After looking around them quite a minute in silence, the
men dropped their oars, and began to pull from under the
point, with the intention of making an offing before they set
their little luggs. As they came out, the heavy flap of
canvass
,
quite near, startled their ears, and both turned
instinctively
to look ahead. There, indeed, was a vessel, standing
directly in, threatening even to cross their very track. She
was close on a wind, with her larboard tacks aboard, and
had evidently just shaken everything, in the expectation of
luffing past the point without tacking. Could she succeed
in this, it would be in her power to stand on, until
compelled
to go about beneath the very cliffs of the town of
Sorrento. This was, in truth, her aim; for again she
shook all her sails.
Peste! muttered Raoul; this is a bold pilothe loves
12*
the rocks, as if they were his mistress! We must lie quiet,
Etooelle, and let him pass; else he may trouble us.
'Twill be the wisest, Captain Rule; though I do not think
him an Englishman. Hark! The ripple under his bow is
like that of a knife going through a ripe water-melon.
Mon Feu-Follet! exclaimed Raoul, rising and actually
extending his arms, as if to embrace the beloved craft.
Etooelle, they seek us, for we are much behind our
time!
The stranger drew near fast; when his outlines became
visible, there was no mistaking them. The two enormous
luggs, the little jigger, the hull, almost awash, and the whole
of the fairy form, came mistily into view, as the swift bird
assumes colour and proportion, while it advances out of the
depth of the void. The vessel was but a hundred yards
distant; in another minute, she would be past.
Vive la Republique!
said Raoul, distinctly, though he
feared to trust his voice with a loud hail.
Again the canvass flapped, and the trampling of feet was
heard on the lugger's deck; then she came sweeping into
the wind, within fifty feet of the yawl. Raoul watched the
movement; and by the time her way was nearly lost, he
was alongside, and had caught a rope. At the next instant,
he was on board her.
Raoul trod the deck of his lugger, again, with the pride
of a monarch, as he ascends his throne. Certain of her
sailing qualities, and confident of his own skill, this gallant
seaman was perfectly indifferent to the circumstance that he
was environed by powerful enemies. The wind and the
hour were propitious, and no sensation of alarm disturbed
the exultation of that happy moment. The explanations
that passed between him and his first-lieutenant, Pintard,
were brief but distinct. Le Feu-Follet had kept off the land,
with her sails lowered, a trim in which a vessel of her rig
and lowness in the water would not be visible more than five
or six miles, until sufficient time had elapsed, when she was
taken into the Gulf of Salerno, to look for signals from the
heights of St. Agata. Finding none, she went to sea again,
as has been stated, sweeping along the coast, in the hope of
falling in with intelligence. Although she could not be seen
by her enemies, she saw the three cruisers who were on the
look-out, and great uneasiness prevailed on board,
concerning
the fates of the absentees. On the afternoon of that
day, the lugger was carried close in with the north-west side
of Ischia, which island she rounded at dusk, seemingly
intending to anchor at Bai, a harbour seldom without allied
cruisers. As the wind came off the land, however, she kept
away, and passing between Procida and Mysenum, she came
out into the Bay of Naples, about three hours before meeting
with Raoul, with the intention of examining the whole of the
opposite coast, in search of the yawl. She had seen the
light at the gaff of the Proserpine, and, at first, supposed it
might be a signal from the missing boat. With a view to
make sure of it, the lugger had been kept away, until the
night-glasses announced a ship; when she was hauled up on
a wind, and had made two or three successive half-boards,
to weather the point where her captain lay concealed; the
Marina Grande of Sorrento being one of the places of
rendezvous
mentioned by our hero, in his last instructions.
There was a scene of lively congratulation, and of even
pleasing emotion, on the deck of the lugger, when Raoul so
unexpectedly appeared. He had every quality to make
himself beloved by his men. Brave, adventurous, active,
generous and kind-hearted, his qualities rendered him a
favourite to a degree that was not common even among the
people of that chivalrous nation. The French mariner will
bear familiarity better than his great rival and neighbour,
the Englishman; and it was natural with our hero to be
frank and free with all; whether above him or below him in
condition. The temperaments to be brought into subjection
were not as rude and intractable as those of the Anglo-Saxon;
and the off-hand, dashing character of Raoul was admirably
adapted to win both the admiration and the affections of his
people. They now thronged about him, without hesitation
or reserve, each man anxious to make his good wishes
known, his felicitations heard.
I have kept you playing about the fire,
camarades
,
said Raoul, affected by the proofs of attachment he received;
but, we will now take our revenge. There are English
boats in chase of me, at this moment, under the land; we
will try to pick up one or two of them, by way of letting
them know there is still such a vessel as le Feu-Follet.
An exclamation of pleasure followed; then an old
quarter-master
,
who had actually taught his commander his first
lessons in seamanship, shoved through the crowd, and put
his questions with a sort of authority.
Mon capitaine
, he said, have you been near these
English?
Ay, Benoit; somewhat nearer than I could wish. To
own the truth, the reason you have not sooner seen me, was,
that I was passing my time on board our old friend, La
Proserpine
.
Her officers and crew would not lose my company,
when they had once begun to enjoy it.
Peste!mon cher capitaine
were you a prisoner?
Something of that sort, Benoit. At least, they had me
on a grafing, with a rope round the neck, and were about
to make me swing off, as a spy, when a happy gun or two,
from Nelson, up above there, at the town, ordered them to
let me go below. As I had no taste for such amusements,
and wanted to see mon cher Feu-Follet, Etooelle and I got
into the yawl, and left them; intending to return and be
hanged, when we can find nothing better to do.
This account required an explanation, which Raoul gave
in a very few words, and then the crew were directed to go
to their stations, in order that the lugger might be properly
worked. The next minute the sails were filled, on the
larboard-tack
,
as before, and le Feu-Follet again drew ahead,
standing in for the cliffs.
There is a light in motion, near Capri, mon capitaine,
observed the first-lieutenant; I suppose it to be on board
some enemy. They are plenty as gulls, about this bay.
You are very right, Monsieur. 'Tis la Prosperine;
she shows the light for her boats. She is too far to leeward
to meddle with us, however, and we are pretty certain
there is nothing between her and the ships off the town,
that can do us any harm. Are all our lights concealed?
Let them be well looked to, monsieur.
All safe, mon capitaine. Le Feu-Follet never shows her
lantern, until she wishes to lead an enemy into the mire!
Raoul laughed, and pronounced the word
bon
in
the emphatic manner peculiar to a Frenchman. Then, as
the lugger was drawing swiftly in towards the rocks, he
went on the forecastle himself, to keep a proper look-out
ahead; Ithuel, as usual, standing at his side.
The piano, or plain, of Sorrento terminates, on the side
of the bay, in perpendicular cliffs of tufa, that vary from one
to near two hundred feet in height. Those near the town
are among the highest, and are lined with villas, convents,
and other dwellings, of which the foundations are frequently
placed upon shelves of rock, fifty feet below the adjacent
streets. Raoul had been often here, during the short reign of
the Rufo faction, and was familiar with most of the coast.
He knew that his little lugger might brush against the very
rocks, in most places, and was satisfied that if he fell in
with the Prosperine's boats at all, it must be quite near the
land. As the night wind blew directly down the bay,
sighing
across the campagna between Vesuvius and Castel a
Mare, it became necessary to tack off-shore, as soon as le
Feu-Follet got close to the cliffs, where the obscurity was
greatest, and her proportions and rig were not discernible
at any distance. While in the very act of going round, and
before the head-sheets were drawn, Raoul was startled by a
sudden hail.
Felucca, ahoy! cried one, in English, from a boat
that was close on the lugger's bow.
Halloo! answered Ithuel, raising an arm, for all near
him to be quiet.
What craft's that? resumed he in the boat.
A felucca sent down by the admiral, to look for the
Proserpinenot finding her at Capri, we are turning up to
the anchorage of the fleet again.
Hold on a moment, sir, if you please; I'll come on
board you. Perhaps, I can help you out of your difficulty;
for I happen to know something of that ship.
Ay, ay  bear a hand, if you please; for we want to
make the most of this wind while it stands.
It is singular how easily we are deceived, when the mind
commences by taking a wrong direction. Such was now
the fact, with him in the boat, for he had imbibed the
notion that he could trace the outlines of a felucca, of
which so many navigate those waters, and the idea that it was
the very lugger he had been seeking, never crossed his mind.
Acting under the delusion, he was soon alongside, and on
the deck of his enemy.
Do you know this gentleman, Etooelle? demanded
Raoul, who had gone to the gangway to receive his visiter.
It is Mr. Clinch, the master's-mate of the accursed
Proserpine
;
he who spoke us in the yawl, off the point
yonder
.
How! exclaimed Clinch, his alarm being sufficiently
apparent in his voice; have I fallen into the hands of
Frenchmen?
You have, Monsieur, answered Raoul, courteously, but
not into the hands of enemies. This is le Feu-Follet, and
I am Raoul Yvard.
Then all hope for Jane is gone, for ever!I have
passed
a happy day, though a busy one, for I did begin to think
there was some chance for me. A man cannot see Nelson
without pulling up, and wishing to be something like him;
but, a prison is no place for promotion.
Let us go into my cabin, Monsieur. There we can
converse
more at our ease; and we shall have a light.
Clinch was in despair; it mattered not to him, whither
he was taken. In the cabin he sat the picture of a helpless
man, and a bottle of brandy happening to stand on the table,
he eyed it with something like the ferocity with which the
hungry wolf may be supposed to gaze at the lamb ere he
leaps the fold.
Is this the gentleman you mean, Etooelle? demanded
Raoul, when the cabin-lamp shone on the prisoner's face;
he who was so much rejoiced to hear that his enemy was
not
hanged?
'Tis the same, Captain Rule; in the main, he is a
good-natured
officerone that does more harm to himself than
to any one else. They said, in the ship, that he went up to
Naples to do you some good turn or other.
Bon!
You have been long in your boat, Mr. Clinch
we will give you a warm supper and a glass of wine
after which, you are at liberty to seek your frigate, and to
return
to your own flag.
Clinch stared as if he did not, or could not, believe what
he heardthen the truth flashed on his mind, and he burst
into tears. Throughout that day his feelings had been in
extremes, hope once more opening a long vista of happiness
for the future, through the renewed confidence and advice of his
captain. Thus far he had done well, and it was by striving
to do still better that he had fallen into the hands of the enemy.
For a single moment the beautiful fabric which revived hopes
had been industriously weaving throughout the day, was
torn into tatters. The kindness of Raoul's manner,
however
,
his words, and the explanations of Ithuel, removed a
mountain from his breast, and he became quite unmanned.
There is none so debased as not to retain glimmerings of
the bright spirit that is associated with the grosser particles
of their material nature. Clinch had in him the living
consciousness
that he was capable of better things, and he
endured
moments of deep anguish, as the image of the patient,
self-devoting, and constant Jane rose before his mind's eye
to reproach him with his weaknesses.
It is true that she never made these reproaches in terms;
so far from that, she would not even believe the slanders of
those she mistook for his enemies; but Clinch could not
always quiet the spirit within him, and he often felt
degraded
as he remembered with how much more firmness Jane
supported the loud of hope deferred, than he did himself.
The recent interview with Cuffe had aroused all that was
left of ambition and self-respect, and he had left the ship
that morning with a full and manly determination to reform,
and to make one continued and persevering effort to obtain
a commission, and with it Jane. Then followed capture
and the moment of deep despair. But Raoul's generosity
removed the load, and again the prospect brightened.
CHAPTER XI.
Oh! many a dream was in the ship
An hour before her death;
And sight of home, with sighs disturb'd
The sleeper's long-drawn breath.
Wilson
.
Raoul
soon decided on his course. While he was
consoling
Clinch, orders had been sent to Pintard to look for
the other gig; but a few minutes' search, under the cliffs,
satisfied those on deck that she was not to be found; and the
fact was so reported below. Nor could all Ithuel's ingenuity
extract from the captured boat's crew, any available
information
on the subject. There was an
esprit de corps
among
the Proserpines, as between their own ship and le Feu-Follet,
which would have withstood, on an occasion like this, both
threats and bribes; and he of the Granite state was compelled
to give the matter up as hopeless; though, in so doing, he
did not fail to ascribe the refusal to betray their shipmates,
on the part of these men, to English obstinacy, rather than
to any creditable feeling. The disposition to impute the
worst, to those he hated, however, was not peculiar to Ithuel
or his country; it being pretty certain he would have fared
no better on board the English frigate, under circumstances
at all analogous.
Satisfied, at length, that the other boat had escaped him,
and feeling the necessity of getting out of the Bay while it
was still dark, Raoul reluctantly gave the order to bear up,
and put the lugger dead before the wind, wing-and-wing.
By the time this was done, the light craft had turned so far
to windward, as to be under the noble rocks that separate the
piano of Sorrento from the shores of Vico; a bold
promontory
,
that buttresses the sea, with a wall of near or quite a
thousand feet in perpendicular height. Here she felt the
full force of the land-wind; and when her helm was put up,
and her sheets eased off, a bird turning on the wing would
not have come round more gracefully, and scarcely with
greater velocity. The course now lay from point to point,
in order to avoid being becalmed within the indentations of
the coast. This carried the lugger athwart the cove of
Sorrento
,
rather than into it, and, of course, left Yelverton, who
had landed at the smaller marina, quite out of the line of her
course.
So swift was the progress of the little craft, that within
fifteen minutes after bearing up, Raoul and Ithuel, who again
occupied their stations on the forecastle, saw the head-land
where they had so lately been concealed, and ordered the
helm a-port, in order to sheer out and give it a berth. Then
rock was passed after rock, cove after cove, and village after
village, until the entrance between Capri and Campanella
was again reached. In sweeping down the shore, in this
manner, the intention was to pick up any boat that might
happen
to be in the lugger's track; for, while Raoul was disposed
to let his prisoner go, he had a strong desire to seize any other
officers of the frigate that might fall in his way. The search
was ineffectual, however; and when the lugger came out
into the open sea, all expectation of further success, of this
nature, was reluctantly abandoned.
As le Feu-Follet was now in dangerous proximity to three
cruisers of the enemy, the moment was one that called for
decision. Fortunately, the positions of the English vessels
were known to Raoul, a circumstance that lessened the
danger, certainly; but it would not do to continue long
within a league of their anchorage, with the risk of the land
breezes failing. As yet the darkness, and the shadows of
the land, concealed the privateer, and her commander
determined
,
if not literally to make hay while the sun shone,
at least to profit by its absence. With this view, then, he
ordered the lugger hove-to, the boat of Clinch hauled to the
lee gangway, and the prisoners to be all brought on deck;
the common men, in the waist, and the master's-mate, aft.
Here I must lose the pleasure of your company,
Monsieur
Clinch, said Raoul, with a courtesy that may almost
be termed national. We are quite as near
votre belle
Proserpine
as is safe, and
I
long for
notre belle France
.
The wind is fair to take us off the coast, and two hours will
carry us out of sight, even were it noon-day. You will have
the complaisance to make my duty to Monsieur Cuffeoui
Vol. II.  13
pardie!
and to
ces braves Italiens
, who are so much ze
amis of Sir Smees!
Touchez-la
.
Raoul laughed, for his heart was light, and sundry droll
conceits danced through his brain. As for Clinch, the whole
was Greek to him, with the exception that he understood it
was the intention of the French to take their vessel off the
coast, a circumstance that he was not sorry to learn, though
he would have given so much, a few hours earlier, to have
known where to find her. Raoul's generosity had worked
a revolution in his feelings, however, and nothing was
farther
from his wishes, now, than to be employed against the
celebrated privateersman. Still, he had a duty to perform
to the service of which he was a member, another to Jane,
and a last to himself.
Captain Yvard, said the master's-mate, taking the
other's offered hand, I shall never forget this kindness on
your part; it comes at a most fortunate moment for me.
My happiness in this world, and perhaps in the world to
come,an ejaculation of bah! involuntarily escaped the
listenerdepended on my being at liberty. I hold it to
be fair, however, to tell you the whole truth. I must do all
I can to capture or destroy this very lugger, as well as any
other of the king's enemies, as soon as I am my own master
again.
Bon!
I like your frankness, Monsieur Clinch, as
much as I like your humanity. I always look for a brave
enemy when
un Anglais
comes against me; if you are ever
in the number, I shall expect nothing worse.
It will be my duty, Captain Yvard, to report to Captain
Cuffe, where I found the Folly, where I left her, and where
I think she is steering! Even your armament, crew, and
all such little particulars, I shall be questioned on; I must
answer honestly.
Mon cher
, you are `honest fellow,' as you Anglais say.
I wish it was noon-day, that you might better see our deck
Le Feu-Follet is not ugly, that she should wish to wear a
veil. Tell everything, Clinch, mon brave; of Monsieur
Cuffe wish to send another party against our lugger, come
in the first boat
en personne
. We shall always be happy to
see Monsieur Clinch. As for where we steer, you see our
head is toward la belle France; and there is plenty of room
for a long chase.
Adieu, mon amiau revoir
.
Clinch now shook hands, heartily, with all the officers;
again expressed his sense of the liberality with which he
was treated, and this, too, with emotion; then he followed
his people into the boat, and pulled away from the lugger's
side, holding his course toward the light which was still
burning on board the Proserpine. At the same time le
Feu-Follet
filled, and soon disappeared from his eyes, in the
darkness, running off, wing-and-wing, and steering west, as
if really making the best of her way towards the Straits of
Bonifacio, on her road to France.
But, in fact, Raoul had no such intention. His cruise
was not up, and his present position, surrounded as he was
with enemies, was full of attraction to one of his temperament.
Only the day before he appeared in the disguise of a
lazzarone
,
he had captured, manned, and sent to Marseilles a
valuable store-ship; and he knew that another was hourly
expected in the bay. This was an excuse to his people for
remaining where they were. But the excitement of
constantly
running the gauntlet, the pleasure of demonstrating
the superior sailing of his lugger, the opportunities for
distinction
,
and every other professional motive, was trifling, as
compared with the tie which bound him to, the feeling that
unceasingly attracted him towards Ghita. With his love,
also, there began to mingle a sensation approaching to
despair. While Ghita was so gentle, and even tender, with
him, he had ever found her consistent, and singularly firm
in her principles. In their recent dialogues, some that we
have forborne to relate on account of their peculiar
character
,
Ghita had expressed her reluctance to trust her fate with
one whose God was not her God, with a distinctness and
force that left no doubt of the seriousness of her views, or
of her ability to sustain them in acts. What rendered her
resolution more impressive, was the ingenuous manner
with which she never hesitated to admit Raoul's power over
her affections, leaving no pretext for the common-place
supposition
that the girl was acting. The conversation of that
night, weighed heavily on the heart of the lover, and he could
not summon sufficient resolution to part  perhaps for
months  with such an apparent breach between him and
his hopes.
As soon as it was known, therefore, that the lugger was
far enough at sea, to be out of sight from the boat of Clinch,
she came by the wind on the larboard tack, again, heading
up towards the celebrated ruins of Pstum, on the eastern
shore of the Bay of Salerno. To one accustomed to the
sea, there would not have seemed sufficient wind to urge
even that light craft along, at the rate with which she glided
through the water. But the land breeze was charged with
the damps of midnight; the canvass was thickened from the
same cause; and the propelling power had nearly double its
apparent force. In an hour after hauling up, le Feu-Follet
tacked, quite eight miles distant from the spot where she
altered her direction, and far enough to windward to lay her
course in, directly for the cliffs beneath the village of St.
Agata; or the present residence of Ghita. In proceeding
thus, Raoul had a double intention before him. English
ships were constantly passing between Sicily, Malta, and
Naples; and, as those bound north would naturally draw in
with the land at this point, his position might enable him to
strike a sudden blow, with the return of day, should any
suitable vessel be in the offing next morning. Then he hoped
for a signal from Ghita, at leastand such things were very
dear to his heart; or, possibly, anxiety and affection might
bring her down to the water-side, when another interview
would be possible. This was the weakness of passion; and
Raoul submitted to its power, like feebler-minded and less
resolute men; the hero becoming little better than the vulgar
herd, under its influence.
The two or three last days and nights had been hours of
extreme anxiety and care to the officers and crew of the
lugger, as well as to their commander, and all on board
began to feel the necessity of sleep. As for Ithuel, he had
been in his hammock an hour; and Raoul now thought
seriously of following his example. Giving his instructions
to the young lieutenant who was in charge of the deck, our
hero went below, and, in a few minutes, he was also lost to
present hopes and fears.
Everything seemed propitious to the lugger, and the
intentions
of her commander. The wind went down, gradually,
until there was little more than air enough to keep
steerage-way
on the vessel, while the ripple on the water disappeared,
leaving nothing behind it but the long, heavy, ground-swell,
that always stirs the bosom of the ocean, like the heaving
respiration of some gigantic animal. The morning grew
darker, but the surface of the gulf was glassy and tranquil,
leaving no immediate motive for watchfulness, or care.
These are the lethargic moments of a seaman's life. Days
of toil bring nights of drowsiness; and the repose of nature
presents a constant temptation to imitate her example. The
reaction of excitement destroys the disposition to indulge in
the song, the jest, or the tale; and the mind, like the body,
is disposed to rest from its labours. Even the murmuring
wash of the water, as it rises and falls against the vessel's
sides, sounds like a lullaby, and sleep seems to be the one
great blessing of existence. Under such circumstances,
therefore, it is not surprising that the watch on the deck of
the lugger, indulged this necessary want. It is permitted to
the common men to doze at such moments, while a few are
on the alert; but, even duty, in the absence of necessity,
feels its task to be irksome, and difficult of performance.
Look-out after look-out lowered his head; the young man
who was seated on the arm-chest aft began to lose his
consciousness
of present things, in dreamy recollections of
Provence
,
his home, and the girl of his youthful admiration.
The seman at the helm alone kept his eyes open, and all
his faculties on the alert. This is a station in which
vigilance
is ever required; and it sometimes happens, in vessels
where the rigid discipline of a regular service does not exist,
that others rely so much on the circumstance, that they
forget
their own duties, in depending on the due discharge of
his, by the man at the wheel.
Such, to a certain degree, was now the fact on board le
Feu-Follet. One of the best seamen in the lugger was at
the helm, and each individual felt satisfied that no shift of
wind could occur, no change of sails become necessary, that
Antoine would not be there to admonish them of the
circumstance
.
One day was so much like another, too, in that
tranquil season of the year, and in that luxurious sea, that
all on board knew the regular mutations that the hours
produced
.
The southerly air in the morning; the zephyr in
the afternoon; and the land wind at night, were as much
matters of course, as the rising and setting of the sun. No
12*
one felt apprehension, while all submitted to the influence
of a want of rest, and of the drowsiness of the climate.
Not so with Antoine. His hairs were grey. Sleep was
no longer so necessary to him. He had much pride of
calling, too; was long experienced, and possessed senses
sharpened and rendered critical by practice, and many
dangers
.
Time and again, did he turn his eyes towards
Campanella
,
to ascertain if any signs of the enemy were in sight;
the obscurity prevented anything from being visible, but the
dark outline of the high and rock-bound coast. Then he
glanced his eyes over the deck, and felt how completely
everything depended on his own vigilance and faithfulness.
The look at the sails and to windward brought no cause for
uneasiness, however, and presuming on his isolation, he
began to sing, in suppressed tones, an air of the Troubadours;
one that he had learned in childhood, in his native
langue
du midi
. Thus passed the minutes, until Antoine saw the
first glimmerings of morning, peeping out of the darkness,
that came above the mountain-tops, that lay in the vicinity
of Eboli. Antoine felt solitary; he was not sorry to greet
these symptoms of a return to the animation and communion
of a new day.
Hist!
mon lieutenant!
whispered the old mariner,
unwilling
to expose the drowsiness of his young superior to the
gaze of the common men;
mon lieutenant
'tis I, Antoine.
Eh!
bah!Oh, Antoine est-ce-que toi? Bon
what
would you have,
mon ami
.
I hear the surf, I think,
mon lieutenant
. Listenis not
that the water striking on the rocks of the shore?
Jamais!
You see the land is a mile from us; this coast
has no shoals. The captain told us to stand close in, before
we hove-to, or called him.
Pardie!
Antoine, how the
little witch has travelled in my watch! Here we are, within
a musket's range from the heights, yet there has been no
wind.
Pardon, mon lieutenant
I do not like that sound of
the surf; it is too near for the shore. Will you have the
kindness to step on the forecastle and look ahead, monsieur?
the light is beginning to be of use.
The young man yawned, stretched his arms, and walked
forward; the first to indulge himself, the first, also, to relieve
the uneasiness of an old shipmate, whose experience he
respected. Still his step was not as quick as common, and
it was near a minute ere he reached the bows, or before he
gained the knight-heads. But his form was no sooner visible
there, than he waved his arms frantically, and shouted in a
voice that reached the recesses of the vessel
Hard up  hard up with the helm, Antoine  ease off
the sheets,
mes enfans!
Le Feu-Follet rose on a heavy ground-swell, at that
moment; in the next she settled down with a shock
resembling
that which we experience when we leap and alight
sooner than was expected; there she lay cradled in a bed of
rocks, as immoveable as one of the stones around her;
stones that had mocked the billows of the Mediterranean,
within the known annals of man, more than three thousand
years. In a word, the lugger had struck on one of those
celebrated islets, under the heights of St. Agata, known as
the Islands of the Sirens, and which are believed to have
been commemorated by the oldest of all the living profane
writers, Homer himself. The blow was hardly given, before
Raoul appeared on deck. The vessel gave up all that had
life in her, and she was, at once, a scene of alarm, activity,
and exertion.
It is at such a moment as this, that the most useful
qualities
of a naval captain render themselves apparent. Of all
around him, Raoul was the calmest, the most collected, and
the best qualified to issue the orders that had become
necessary
.
He made no exclamations  uttered not a word of
reproach  cast not even a glance of disapprobation on any
near him. The mischief was done; the one thing needful
was to repair it, if possible, leaving to the future the cares
of discipline and the distribution of rewards and punishments.
She is as fast anchored as a cathedral, mon lieutenant,
he quietly observed to the very officer through whose
remissness
the accident had occurred; I see no use in these sails.
Take them in, at once; they may set her further on the
rocks, should she happen to lift.
The young man obeyed; every nerve in his body agitated
by the sense of delinquency. Then he walked aft, cast one
look around him at the desperate condition of the lugger,
and, with the impetuosity of character that belongs to his
country, he plunged into the sea, from which his body never
re-appeared. The melancholy suicide was immediately
reported
to Raoul.
Bon
was the answer. Had he done it an hour
earlier
,
le Feu-Follet would not have been set up on these rocks,
like a vessel in a ship-yard
mais, mes enfans, courage!
We'll yet see if our beautiful lugger cannot be saved.
If there were stocism and bitterness in this answer, there
was not deliberate cruelty. Raoul loved his lugger, next to
Ghita, before all things on earth, and, in his eyes, the fault
of wrecking her in a calm, was to be classed among the
unpardonable sins. Still, it was by no means a rare
occurrence
.
Ships, like men, are often cast away by an excess
of confidence; and our own coast, one of the safest in the
known world for the prudent mariner to approach, on
account
of the regularity of its soundings, has many a tale to
tell of disasters similar to this, which have occurred, simply
because no signs of danger were apparent. Our hero would
not have excused himself for such negligence, and that which
self-love will not induce us to pardon, will hardly be
conceded
to philanthropy.
The pumps were sounded, and it was ascertained that the
lugger had come down so easily into her bed, and lay there
with so little straining of her seams, that she continued tight
as a bottle. This left all the hope which circumstances
would allow, of still saving the vessel. Raoul neglected no
useful precaution. By this time the light was strong enough
to enable him to see a felucca coming slowly down from
Salerno, before the wind, or all that was still left of the night
air, and he despatched Ithuel with an armed boat to seize
her, and bring her alongside of the rocks. He took this
course with the double purpose of using the prize, if
practicable
,
in getting his own vessel off, or, in the last resort,
of making his own escape, and that of his people, in her
to France. He did not condescend to explain his motives,
however; nor did any one presume to inquire into them.
Raoul was now strictly a commander, acting in a desperate
emergency. He even succeeded in suppressing the
constitutional
volubility of his countrymen, and in substituting for
it the deep, attentive silence of thorough discipline; one of
the great causes of his own unusual success in maritime
enterprises. To the want of this very silence and attention
may be ascribed so many of those naval disasters which
have undeniably befallen a people of singular enterprise and
courage. Those who wish them well, will be glad to learn
that the evil has been, in a great measure, repaired.
As soon as the boat was sent to seize the felucca, the
yawl was put into the water, and Raoul, himself, began to
sound around the lugger. The rocks of the Sirens, as the
islets are called to this day, are sufficiently elevated above
the surface of the sea to be visible at some distance; though,
lying in a line with the coast, it would not have been easy
for the look-outs of le Feu-Follet to discern them at the hour
when she struck, even had they been on the alert. The
increasing light, however, enabled the French fully to
ascertain
their position, and to learn the extent of the evil.
The lugger had been lifted into a crevice between two of the
rocks, by a ground-swell heavier than common; and though
there was deep water all round her, it would be impossible
to get her afloat again without lightening. So long as the
wind did not blow, and the sea did not rise, she was safe
enough; but a swell that should force the hull to rise and
fall, would inevitably cause her to bilge. These facts were
learned in five minutes after the yawl was in the water, and
much did Raoul rejoice at having so promptly sent Ithuel in
quest of the felucca. The rocks were next reconnoitred, in
order to ascertain what facilities they offered to favour the
discharging of the vessel's stores. Some of them were high
enough to protect articles from the wash of the water, but it is
at all times difficult to lie alongside of rocks that are
exposed
to the open sea; the heaving and setting of the
element
,
even in calms, causing the elevation of its surface so
much to vary. On the present occasion, however, the
French found less swell than common, and that it was
possible
to get their stores ashore at two or three different
points.
Raoul now directed the work to commence in earnest.
The lugger carried four boats; viza launch, a cutter, the
yawl, and a jolly-boat. The second had been sent after the
felucca, with a strong crew in her; but the three others
were employed in discharging stores. Raoul perceived at
once that the moment was not one for half-way measures,
and that large sacrifices must be made, to save the hull of
the vessel. This, and the safety of his crew, were the two
great objects he kept before him. All his measures were
directed to that end. The water was started, in the
lugger's
hold, by staving the casks, and the pumps were set in
motion, as soon as possible. Provisions, of all sorts, were
cast into the sea, for le Feu-Follet had recently supplied
herself, from a prize, and was a little deeper than her best
trim allowed. In short, everything that could be spared, was
thrown overboard, barely a sufficiency of food and water
being retained, to last the people, until they could reach
Corcica; whither it was their captain's intention to proceed,
the moment he got his vessel afloat.
The Mediterranean has no regular tides, though the water
rises and falls materially, at irregular intervals; either the
effect of gales, or of the influence of the adjacent seas. This
circumstance prevented the calamity of having gone ashore,
at high water, while it also prevented the mariners from
profiting by any flood. It left them, as they had been placed
by the accident, itself, mainly dependent on their own
exertions
.
Under such circumstances, then, our hero set about the
discharge of his responsible duties. An hour of active toil,
well directed, and perseveringly continued, wrought a material
change. The vessel was small, while the number of hands
was relatively large. At the end of the time mentioned, the
officer charged with the duty, reported that the hull moved
under the power of the heaving sea, and that it might soon
be expected to strike, with a force to endanger its planks
and ribs. This was the sign to cease discharging, and to
complete the preparations that had been making, for
heaving
the lugger off; it being unsafe to delay that process,
after the weight was sufficiently lessened, to allow it. The
launch had carried out an anchor, and was already
returning
towards the rocks, paying out cable, as it came in.
But the depth of the water rendered this an anxious service,
since there was the danger of dragging the ground-tackle
home, as it is termed, on account of the angle at which it
lay.
At this moment, with the exception of the difficulty last
named, everything seemed propitious. The wind had gone
down entirely, the southerly air having lasted but a short
time, and no other succeeding it. The sea was, certainly,
not more disturbed than it had been all the morning, which
was at its minimum of motion, while the day promised to
be calm and clear. Nothing was in sight but the felucca,
and she was not only in Ithuel's possession, but she had
drawn within half-a-mile of the rocks, and was sweeping
still nearer at each instant. In ten minutes she must come
alongside. Raoul had ascertained that there was water
enough, where le Feu-Follet lay, to permit a vessel like his
prize, to touch her; and many things lay on deck, in
readiness
to be transferred to this tender, previously to beginning
to heave. The rocks, too, were well garnished with casks.
cordage, shot, ballast, and such other articles as could be
come atthe armament and amunition excepted. These
last our hero always treated with religious care, for, in all
he did, there was a latent determination resolutely to defend
himself. But, there were no signs of any such necessity's
being likely to occur, and the officers began to flatter
themselves
,
with their ability to get their lugger afloat, and in
sailing trim, before the usual afternoon's breeze should set
in. In waiting, therefore, for the arrival of the felucca,
and, in order that the work might meet with no
interruption
,
when the men once began to heave, the people were
ordered to get their breakfasts.
This pause in the proceedings gave Raoul an opportunity
to look about him, and to reflect. Twenty times did he
turn his eyes, anxiously, towards the heights of St. Agata,
where there existed subjects equally of attraction and
apprehension
.
It is scarcely necessary to say that the first was
Ghita; while the last arose from the fear that some curious
eye might recognise the lugger, and report her condition to
the enemies known to be lying at Capri; only a league or
two on the other side of the hills. But all was seemingly
tranquil there, at that early hour; and the lugger making
very little show when her canvass was not spread, there was
reason to hope that the accident was as yet unseen. The
approach of the felucca would probably betray it; though
the precaution had been taken to order Ithuel to show no
signs of national character.
Raoul Yvard was a very different man, at this moment
of leisure and idleness, from what he had been a few hours
earlier. Then he trod the deck of his little cruiser with some
such feelings as the man who exults in his strength, and
rejoices in his youth. Now he felt as all are apt to feel
who are rebuked by misfortunes and disease. Nevertheless,
his character had lost none of its high chivalry; and even
there, as he sat on the taffrail of the stranded Feu-Follet, he
meditated carrying some stout Englishman by surprise and
boarding, in the event of his not succeeding in getting off
the lugger. The felucca would greatly aid such an
enterprise
;
and his crew was strong enough, as well as
sufficiently
trained, to promise success.
On such an expedient, even, was he ruminating, as Ithuel,
in obedience to an order given through the trumpet, brought
his prize alongside, and secured her to the lugger. The men
who had accompanied the American were now dismissed to
their morning's meal, while Raoul invited their leader to
share his frugal repast, where he sat. As the two broke
their fasts, questions were put and answered, concerning what
had occurred, during the hour or two the parties had been
separated. Raoul's tale was soon told; but the other learned
with concern, that the crew of the felucca had taken to their
boat, and escaped to the landing of the Scaricatojo, on
finding
that the capture of their vessel was inevitable. This
proved that the character of the wreck was known, and left
but little hope that their situation would not be reported to
the English, in the course of the morning.
CHAPTER XII.
But now lead on;
In me is no delay; with thee to go,
Is to stay here; with thee here to stay,
Is to go hence unwilling; thou to me
Art all things under heav'n, all places thou.
Milton
.
The
intelligence communicated by Ithuel essentially
altered Raoul's views of his actual situation. An active man
might go from the Marinella, at the foot of the Scaricatojo,
or the place where the crew of the felucca had landed, to
the Marina Grande of Sorrento, in an hour. At the latter
beach, boats were always to be found, and two hours
more would carry the messenger, by water, to the ships off
Capri, even in a calm. The first of these important hours
had now elapsed some time; and he could not doubt that
vigorous arms were already employed in pulling across the
few leagues of water that separated the island from the shores
of Sorrento. The day was calm, it is true; and it would be
impossible to move the ships; but two frigates and a heavy
sloop-of-war, might send such a force against him in boats,
as, in his present situation, would render resistance next to
hopeless.
Raoul ceased eating, and, standing on the taffrail, he cast
anxious looks around him. His sturdy followers, ignorant
of all the dangers by which they were environed, were
consuming
their morning's meal, with the characteristic
indifference
to danger that marks the ordinary conduct of
seamen
.
Even Ithuel, usually so sensitive on the subject of
English power, and who had really so much to apprehend,
should he again fall into the hands of the Proserpines, was
masticating his food, with the keen relish of a man who had
been hard at work the whole morning. All appeared
unconscious
of their critical condition; and to Raoul it seemed as
if the entire responsibility rested on his own shoulders.
Fortunately, he was not a man to shrink from his present
duties; and he occupied the only leisure moment that would
Vol. II.  14
be likely to offer that day, in deliberating on his resources,
and in maturing his plans.
The armament still remained in the lugger, but it was
doubtful if she would float without removing it; and,
admitting
this necessity, the question arose of, what was to be
done with it, in order to render it available, in the event of
an attack. Two, or even four of the light guns might be
worked on the decks of the felucca; and here he determined
they should be immediately placed, with a proper supply of
cartridges and shot. Twenty men thrown into that light
craft, which Ithuel reported as sailing and sweeping well,
might prove of the last importance. Then one of the islets
had a ruin on it, of what was believed to be an ancient
temple. It is true, these ruins were insignificant, and
scarcely visible at any distance; but, on a close
examination
,
and by using some of the displaced stones with
judgment
,
it was possible to entrench a party behind them, and
make a stout resistance against light missiles; or such as
boats would most probably use. Raoul got into the yawl,
and sculled himself to this spot, examining the capabilities
with care and judgment. After this, his mode of proceeding
was matured to his own satisfaction.
The usual time had been consumed, and the hands were
turned to; each officer receiving the orders necessary to
the discharge of the duty confided to his particular
superintendence
.
As Ithuel had captured the felucca, Raoul felt it
right to intrust him with the command of the prize. He was
directed to take on board the armament and ammunition
necessary to a defence, to mount the guns in the best manner
he could, and to make all the other fighting preparations;
while another gang struck into the felucca's hold, such
articles
from the lugger, as it was desirable to save.
Another party, under the first-lieutenant, landed the
remainder
of the light carronades, pieces of twelve pounds
only, with the proper stores, and commenced the
arrangements
to place them in battery among the ruins. A small
supply of food and water was also transferred to this islet.
While these dispositions were in progress, Raoul himself,
assisted by his sailing-master, prepared to heave the lugger
off the rocks. To this, at present the most important duty,
our hero gave his personal inspection; for it required skill,
judgment, and caution. The physical force of the crew
was reserved to aid in the attempt. At length everything
was ready, and the instant had arrived when the
momentous
trial was to be made. The lugger had now been ashore
quite four hours, and the sun had been up fully three. By
this time, Raoul calculated that the English, at Capri, knew
of his misfortune, and little leisure remained in which to do
a vast deal of work. The hands were all summoned to the
bars, therefore, and the toil of heaving commenced.
As soon as the cable got the strain, Raoul felt satisfied
that the anchor would hold. Fortunately, a fluke had taken
a rock, a circumstance that could be known only by the
result; but, so long as the iron held together, there was no
danger of that material agent's failing them. The last part
of the process of lightening was now performed as rapidly
as possible, and then came the trial-heave at the bars.
Every effort was fruitless, however, inch being gained after
inch, until it seemed as if the hemp of the cable were
extending
its minutest fibres, without the hull's moving any
more than the rocks on which it lay. Even the boys were
called to the bars; but the united force of all hands, the
officers included, produced no change. There was an
instant
when Raoul fancied his best course would be to set fire
to the hulk, get on board the felucca, and sweep off to the
southward, in season to avoid the expected visit from the
English. He even called his officers together, and laid the
proposition before them. But the project was too feebly
urged, and it met with too little response in the breasts of
his auditors to be successful. The idea of abandoning that
beautiful and faultless little craft, was too painful, while
the remotest hope of preserving it remained.
Raoul had measured his hours with the accuracy of a
prudent general. It was now almost time for the English
boats to appear, and he began to hope that the Neapolitans
had made the great mistake of sending their information to
the fleet off Naples, rather than carrying it to the ships at
Capri. Should it prove so, he had still the day before him,
and might retire under cover of the night. At all events,
the lugger could not be abandoned without an enemy in
sight, and the people were again called to the bars for a
renewed
effort. As water might be obtained at a hundred
points on the coast, and the distance to Corsica was so small,
the last gallon had been started and pumped out, during the
recent pause.
Our hero felt that this was the final effort. The hold
of le Feu-Follet was literally empty, and all her spare spars
were floating among the rocks. If she could not be started
now, he did not possess the means to get her off. The
anchor
held; the cable, though stretched to the utmost, stood,
and every creature, but himself, was at the bars. The
ground-swell had been lessening all the morning, and little
aid was now to be had from the rising of the water. Still
that little must be obtained; without it, the task seemed
hopeless
.
Get ready, men, cried Raoul, as he paced the taffrail;
and heave at the word. We will wait for a swell, then
strain every nerve till something part.
Pas encore, mes
enfanspas encore!
Stand by!Yonder comes a fellow
who will lift usheave a strain  heave harderheave,
body and soul!heave, altogether!
The men obeyed. First they hove a gentle strain; then
the effort was increased, and, obedient to the order, just as
the ground-swell rolled under the lugger's bottom, they
threw out their utmost strength, and the hull started for the
first time. This was encouraging, though the movement
did not exceed six inches. It was a decided movement, and
was made in the right direction. This success nerved the
people to an increased effort. It was probable that, at the
next strain, they would throw a tenth more impetus into
their muscles. Of all this, Raoul was aware, and he
determined
not to let the feeling flag.
Encore, mes enfans!
he said. Heave, and get ready!
Be watchfulnow 's your time! Heave, and rip the planks
off the lugger's bottom  heave, men, heave!
This time, the effort answered to the emergency; the
swell rolled in, the men threw out their strength, a surge
was felt, it was followed up by a strain, and le Feu-Follet
shot off her bed into deep water, rolling, for want of ballast,
nearly to her hammock-cloths. She soon lay directly over
her anchor.
Here was success!Triumphant success; and that, at a
moment when the most sanguine had begun to despair.
The men embraced each other, showing a hundred
manifestations
of extravagant joy. The tears came to Raoul's
eyes; but he had no opportunity of concealing them, every
officer he had pressing around him to exchange felicitations.
The scene was one of happy disorder. It had lasted two
or three minutes, when Ithuel, always cold and calculating,
edged his way through the throng to his commander's side,
and pointed significantly in the direction of Campanella.
There, indeed, was visible, a division of the expected boats.
It was pulling towards them, having that moment doubled
the cape!
Ithuel's gesture was too significant to escape attention,
and every eye followed its direction. The sight was of a
nature not to be mistaken. It at once changed the current
of feeling in all who beheld it. There was no longer a
doubt concerning the manner in which the news of the
accident had travelled, or of its effect on the English at Capri.
In point of fact, the padrone of the captured felucca, with a
sole eye to the recovery of his vessel, had ascended the
Scaricatojo, after landing at the Marinella, at its foot, fast
as legs could carry him; had rather run, than glided, along
the narrow lanes of the piano and the hill-side to the beach
of Sorrento; had thrown himself into a boat, manned by
four lusty Sorrentine watermenand Europe does not
contain
lustier or bolder; had gone on board the Terpsichore,
and laid his case before Sir Frederick Dashwood, ignorant
of the person of the real commanding officer among the
three ships. The young baronet, though neither very wise,
nor very much experienced in his profession, was
exceedingly
well disposed to seek distinction. It immediately
occurred to his mind, that the present was a fitting
opportunity
to gain laurels. He was second in rank, present; and,
in virtue of that claim, he fancied that the first could do no
more than send him in command of the expedition, which
he righly foresaw Cuffe would order against the French.
But there arose a difficulty. As soon as Sir Frederick
reported the nature of the intelligence he had received to
his senior captain, and his own wish to be employed on the
occasion, the rights of Winchester interposed to raise a
question. Cuffe was prompt enough in issuing an order for
each ship to man and arm two boats, making six in all, and
14 *
in giving the necessary details, but he lost some precious
time in deciding as to who was to command. This was
the cause of delay, and had given rise to certain hopes in
Raoul, that facts were subsequently to destroy. In the end,
Sir Frederick prevailed; his rank giving him a decided
advantage
;
and the division of boats that was now approaching
was under his orders.
Raoul saw he had rather more than an hour to spare.
To fight the felucca, unsupported, against so many enemies,
and that in a calm, was quite out of the question. That
small, low craft might destroy a few of her assailants, but
she would inevitably be carried at the first onset. There
was not time to get the ballast and other equipments into
the lugger, so as to render her capable of a proper
resistance
;
nor did even she offer the same advantages for a
defence, unless in quick motion, as the ruins. It was
determined
,
therefore, to make the best disposition of the two
vessels that circumstances would allow, while the main
dependence should be placed on the solid defences of stone.
With this end, Ithuel was directed to haul his felucca to a
proper berth; the first-lieutenant was ordered to get as
much on board le Feu-Follet as possible, in readiness to
profit by events; while Raoul himself, selecting thirty of
his best men, commenced preparing the guns on the rocks
for active service.
A single half-hour wrought a material change in the
state of things. Ithuel had succeeded in hauling the felucca
into a berth among the islets, where she could not easily be
approached by boats, and where her carronades might be
rendered exceedingly useful. Much of the ballast was again
on board the lugger, and a few of her stores, sufficient to
render
her tolerably stiff, in the event of a breeze springing up;
and Raoul had directed the two inside guns of the felucca
to be sent on board her and mounted, that she might assist
in the defence with a flanking fire. The great difficulty
which exists in managing a force at anchor, is the
opportunity
that is given the assailant of choosing his point of
attack, and by bringing several of the vessels in a line,
cause them to intercept each other's fire. In order to
prevent
this, as much as in his power, Raoul placed his two
floating-batteries out of line, though it was impossible to
make such a disposition of them as would not leave each
exposed, on one point of attack, in a degree greater than
any other. Nevertheless, the arrangement was so made,
that either a vessel or the ruins might aid each craft
respectively
against the assault on her weakest point.
When his own guns were ready, and the two vessels
moored, Raoul visited both the lugger and felucca, to
inspect their preparations, and to say a cheerful word to
their men. He found most things to his mind; where they
were not, he ordered changes to be made. With the
lieutenant
,
his conversation was brief, for that officer was one
who possessed much experience in this very sort of warfare,
and could be relied on. With Ithuel, he was more
communicative
;
not that he distrusted the citizen of the Granite
state, but that he knew him to be a man of unusual
resources, could the proper spirit be aroused within him.
Bien
, Etooelle, he said, when the inspection was
ended, much will depend on the use you make of these
two guns.
I know that, as well as you do yourself, Captain Rule,
answered the other, biting off at least two inches from half a
yard of pig-tail; and, what 's more, I know that I fight
with a rope round my neck. The spiteful devils will hardly
overlook all that 's passed; and though it will be dead ag'in
all law, they 'll work out their eends on us both, if we don't
work out our eends on them. To my mind, the last will be
the most agreeable, as well as the most just.
Bon!Do not throw away your shot, Etooelle.
I!why, Captain Rule, I 'm nat'rally economical. That
would be wasteful, and waste I set down for a sin. The
only place I calculate on throwing the shot, is into the face
and eyes of the English. For my part, I wish Nelson,
himself
,
was in one of them boatsI wish the man no harm;
but I
do
wish he was in one of them very boats.
And, Etooelle, I do
not
. It is bad enough as it is,
entre
nous;
and Nelson is very welcome to stay on board his
Foudroyant;
voil!
The enemy is in council; we shall
soon hear from them. Adieu,
mon ami;
remember our two
Republiques!
Raoul squeezed Ithuel's hand, and entered his boat. The
distance to the ruin was trifling, but it was necessary to
make a small circuit in order to reach it. While doing this,
the young mariner discovered a boat pulling from the
direction
of the marinella, at the foot of the Scaricatojo, which
had got so near, unseen, as, at first, to startle him by its
proximity. A second look, however, satisfied him that no
cause of apprehension existed, in that quarter. His eye
could not be deceived. The boat contained Ghita and her
uncle; the latter rowing, and the former seated in the stern,
with her head bowed to her knees, apparently in tears.
Raoul was alone, sculling the light yawl with a single hand,
and he exerted himself to meet these unexpected, and, in the
circumstances, unwelcome visiters, as far as possible from
the rocks. Presently the two boats lay side by side.
What means this, Ghita! the young man exclaimed;
do you not see the English, yonder; at this moment
making their preparations to attack us. In a few minutes
we shall be in the midst of a battle, and thou here!
I see it all, now, Raoul, was the answer, though we
did not on quitting the shore; but we would not turn back,
having once come upon the Bay. I was the first in St. Agata
to discover the evil that had befallen thee; from that moment
I have never ceased to entreat my uncle, until he has
consented
to come hither.
With what motive, Ghita? asked Raoul, with sparkling
eyesat length thou relentestwilt become my wife! In
my adversity, thou rememberest thou art a woman!
Not exactly that, dear Raoul; but I cannot desert thee,
altogether, in this strait. The same objection exists now, I
fear, that has ever existed to our union; but that is no reason
I should not aid thee. We have many friends along the
heights, here, who will consent to conceal thee; and I have
come to carry thee and the American to the shore, until an
opportunity offer to get thee to thine own France.
What! desert
ces braves
, Ghita, at a moment like this!
Not to possess thy hand, dearest girl, could I be guilty of
an act so base.
Thy situation is not theirs. The condemnation to death
hangs over thee, Raoul; shouldst thou again fall into English
hands, there will be no mercy for thee.
Assez
this is no moment for argument. The English
are in motion, and there is barely time for thee to get to a
safe distance, ere they begin to fire. Heaven bless thee,
Ghita! This care of thine draws my heart to thee closer
than ever; but we must now separate. Signor Giuntotardi,
pull more towards Amalfi. I see that the English mean to
attack us from the side of the landpull more towards
Amalfi.
Thou tellest us this in vain, Raoul, Ghita quietly, but
firmly answered. We have not come here on an
unmeaning
errandif thou refusest to go with us, we will
remain with thee. These prayers, that thou so despisest,
may not prove useless.
Ghita!this can never be. We are without cover
almost without defencesour vessel is unfit to receive thee,
and this affair will be very different from that off Elba.
Thou would'st not willingly distract my mind with care for
thee, at such a moment!
We will remain, Raoul. There may come a moment,
when thou wilt be glad to have the prayers of believers.
God leadeth us hither, either to take thee away, or to
remain, and look to thy eternal welfare, amid the din of war.
Raoul gazed at the beautiful enthusiast, with an intensity
of love and admiration, that even her truthful simplicity had
never before excited. Her mild eyes were kindling with
holy ardour, her cheeks were flushed, and something like the
radiance of heaven seemed to beam upon her countenance.
The young man felt that time pressed; he saw no hope of
overcoming her resolution, in season to escape the
approaching
boats; and it might be, that the two would be
safer in some nook of the ruins, than in attempting to return
to the shore. Then, that never-dying, but latent, wish to
have Ghita with him, aided his hasty reasoning and he
decided
to permit the girl, and her uncle, to come upon the
islet, that he was to defend in person.
Some signs of impatience had begun to manifest
themselves
among his people, ere Raoul made up his mind to
the course he would follow. But, when he landed,
supporting
Ghita, that chivalry of character, and homage to the
sex, which distinguishes the southern Frenchman, changed
the current of feeling, and their two acquaintances were
received with acclamation. The acts of self-devotion seemed
heroic, and that is always enough to draw applause among
a people so keenly alive to glory. Still, the time to make
the necessary dispositions was short. Fortunately, the
surgeon had taken his post on this islet, as the probable scene
of the warmest conflict, and he had contrived to make his
preparations to receive the hurt, in a cavity of the rock,
behind a portion of the ruin, where the person would be
reasonably safe. Raoul saw the advantages of this
position
,
and he led Ghita and her uncle to it, without pausing
to deliberate. Here he tenderly embraced the girl, a liberty
Ghita could not repel at such a moment; then he tore
himself
away, to attend to duties which had now become
urgently pressing.
In point of fact, Sir Frederick Dashwood had made his
dispositions, and was advancing to the assault, being already
within the range of grape. For the obvious reason of
preventing
the French from attempting to escape to the shore,
he chose to approach from that side himself, an
arrangement
that best suited Raoul; who, foreseeing the probability
of the course, had made his own preparations with an eye
to such an event.
Of boats, there were eight in sight, though only seven
were drawing near, and were in line. Six had strong
crews, were armed, and were evidently fitted for action.
Of these, three had light boat-guns in their bows, while the
other three carried small-arms-men, only. The seventh
boat was the Terpsichore's gig, with its usual crew, armed;
though it was used by the commanding officer himself, as a
sort of
cheval de bataille
, in the stricter meaning of the term.
In other words, Sir Frederick Dashwood pulled through the
line in it, to give his orders, and encourage his people.
The eighth boat, which kept aloof, quite out of the range of
grape, was a shore-craft, belonging to Capri, in which
Andrea Barrofaldi, and Vito Viti had come, expressly, to
witness the capture, or destruction, of their old enemy.
When Raoul was taken in the Bay of Naples, these two
worthies fancied that their mission was endedthat they
might return, with credit, to Porto Ferrajo, and again hold
up their heads, with dignity and self-complacency, among
the functionaries of the island. But, the recent escape, and
the manner in which they had been connected with it,
entirely altered the state of things. A new load of
responsibility
rested on their shoulders; fresh opprobrium
was to be met, and put down; and the last acquisition of
ridicule, promised to throw the first proofs of their
simplicity
and dullness entirely into the shade. Had not Griffin
and his associates been implicated in the affair, it is
probable
the vice-governatore and the podest would have been
still more obnoxious to censure; but, as things were, the
sly looks, open jests, and oblique innuendoes of all they met
in the ship, had determined the honest magistrates, to retire
to their proper pursuits, on terra-firm, at the earliest
occasion. In the mean time, to escape persecution, and
to obtain a modicum of the glory that was now to be earned,
they had hired a boat, and accompanied the expedition, in
the character of amateurs. It formed no part of their plan,
however, to share in the combat; a view of its incidents
being quite as much, as Vito Viti strongly maintained, when
his friend made a suggestion to the contrary, as was
necessary
to vindicate their conduct and courage, in the judgment
of every Elban.
Cospetto! he exclaimed, in the warmth of opposition
Signor Andrea, your propositions are more in the spirit of
an unreflecting boy, than in that of a discreet
vice-governatore
.
If we take swords and muskets in the boat, as you
appear to wish, the devil may tempt us to use them; and
what does either of us know of such things? The pen is a
more befitting weapon for a magistrate, than a keen-edged
sword, or a foul-smelling piece of fire-arms. I am amazed
that your native sensibilities do not teach you this. There
is an indecency in men's mistaking their duties, and, of all
things on earth, heaven protect me from falling into such an
error! A false position is despicable.
Thou art warm, friend Vito, and that without occasion.
For my part, I think men should be prepared for any
emergency
that may happen. History is full of examples in
which civilians and scholars, ay, even churchmen, have
distinguished themselves by feats of arms, on proper
occasions
;
and I confess to a philosophical curiosity to ascertain
the sensations with which men seek and expose life.
That's your besetting weakness, Signor Andrea, and
the emergency drives me so far to lose sight of the respect
that a podest owes to a vice-governatore, as to feel
constrained
to tell you as much. Philosophy plays the very
devil with your judgment. With about half of what you
possess, the Grand Duke couldn't boast of a more sensible
subject. As for history, I don't believe anything that's in
it; more especially since the nations of the north have
begun
to write it. Italy once
had
histories; but where are
they now? For my part, I never heard of a man's fighting
who was not regularly bred to arms; unless it might be
some fellow who had reason to wish he had never been
born.
I can name you several men of letters, in particular,
whose fame as soldiers is only eclipsed by that earned by
their more peaceful labours, honest VitoMichael Angelo
Buonaretti, for instance, to say nothing of various warlike
popes, cardinals, and bishops. But we can discuss this
matter after the battle is over. Thou seest the English are
already quitting their ships, and we shall be in the rear of
the combatants.
So much the better, Corpo di Bacco!who ever heard
of an army that carries its brains in its head, like a human
being? NonoSignor Andrea; I have provided myself
with a string of beads, which I intend to count over, with
aves and paters, while the firing lasts, like a good Catholic;
if you are so hot, and bent on making one in this battle, you
may proclaim in a loud voice one of the speeches of the
ancient consuls and generals, such as you will find them, in
any of the old books.
Vito Viti prevailed. The vice-governatore was obliged
to leave the arms behind him, and this, too, without making
any great difference in the result of the day's fighting,
inasmuch
as the boatmen employed, in addition to asking a triple
price for their time and labour, obstinately refused to go
nearer to the French than half a league. Distant as this
was, however, Raoul, while reconnoitring the enemy with a
glass, detected the presence of the two Elbans. He laughed
outright at the discovery, notwithstanding the many serious
reflections that naturally pressed upon his mind at such a
moment.
But this was not the time to indulge in merriment, and
the countenance of our hero almost immediately resumed
its look of care. Now, that he felt certain of the manner in
which the English intended to assail him, he had new orders
to give to all his subordinates. As has been said, the
principal point was to make the different guns support each
other; in order to do this effectually, it became necessary to
spring the lugger's broadside round more obliquely towards
the felucca; which accomplished, Raoul deemed his
arrangements
complete.
Then followed the pause which ordinarily prevails between
preparation and the battle. This, in a vessel, is always a
period of profound and solemn stillness. So important to
concert, order, and intelligent obedience, in the narrow
compass, and amid the active evolutions of a ship, does
silence become at such moments, that one of the first duties
of discipline is to inculcate its absolute necessity; and a
thousand men shall be seen standing in their batteries, ready
to serve the fierce engines of war, without a sound arising
among them all, of sufficient force to still the washing of the
gentlest waves. It is true, the French were not now strictly
arrayed for a naval action; but they carried into the present
conflict, the habits and discipline of the peculiar branch of
service to which they belonged.
CHAPTER XIII.
His back against a rock he bore,
And firmly placed his foot before:
`Come one, come all! this rock shall fly
From its firm base as soon as I!'
Lady of the Lake
.
Our
battle will be told with greater clearness, if the
reader
is furnished with an outline of its order. As has been
more than once intimated already, Sir Frederick Dashwood
had made all his preparations to commence the assault from
the side of the land, the object being to prevent a retreat to
the shore. Raoul had foreseen the probability of this, and,
with a special view to prevent the two vessels from being
Vol. II.  15
easily boarded, he had caused both to be placed in such
positions
as left low barriers of rocks between them and that
quarter of the bay. These rocks were portions that were
not visible at any distance, being just awash, as it is termed,
or on a level with the surface of the water; offering the
same sort of protection against an attack in boats, that ditches
afford in cases of assaults on
terra-firm
. This was a
material
advantage to the expected defence, and our hero showed
his discrimination in adopting it. On board the felucca,
which was named The Holy Michael, was Ithuel with fifteen
men, and two twelve-pound carronades, with a proper supply
of small-arms and ammunition. The Granite-man was the
only officer, though he had with him three or four of the
lugger's best men.
Le Feu-Follet was confided to the care of Jules Pintard,
her first-lieutenant, who had under his immediate orders
some five-and-twenty of the crew, to work four more of the
carronades. The lugger had a part only of her ballast in,
and something like a third of her stores. The remainder
of both still lay on the adjacent rocks, in waiting for the
result of the day. She was thought, however, to be
sufficiently
steady for any service that might be expected of her
while moored, and might even have carried whole sail, in
light winds, with perfect safety. All four of her guns were
brought over on one side, in readiness to use in battery in
the same direction. By this arrangement the French
essentially
increased their means of defence, bringing all their
artillery into use at the same time; an expedient that could
not have been adopted had they been fought in broadside.
Raoul had planted among the ruins the remaining four
guns. With the aid of a few planks, the breechings, tackles,
and other appliances of a vessel, this had been easily
effected
;
and, on reviewing his work, he had great confidence in
the permanency of his pieces. The ruins themselves were
no great matter; at a little distance they were scarcely
perceptible
;
though, aided by the formation of the natural rock,
and by removing some of the stones to more favourable
positions
,
they answered the purpose of the seamen sufficiently
well. The carronades were placed
en-barbette;
but a
falling
of the surface of the rock enabled the men to cover
even their heads, by stepping back a few feet. The danger
would be much the greatest to those whose duty it would be
to reload.
The surgeon, Carlo Giuntotardi, and Ghita, were
established
in a cavity of the rocks, perfectly protected against
missiles, so long as the enemy continued on the side next
the land, and yet within fifty feet of the battery. Here the
former made the usual bloody-looking if not bloody-minded
preparations for applying tourniquets and for amputating, all
unheeded, however, by his two companions, both of whom
were lost to the scene around them, in devout prayer.
Just as these several dispositions were completed, Ithuel,
who ever kept an eye to windward, called out to Raoul, and
inquired if it might not be well to run the yards up to the
mast-heads, as they would be more out of the way in their
place aloft than littering the decks. There was no possible
objection to the measure, it being a dead calm, and both the
lugger and the felucca swayed their yards into their places,
the sails being bent, and hanging in the brails. This is the
ordinary state of craft of the latter rig, though not always
that of luggers; and the Granite-man, mindful that his own
gear was down, in consequence of having been lowered by
her former owners previously to the capture, bethought him
of the expediency of getting everything ready for a run.
He wished the lugger to be in an equal state of preparation,
it being plain enough that two to be pursued, would
embarrass
the English, in a chase, twice as much as one. This
was the reason of his suggestion; and he felt happier for
seeing
it attended to.
On the other side, all preliminary difficulties had been
disposed of. Captain Sir Frederick Dashwood was in
command
,
and lieutenants Winchester and Griffin, after a few
open protestations, certain grimaces, and divers secret curses,
were fain to submit. The discussion, however, had produced
one result, not altogether unfavourable to the Proserpines.
Cuffe sent four of her boats against the enemy, while he
restricted the Terpsichore to two, including her gig, and the
Ringdove to two. Each ship sent her launch, as a matter
of course, with a twelve-pound boat-gun on its grating.
Griffin was in that of the Proserpine; Mr. Stothard, the
second of the other frigate, was in the Terpsichore's; and
McBean, as of right, commanded the Ringdove's. Griffin
was in the first cutter of his own ship, and Clinch had
charge of the second. The third was headed by Strand,
whose call was to have precedence on the occasion. The
other boats had subordinates, from their respective ships.
All were in good heart; and, while all expected a severe
struggle for her, knowing the desperate character of their
enemy, every man in the boats felt confident that the lugger
was finally to fall into British hands. Still, a grave
consideration
of the possible consequences to the actors, mingled
with the exultation of the more reflecting men among the
assailants.
Sir Frederick Dashwood, who ought to have felt the moral
responsibility of his command, of all the higher officers
present
,
was the most indifferent to consequences.
Constitutionally
brave, personal considerations had little influence on
him; habitually confident of English prowess, he expected
victory and credit as a matter of course; and, favoured by
birth, fortune and parliamentary interest, he gave himself
no trouble as to the possibility of a failure, certain (though
not avowing that certainty even to himself,) that any little
mishap would be covered by the broad mantle of the accident,
that had so early raised him to the rank he held.
In making his dispositions for the fight, however, Sir
Frederick
had not disdained the counsels of men older and more
experienced than himself. Cuffe had given him much good
advice, before they parted, and Winchester and Strand had
been particularly recommended to him as seamen whose
suggestions might turn out to be useful.
I send a master's-mate named Clinch, in charge of one
of our boats, too, Dashwood, added the senior captain, as
he concluded his remarks; who is one of the most
experienced
seamen in the Proserpine. He has seen much
boatservice
,
and has always behaved himself well. A vile
practice
of drinking has kept the poor fellow under; but he is
now determined to make an effort, and I beg you will put
him forward to-day, that he may have a chance. Jack
Clinch has the right sort of stuff in him, if opportunities offer
to bring it out.
I flatter myself, Cuffe, that all hands will meet with
opportunity enough, answered Sir Frederick, in his
drawling
way; for, I intend to put 'em all in together, like a
thorough pack coming in at the death. I 've seen Lord
Echo's harriers so close, at the end of a long chase, that you
might have covered the whole with this ship's main-course;
and I intend it shall be so with our boats, to-day. By the
way, Cuffe, that would be a pretty figure for a despatch, and
would make Bront smileha!wouldn't it?
Dn the figure, the harriers, and the despatch, too,
Dashwood; first win the day, before you begin to write
poetry about it. Bront, as you call Nelson, has lightning
in him, as well as thunder, and there isn't an admiral in the
service, who cares less for blood and private rank than
himself
.
The way to make him smile, is to do a thing neatly
and well. For God's sake, now, be careful of the men;
we are short-handed, as it is, and can't afford such another
scrape, as that off Porto Ferrajo.
Never fear for us, Cuffe; you 'll never miss the men I
shall expend.
Every captain had a word to say to his officers; but none
other worth recording, with the exception of what passed
between Lyon and his first-lieutenant.
Ye 'll remember, Airchy, that a ship can have a
reputation
for economy, as well as a man. There's several of
our own countrymen about the Admiralty just now; and
next to courage and enterprise, they view the expenditures
with the keenest eyes. I 've known an admiral reach a red
ribbon just on that one quality; his accounts showing
cheaper ships and cheaper squadrons than any in the
sairvice
.
Ye'll all do your duties, for the honour o' Scotland;
but there's six or seven Leith and Glasgow lads in the boats,
that it may be as well not to let murder themselves, out of
a' need. I 've put the whole of the last draft from the river
guard-ship, into the boats, and with them there 's no great
occasion to be tender. They 're the sweepings of the
Thames and Wapping; and quite half of them would have
been at Botany Bay before this, had they not been sent
here.
Does the law about being in sight, apply to the boats,
or to the ships, the day, Captain Lyon?
To the boats, man; or who the de'il do you think would
sairve in them! It 's a pitiful affair, altogether, as it has
15 *
turned out; the honour being little more than the profit, I
opine; and yet 't will never do to let old Scotia lag astairn,
in a hand-to-hand battle. Ye 'll remember, we have a name
for coming to the claymore; and so do yer best, every
mither's son o' ye.
McBean grunted an assent, and went about his work as
methodically as if it were a sum in algebra. The
second-lieutenant
of the Terpsichore was a young Irishman, with a
sweet, musical voice; and, as the boats left the ships, he was
with difficulty kept in the line, straining to move ahead, with
his face on a grin, and his cheers stimulating the men to
undue, or unreasonable efforts. Such is an outline of the
English materials on this occasion; both parties being now
ready for the struggle. If we add that it was already past
two, and that all hands began to feel some anxiety on the
score of the wind, which might soon be expected, the
preliminary
picture is sufficiently sketched.
Sir Frederick Dashwood had formed his line about a mile
within the rocks, with one launch in the centre, and one on
each extremity. That in the centre was commanded by
O'Leary, his own second-lieutenant; that on the left of his
force by McBean, and the one on its right by Winchester.
O'Leary was flanked by Griffin and Clinch, in the
Proserpine's
cutters, while the intervals were filled by the remaining
boats. The captain kept moving about in his own gig, giving
his directions, somewhat confusedly, beyond a question; yet
with a cheerfulness and indifference of air that aided in
keeping
alive the general
gait de cur
. When all was ready,
he gave the signal to advance, pulling, for the first half mile,
chivalrously in advance of the line, with his own gig.
Raoul had noted the smallest movement of the enemy
with a glass, and with grave attention. Nothing escaped
his jealous watchfulness; and he saw that Sir Frederick had
made a capital error in the outset. Had he strengthened
his centre, by putting all his carronades in the same battery,
as it might be, the chances for success would have been
doubled; but, by dividing them, he so far weakened their
effect, as to render it certain no one of the three French
batteries
could be wholly crippled by their fire. This, of
course, left the difficult task to the English of pushing up to
their hand-to-hand work, under the embarrassment of
receiving
constant discharges of grape and canister.
The few minutes that intervened between the order to
advance, and the moment when the boats got within a
quarter
of a mile of the rock, were passed in a profound quiet,
neither side making any noise, though Raoul had no small
difficulty in restraining the constitutional impatience of his
own men to begin. A boat presents so small an object,
however, to artillerists as little skilled as seamen generally
are, who depend more on general calculations than on the
direct or scientific aim, the latter being usually defeated
by the motion of their vessels, that he was unwilling to throw
away even his canister. A Frenchman himself, however, he
could refrain no longer, and he pointed a carronade, firing it
with his own hand. This was the commencement of the
strife. All the other guns in the ruin followed, and the
lugger kept time, as it might be by note. The English rose,
gave three cheers, and each launch discharged her gun. At
the same instant, the two men who held the matches in the
felucca, applied them briskly to the vents of their respective
pieces. To their surprise, neither exploded, and, on
examination
,
it was discovered that the priming had vanished. To
own the truth, he of the Granite state had slily brushed his
hand over the guns, and robbed them of this great essential
of their force. He held the priming-horns in his own hands,
and resolutely refused to allow them to pass into those of
any other person.
It was fortunate Ithuel was known to be such a
determined
hater of the English, else might his life have been the
forfeit of this seeming act of treachery. But he meditated
no such dereliction of duty. Perfectly aware of the
impossibility
of preventing his men from firing, did they possess
the means, this deliberate and calculating personage had
resorted to this expedient to reserve his own effort, until, in
his judgment, it might prove the most available. His men
murmured, but, too much excited to deliberate, they poured
in a discharge of musketry, as the only means of annoying
the enemy then left them. Even Raoul glanced aside, a
little wondering at not hearing the felucca's carronades, but
perceiving her people busy with their fire-arms, he believed
all right.
The first discharge, in such an affair, is usually the most
destructive. On the present occasion, the firing was not
without serious effects. The English, much the most
exposed
,
suffered in proportion. Four men were hurt in
Winchester's
boat; two in Griffin's; six or eight men in the
other launches and cutters, and one of Sir Frederick's
gig-men
was shot through the heart; a circumstance which
induced that officer to drop alongside of a cutter, and
exchange
the dead body for a living man.
On the rocks, but one man was injured. A round-shot
had hit a stone, shivered it in fragments, and struck down a
valuable seaman, just as he was advancing, with a gallant
mien, to spunge one of the guns.
Poor Josef! said Raoul, as he witnessed the man's
fall; carry him to the surgeon,
mes braves
.
Mon CapitaineJosef is dead.
This decided the matter, and the body was laid aside,
while another stepped forward and spunged the gun. At
that moment Raoul found leisure to walk a yard or two
towards the rear, in order to ascertain if the cover of Ghita
were sufficient. The girl was on her knees, lost to all
around her, though, could he have read her heart, he would
have found it divided between entreaties to the Deity and
love for himself.
The lugger sustained no harm. O'Leary had overshot
her, in his desire to make his missiles reach. Not even a
canister had lodged in her spars, or torn her sails. The
usual luck appeared to attend her, and the people on board
fought with renewed confidence and zeal. Not so with the
felucca, however. Here the fire of the English had been
the most destructive. The wary and calculating McBean
had given his attention to this portion of the French defences,
and the consequences partook of the sagacity and discretion
of the man. A charge of canister had swept across the
felucca's decks, more than decimating Ithuel's small force;
for it actually killed one, and wounded three of his party.
But, the din once commenced, there was no leisure to
pause. The fire was kept up with animation, on both sides,
and men fell rapidly. The boats cheered and pressed ahead,
the water becoming covered with a wide sheet of smoke.
In moments like this, the safest course for the assailants
is to push on. This the English did, firing and cheering at
every fathom they advanced, but suffering also. The
constant
discharge of the carronades, and the total absence of
wind, soon caused a body of smoke to collect in front of the
rock, while the English brought on with them another,
trailing
along the water, the effect of their own fire. The two
shrouds soon united, and then there was a minute when the
boats could only be seen with indistinctness. This was
Ithuel's moment. Perceiving that the ten or twelve men
who remained to him were engrossed with their muskets, he
pointed the two carronades himself, and primed them from
the horns which he had never quitted. For the felucca he
felt no present concern. Winchester, and all the boats in
the centre of the English line, were most in advance, the fire
of the ruins urging them to the greatest exertion. Then
McBean, beside being more distant, could not cross the rock
in front of the felucca, without making a circuit, and he must,
as yet, be ignorant of the existence of the impediment.
Ithuel was cool and calculating by nature, as well as by
habit; but this immunity from present risk, probably
increased
the immediate possession of qualities so important in
battle. His carronades were loaded to their muzzles, with
bags of bullets, and he beckoned to the best seaman of his
party to take one of the matches, while he used the other
himself, each holding a monkey's-tail in one hand, in
readiness
to train the light gun, as circumstances required. The
pieces had been depressed by Ithuel himself, in the midst of
the fray, and nothing remained but to wait the moment for
using them.
This moment was now near. The object of the English
was to land on the principal islet, and to carry the ruin by
storm. In order to do this, all the boats of their centre
converged in their courses to the same point, and the smoke
being driven off, by each concussion of the guns, a dark
cluster of the enemy diverged from the ragged outline of the
vapour, within fifty yards of the intended point of landing.
Ithuel and his companion were ready. Together they
sighted, and together they fired. This unexpected discharge
from a quarter that had been so comparatively silent,
surprised
both friends and foes, and it drove a fresh mantle of
smoke momentarily athwart the rock and the open space in
its front.
A cry arose from the dense shroud of battle, that differed
from the shouts of success and courage. Physical agony
had extorted shrieks from the stoutest hearts, and even the
French in the ruins paused to look for the next act of the
desperate drama. Raoul seized the opportunity to prepare
for the expected hand-to-hand struggle; but it was
unnecessary
.
The cessation in the firing was common in both
parties, and it gave the vapour a minute in which to lift
the curtain from the water.
When the late obstacle was raised high enough to admit
of a view, the result became evident. All the English boats
but one had scattered, and were pulling swiftly, in different
directions, from the scene of slaughter. By taking this
course they diverted and divided the fire of their enemies;
an expedient of which it would have been happier had they
bethought them earlier. The remaining boat was a cutter
of the Terpsichore. It had received the weight of canister
from Ithuel's own gun, and of sixteen men it had contained
when it left the frigate's side, but two escaped. These
fellows
had thrown themselves into the sea, and were picked
up by passing boats. The cutter itself came drifting slowly
in towards the rock, announcing the nature of its fearful
cargo, by the groans and cries that arose from out its bosom.
Raoul stopped the fire, equally from humanity and policy,
after a few discharges at the retreating boats; and the first
act of the battle closed.
The breathing time gave both parties a desirable
opportunity
for ascertaining in what positions they were left. In
the whole, the French had lost the services of eleven men;
all, with the exception of Ithuel's four, in the ruin. The
loss of the English amounted to thirty-three, including
several
officers. The master's-mate, who had commanded the
crippled cutter, lay over its stern, flat on his back, with no
less than five musket-balls through his chest. His passage
into another state of existence had been sudden as the flight
of the electric spark. Of his late companions several were
dead also, though most were still enduring the pain of
fractured
bones and bruised nerves. The boat itself slowly
touched the rocks, raising fresh cries among the wounded,
by the agony they endured from the shocks of rising and
falling under the ground-swell.
Raoul was too deliberate, and too much collected, not to
feel his advantage. Anxious to keep his means of further
defence in the best condition, he directed all the guns to
cease, and the damages to be repaired. Then he went with
a party towards the boat that had fallen into his hands.
To encumber himself with prisoners of any sort, in his
actual situation, would have been a capital mistake; but to
do this with wounded men, would have been an act of folly.
The boat had tourniquets and other similar appliances in it,
and he directed some of the French to use them on those
that wanted them most. He also supplied the parched lips
of the sufferers with water, when, conceiving that his duty
was performed, he gave an order to haul the boat on one
side, and to shove it forcibly out of the line of any coming
conflict.
Halloo, Captain Rule! called out Ithuel, you are
wrong there. Let the boat lie where it is, and it will
answer
a better turn than another breastwork. The English
will scarcely fire through their own wounded.
The look that Raoul cast towards his auxiliary was fierce,
even indignant; but, disregarding the advice, he motioned
for his own men to obey the order he had already given
them. Then, as if mindful of Ithuel's importance, his late
timely succour, and the necessity of not offending him, he
walked to the side of the islet nearest to the felucca, and
spoke courteously and cheerfully to him whose advice he
had just treated with indifference, if not with disdain. This
was not hypocrisy, but a prudent adaptation of his means to
his circumstances.
Bon  brave Etooelle
, he said, your bags of bullets
were welcome friends, and they arrived at the right
moment.
Why, Captain Rule, in the Granite country we are
never wasteful of our means. You can always wait for the
white of Englishmen's eyes, in these affairs. They 're
spiteful dls, on the whull, and seem to be near-sighted
to a man. They came so clus' at Bunker Hill, our folks
Bon
repeated Raoul, feeling no wish to hear a
thrice-told
tale gone through again, Bunker Hill invariably placing
Ithuel on a great horse in the way of bragging; for he not
only imagined that great victory a New-England triumph,
as in fact it was, but he was much disposed to encourage
the opinion that it was in a great measure granite.
Bon
, interrupted Raoul  Bunkair was good;
mais,
les Rochess aux Sirens
is bettair. If you have more
de
ces balles
, load
encore
.
What think you of this, Captain Rule? asked the
other, pointing up at a little vane that began to flutter at the
head of one of his masts. Here is the west wind, and an
opportunity offers to be off. Let us take wit, and run!
Raoul started, and gazed at the heavens, the vane, and
the surface of the sea; the latter beginning to show a
slightly ruffled surface. Then his eye wandered towards
Ghita. The girl had risen from her knees, and her eyes
followed his every movement. When they met his, with a
sweet, imploring smile, she pointed upward, as if
beseeching
him to pay the debt of gratitude he owed to that dread
Being who had, as yet, borne him unharmed through the
fray. He understood her meaning, kissed his hand in
affectionate gallantry, and turned towards Ithuel, to pursue
the discourse.
It is too soon, he said. We are impregnable here,
and the wind is still too light. An hour hence, and we will
all go together.
Ithuel grumbled; but his commander heeded it not. The
judgment of the latter had decided right. The boats were
rallying within musket-shot, indifferent to the danger, and
it was evident the attack was to be renewed. To have
attempted to escape at such an instant, would have been
throwing away the great advantage of the ruins, and might
have endangered all, without benefiting any one.
In point of fact, Sir Frederick Dashwood had become
keenly alive to a sense of the disgrace he was likely to
incur, in the event of the ship's getting round, and robbing
him of the credit of capturing the lugger. The usually
apathetic nature of this young man was thoroughly aroused,
and, like all who are difficult to excite, he became respectable
when his energies were awakened. The boats were already
collected; all the disabled were put into one of them, and
ordered off to the ships; and with those that remained
arrangements were made to renew the attempt. It was
fortunate
that Cuffe had sent an expedition so strong-handed;
for, notwithstanding the loss, the three launches and the
cutters could still muster double the number of the French.
This time, Sir Frederick was willing to listen to counsel.
Winchester, McBean, Griffin, and Strand, united in advising
that the boats should separate, and make their assaults from
different points. This would prevent the possibility of a
recurrence of so concentrated a disaster as that which had
already befallen them. To the Scotchman, was assigned
the felucca; the Terpsichore's launch was to assail the
lugger; while the two cutters, and the heavier boat of the
Proserpine, were to dash in at the ruins. Sir Frederick still
remained in his own gig, to push for the point that might
seem to require his presence.
McBean was the first to fire on this occasion. He threw
a round-shot from his carronade into the felucca, aimed by
himself, and directed with care. It fell upon one of Ithuel's
carronades, broke into a dozen pieces, knocked down no less
than three men, besides injuring others less severely, and
actually drove the gun it struck off its slide into the
felucca's
hold. This was a rough commencement, and the
result
being seen by all hands, it greatly encouraged the
assailants
.
Three hearty English cheers followed, and Ithuel
was so far disconcerted as to fire the remaining gun, loaded
as before, with bullets, at least two minutes too soon. The
sea was thrown into a foam, but not a man in the boats was
hurt. Then the fire became general; gun after gun
exploding
;
the rattling of small-arms filling up the pauses. The
boats came on with steady, strong pulls of the oar, and this
too with an impunity that often happens, though difficult
to be explained. Several shot fell among the ruins,
knocking
the stones about, and for a minute or two all the injury
was on one side. But Pintard and Ithuel felt the security
conferred by the rocks in their front, and each endeavoured
to give one effective discharge. Ithuel succeeded the best.
He repaid McBean in his own coin, sending a grist of bullets
into the bows of his launch, which admonished that prudent
officer of the necessity of sheering towards the islet of the
ruins. Pintard's assailant was brought up by the barrier in
front, and turned aside also. Then, in the midst of a cloud
Vol. II.  16
of smoke, shouts, curses, cries, shrieks, orders, and the roar
of guns, all the English precipitated themselves in a body
on the principal post, and became the masters of the battery
in the twinkling of an eye.
CHAPTER XIV.
Thus doth the ever-changing course of things
Run a perpetual circle, ever turning;
And that same day, that highest glory brings,
Brings us to the point of back-returning.
Daniel
.
In
scenes like that just related, it is not easy to collect
details. All that was ever known beyond the impetuous
manner of the assault, in which the ruins were carried, was
in the dire result. Half the French on the islet were
weltering
in their blood, and the surface of the rocks was well
sprinkled with enemies who had not been more fortunate.
It had been a desperate onset, in which mortification
increased
natural intrepidity, which had been nobly resisted,
but in which numbers had necessarily prevailed. Among
the English slain was Sir Frederick Dashwood himself; he
lay about a yard from his own gig, with a ball directly
through his head. Griffin was seriously hurt, but Clinch
was untouched, on the low rampart, waving an English Jack
after having hauled down a similar emblem of the French.
His boat had first touched the rock, her crew had first
reached
the ruin, and of all in her, he, himself, had taken the
lead. Desperately had he contended for Jane and a
commission
,
and, this time, Providence appeared to smile on his
efforts. As for Raoul, he lay in front of his own rampart,
having rushed forward to meet the party of Clinch, and had
actually crossed swords with his late prisoner, when a
musket-ball
,
fired by the hands of McBean, traversed his body.
Courage, mes braves! en avant!
he was heard to
shout, as he leaped the low wall, to repel the invadersand
when he lay on the hard rock, his voice was still strong
enough to make itself heard, crying
Lieutenantnom de
Dieusauve mon Feu-Follet!
It is probable that Pintard would not have stirred, even at
this order, had not the English ships been seen, at that
instant
,
coming round Campanella, with a leading westerly
wind. The flap of canvass was audible near by, too, and
turning, he saw the Michael falling off, under her foresail,
and already gathering steerage-way. Not a soul was
visible
on her decks, Ithuel, who steered, lying so close, as to
be hid by her waist-cloths. The hawsers of the lugger were
cut, and le Feu-Follet started back like an affrighted steed.
It was only to let go the brails and her foresail fell. Light,
and feeling the breeze, which now came in strong puffs, she
shot out of the little bay and wore short round on her keel.
Two or three of the English boats attempted to follow, but
it was idle. Winchester, who now commanded, recalled
them, saying, that it remained for the ships to perform their
task. The day had been too bloody, indeed, to think of
more than securing the present success, and of attending to
the hurt.
Leaving the party on the islets for a moment, we will
follow
the two vessels in their attempt to escape. Pintard and
his companions abandoned Raoul with heavy hearts, but
they plainly saw him prostrated on the rocks, and by the
hand placed on his side, understood the desperate nature of
his wound. Like him, they felt some such interest as one
entertains for a beloved mistress in the fate of the lugger,
and the words
sauve mon Feu-Follet!
were ringing in
their ears.
As soon as the lugger got round, she set her after-sail, and
then she began to glide through the water, with the usual
knife-like parting of the element under her bows. The
course she steered led her directly out of the bay, seeming
to lead across the fore-foots of the English ships. Ithuel
did not imitate this manuvre. He kept more away in the
line for Pstum, rightly enough believing that in the greedy
desire to overtake the lugger, his own movement would pass
unheeded. The owner of this craft was still on board the
Terpsichore; but every remonstrance, and all the requests
he made, that his own vessel might be followed and
captured
,
were utterly unheeded by the lieutenant now in
command
.
To him, as to all others in authority, there seemed
to be but one thing desirable, and that was to secure the
lugger
.
Of course none yet knew of the fatal character of the
struggle on the rocks, or of the death of the English leader,
though the nature of the result was sufficiently understood
by seeing the English Jack flying among the ruins, and the
two vessels under way, endeavouring to escape.
The season was now so far advanced as to render the old
stability of the breezes a little uncertain. The zephyr had
come early, and it had come fresh; but there were
symptoms
of a sirocco, about the barometer, and in the
atmosphere
.
This rendered all in the ships eager to secure their
prize before a shift of wind should come. Now that there
were three fast vessels in chase, none doubted of the final
result; and Cuffe paced the quarter-deck of the Proserpine,
rubbing his hands with delight, as he regarded all the
propitious
signs of the times.
The Ringdove was ordered, by signal, to haul up
south-south-west
,
or close on a wind, with a view to make such an
offing as would prevent the possibility of the lugger's getting
outside of the ships, and gaining the wind of them; an
achievement Cuffe thought she might very well be enabled
to accomplish, could she once fairly come by the wind under
circumstances that would prevent any of his vessels from
bringing her under their guns. The Terpsichore was directed
to run well into the bay, to see that a similar artifice was
not practised in that direction; while the Proserpine shaped
her own course at the angle that would intercept the chase,
should the latter continue to stand on.
It was an easy thing for the French to set all their canvass,
the hamper of a lugger being so simple. This was soon
done; and Pintard watched the result, with intense interest,
well knowing that everything now depended on heels, and
ignorant what might be the effect of her present trim on the
sailing of his beautiful craft. Luckily, some attention had
been paid to her lines, in striking in the ballast again; and
it was soon found that the vessel was likely to behave well.
Pintard thought her so light as to be tender; but, not daring
to haul up high enough to prove her, in that way, it remained
a matter of opinion only. It was enough for him that she
lay so far to the west of south as to promise to clear the
point of Piane, and that she skimmed along the water at a
rate that bade fair to distance all three of her pursuers.
Anxious to get an offing, however, which would allow him
to alter his course at night in more directions than one, he
kept luffing, as the wind favoured, so as sensibly to edge off
the land.
As the two chases commenced their flight quite a mile to
the southward of the ships, having that much the start of
them on account of the position of the rocks, it rendered them
both tolerably free from all danger of shot, at the beginning
of the race. The course steered by Ithuel, soon placed him
beyond their reach, altogether; and Cuffe knew that little
would be gained, while much might be lost, in making any
attempt of this sort on the lugger. Consequently, not a gun
was fired; but the result was thrown fairly on the canvass,
and on the sailing of the respective vessels.
Such was the state of things at the beginning of this chase.
The wind freshened fast, and soon blew a strong breeze;
one that drove the ships ahead, under clouds of
studding-sails
and stay-sails, the latter being much used at that period,
at the rate of quite ten knots the hour. But neither gained
on le Feu-Follet. The course was by no means favourable
to her, the wind being well on her quarter; still, she rather
gained, than was gained on. All four vessels went off
rapidly to the southward, as a matter of course; nor was it
long before they were to leeward of the felucca, which had
both shortened sail, and hauled up to the eastward, as soon
as Ithuel felt satisfied he was not to be followed. After a
sufficient time had elapsed, the Holy Michael tacked, and
came out of the bay, crossing the wake of the Terpsichore,
just beyond gun-shot. Of course, this manuvre was seen
from the frigate; and the padrone of the felucca tore his
hair, threw himself on the quarter-deck, and played many
other desperate antics, in the indulgence of his despair, or to
excite sympathy: but all in vain; the lieutenant was
obstinate
;
refusing to alter tack or sheet to chase a miserable
felucca, with so glorious an object in full view before him, as
the celebrated lugger of Raoul Yvard. As a matter of course,
Ithuel passed out to sea unmolested; and, it may as well be
said here, that, in due time, he reached Marseilles in safety,
16 *
where the felucca was sold, and the Granite-seaman
disappeared
for a season. There will be occasion to speak of
him only once again, in this legend.
The trial of speed must soon have satisfied Pintard that
he had little to apprehend from his pursuers, even with the
breeze there was. But circumstances favoured the lugger.
The wind hauled materially to the northward, and before
the sun set, it enabled the French to run off wing-and-wing,
still edging from the land. It now began to blow so heavily,
as to compel the ships to reduce their light canvass. Some
time before the night set in, both frigates and the sloop were
under main-top-gallant-sails only, with top-mast and lower
studding-sails on each side. Le Feu-Follet made no change.
Her jigger had been taken in, as soon as she kept dead
away, and then she dashed ahead, under her two enormous
luggs, confident in their powers of endurance. The night
was not very dark; but it promised to carry her beyond the
vision of her pursuers, even before eight bells, did the present
difference in sailing continue.
A stern chase is proverbially a long chase. For one fast
vessel to outsail another a single mile in an hour, is a great
superiority; and even in such circumstances, many hours
must elapse ere one loses sight of the other, by day. The
three English ships held way together surprisingly, the
Proserpine
leading a little; while le Feu-Follet might possibly
have found herself, at the end of a six hours' chase, some
four miles in advance of her, three of which she had gained
since keeping off, wing-and-wing. The lightness of the little
craft essentially aided her. The canvass had less weight to
drag after it; and Pintard observed that the hull seemed to
skim the waves, as soon as the sharp stem had divided them,
and the water took the bearings of the vessel. Hour after
hour did he sit on the bowsprit, watching her progress; a
crest of foam scarce appearing ahead, before it was glittering
under the lugger's bottom. Occasionally, a pursuing sea
cast the stern upward, as if about to throw it in advance of
the bows; but le Feu-Follet was too much accustomed to
this treatment to be disturbed, and she ever rose on the
billow
,
like a bubble, and then the glancing arrow scarce
surpassed
the speed with which she hastened forward, as if to
recover lost time.
Cuffe did not quit the deck until the bell struck two, in
the middle watch. This made it one o'clock. Yelverton
and the master kept the watches between them, but the
captain
was always near with his advice and orders.
That craft seems faster when she gets her sails
wing-and-wing
than she is even close-hauled, it seems to me,
Yelverton, observed Cuffe, after taking a long look at the
chase with a night-glass; I begin to be afraid we shall
lose her. Neither of the other ships does anything to help
us. Here we are all three, dead in her wake, following
each other like so many old maids going to church of a
Sunday morning.
It
would
have been better, Captain Cuffe, had the
Ringdove
kept more to the westward, and the frigate further east.
Fast as the lugger is with her wings spread, she's faster with
them jammed up on a wind. I expect every moment to find
her sheering off to the westward, and gradually getting us in
her
wake
on
a wind. I fear we should find that worse work
than even this, sir.
I would not lose her now, for a thousand pounds! I do
not see what the dl Dashwood was about, that he did not
secure her, when he got possession of the rocks. I shall
rattle him down a little, as soon as we meet.
Cuffe would have been shocked had he known that the
body of Sir Frederick Dashwood was, just at that moment,
going through the melancholy process of being carried on
board a two-decker, up at Naples, the captain of which was
his kinsman. But he did not know it, nor did he learn his
death, for more than a week; or after the body had been
interred.
Take the glass, Yelverton, and look at her. To me she
grows very dimshe must be leaving us, fast. Be
careful
to note if there are any signs of an intention to sheer to
the westward.
That can hardly be done without jibing her forward lugg
hang me, Captain Cuffe, if I can see her at all. Ah!
here she is, dead ahead as before, but as dim as a ghost. I
can barely make out her canvassshe is still
wing-and-wing
,
dn her, looking more like the spectre of a craft, than
a real thing. I lost her in that yaw, sirI wish you would
try, Captain Cuffedo my best, I cannot find her again.
Cuffe did try, but without success. Once, indeed, he
fancied
he saw her, but further examination satisfied him it was
a mistake. So long had he been gazing at the same object,
that it was easy for the illusion to pass before his mind's
eye, of imagining a dim outline of the little lugger flying
away, like the scud of the heavens, wing-and-wing, ever
seeming to elude his observation. That night he dreamed
of her, and there were haply five minutes, during which his
wandering thoughts actually pourtrayed the process of
taking
possession, and of manning the prize.
Previously to this, however, signals were made to the
other ships, ordering them to alter their courses, with a view
to meet anticipated changes in that of le Feu-Follet. Lyon
was sent to the westward, the Terpsichore a little easterly,
while the Proserpine herself ventured so far as to steer
south-west
,
after two o'clock. But a sudden and violent shift of
wind came an hour before day. It was the expectednay,
the announced sirocco, and it brought the lugger to windward
beyond all dispute. The south breeze came strong from
the first puff; and, while it did not amount to a gale until the
afternoon of the next day, it blew heavily, in squalls, after
the first hour.
When the day dawned, the three ships were out of sight
of each other. The Proserpine, which we shall accompany,
as our old acquaintance, and an actor in what is to succeed,
was under double-reefed topsails, with her head up as high as
west-south-west, labouring along through the troughs of the
seas left by the late Tramontana. The weather was thick,
rain and drizzle coming in the squalls, and there were
moments when the water could not be seen a cable's-length
from the ship; at no time was the usual horizon fairly
visible
.
In this manner the frigate struggled ahead, Cuffe
unwilling to abandon all hopes of success, and yet seeing
little prospect of its accomplishment. The look-outs were
aloft, as usual, but it was as much for form as for any great
use they were likely to be, since it was seldom a man
could see further from the cross-trees than he could from
the deck.
The officers, as well as the men, had breakfasted. A
species of sullen discontent pervaded the ship, and the recent
kind feelings towards Raoul Yvard had nearly vanished in
disappointment. Some began to grumble about the chances
of the other ships falling in with the lugger, while others
swore that it mattered not who
saw
her;
catch
her none
could, who had not an illicit understanding with the Father
of Lies. She was well named the Jack-o'-Lantern; for
Jack-o'-Lantern she was, and Jack-o'-Lantern would she
ever prove to be. As well might a false fire be followed in
a meadow, as such a craft at sea. They might think
themselves
fortunate, if the officers and people sent against her
in the boats ever got back to their own wholesome ship
again.
In the midst of such prognostics and complaints, the
captain
of the fore-top shouted the words `sail ho!' The usual
inquiry and answer followed, and the officers got a glimpse
of the object. The stranger was distant half a league, and
he was seen very indistinctly on account of the haze; but
seen he
was
.
'Tis a xebec, growled the master, who was one of the
grumblers of the daya fellow with his hold crammed
with a wine that would cover the handsomest woman's face
in Lunnun with wrinkles.
By Jupiter Ammon! Cuffe exclaimed, 'tis the le
Feu-Folly
,
or I do not know an old acquaintance.
Quarter-master
hand me the glassnot that, the shorter glass is the
best.
Long or short, you'll never make
that
out, muttered
the master. The Folly has more folly about her than I
give her credit for, if
we
get another look at her this
summer
.
What do you make of him, Captain Cuffe? Yelverton
eagerly demanded.
Just what I told you, sir'tis the luggerandI
cannot
be mistaken.Ay, by Jove, she is coming down before
it, wing-and-wing, again! That's her play, just now, it would
seem, and she does not appear to have got enough of it yet.
An attentive look satisfied Yelverton that his commander
was right. Even the master had to confess his error, though
he did it ungraciously and with reluctance. It was the
lugger
,
of a certainty, though so dimly seen as to render it
difficult, at moments, to trace her outlines at all. She was
running in a line that would carry her astern of the frigate
about a mile, and she was rather more than thrice that
distance
to windward.
She cannot see us, said Cuffe, thoughtfully. Beyond
a doubt she thinks us to windward, and is endeavouring to
get out of our neighbourhood. We must get round,
gentlemen
,
and now is a favourable moment. Tack ship, at once,
Mr. YelvertonI think she 'll do it.
The experiment was made, and it succeeded. The
Proserpine
worked beautifully, and Yelverton knew how to
humour her to a nicety. In five minutes the ship was round,
with everything trimmed on the other tack;close-reefed
mizen, and double-reefed fore and main-top-sailsa reefed
main-sail, with other sails to suit. As she was kept a rap
full, or a little off, indeed, to prevent the lugger from
slipping
past, she might have gone from five to six knots.
The next five minutes were intensely interesting to the
people of the Proserpine. The weather became thicker, and
all traces of le Feu-Follet were lost. Still, when last
seen, she was wing-and-wing, flying rather than sailing,
down towards their own track. By Cuffe's calculation, the
two vessels would nearly meet in less than a quarter of an
hour, should neither alter her course. Several guns were
got ready, in preparation for such a rencontre.
Let the weather hold thick a few minutes longer, and
we have her! cried Cuffe. Mr. Yelverton, you must go
down and see to those guns yourself. Plump it right into
her, if you 're ordered to fire. The fellow has no hamper,
and stripping him must be a matter of pure accident. Make
it too hot for him on deck, and he'll have to give up, Raoul
Yvard, or the dl!
There she is, sir! shouted a midshipman from a
cat-head
for
everybody who dared had crowded forward to get
an early look at the chase.
There she was, sure enough, wing-and-wing, as before.
The dullness of the lugger's look-outs have never been
explained
,
as a matter of course; but it was supposed, when
all the circumstances came to be known, that most of her
people were asleep, to recover from the recent extraordinary
fatigue, and a night in which all hands had been kept on
deck, in readiness to make sail; the vessel having but some
thirty souls in her. At length the frigate was seen, the
weather lighting, and it was not an instant too soon. The
two vessels, at that critical instant, were about half a mile
apart, le Feu-Follet bearing directly off the Proserpine's
weather-bow. In the twinkling of an eye, the former jibed;
then she was seen coming to the wind, losing sufficient
ground in doing so, to bring her just in a range with the
two weather chase-guns. Cuffe instantly gave the order to
open a fire.
What the dl has got into her? exclaimed the
captain,she topples like a mock mandarin,she used to
be as stiff as a church! What can it mean, sir?
The master did not know, but we may say that the lugger
was too light for so much canvass in such heavy weather,
and there was not time to shorten sail. She lurched heavily
under the sea that was now getting up, and, a squall striking
her, her lee guns were completely buried. Just at this
moment the Proserpine belched forth her flame and smoke.
The shot could not be followed, and no one knew where
they struck. Four had been fired, when a squall succeeded
that shut in the chase, and, of course, the firing was
suspended
.
So severe was this momentary effort of the African
gales, hot, drowsy, and deadening as they are, that the
Proserpine
started her mizzen-top-sail sheets, and clewed up her
main-course, to save the spar. But, the tack was instantly
boarded again, and the top-sail set. A gleam of sunshine
succeeded, but the lugger had disappeared!
The sun did not remain visible, and that faintly, but a
minute; still, the eye could range several miles, for thrice
that period. After this the horizon became more limited,
but no squall occurred for a quarter of an hour. When the
lugger was missed, the Proserpine was heading up within
half a point of the spot at which she was supposed to be. In
a short time she drove past this point, perhaps a hundred
fathoms to leeward of it. Here she tacked, and stretching
off a sufficient distance to the southward and westward, came
round again, and heading up east-south-east, was thought to
sweep along over the empty track. Not a sign of the
missing
vessel was discovered. The sea had swallowed all,
lugger, people, and hamper. It was supposed that, owing
to the fact that so many light articles had been left on
the rocks, nothing remained to float. All had accompanied
le Feu-Follet to the bottom. Of boats there were none,
these being at the islet of the ruins, and, if any seaman
swam off in the desperate attempt to save his life in the
midst of the cauldron of waters, he did not succeed, or was
overlooked by the English in their search. The latter,
indeed
,
may have miscalculated their distances, and not have
passed within a cable's-length of the place where the
victims
,
if any such there were, still struggled for existence.
Cuffe, and all around him, were forcibly struck with so
unlooked-for and so dire a calamity. The loss of a vessel,
under such circumstances, produces an effect like a
sudden
death among companions. It is a fate all may meet
with, and it induces reflection and sadness. Still, the
English
did not give up the hope of rescuing some unfortunate
wretch, clinging to a spar, or supporting himself by
super-natural
efforts, for several hours. At noon, however, the
ship squared away, and ran for Naples, before the wind,
being drawn aside from her course by another chase, in
which she succeeded better, capturing a sloop-of-war, which
she carried in, several days later.
The first act of Cuffe, on anchoring in the fleet, was to go
on board the Foudroyant, and report himself and his
proceedings
to the rear-admiral. Nelson had heard nothing
of the result, beyond what had occurred at the islets, and
the separation of the ships.
Well, Cuffe, he said, reaching out his remaining hand,
kindly, to his old Agammenon, as the other entered the
cabinthe fellow has got off, after all! It has been a
bad business, altogether, but we must make the best of it.
Where do you fancy the lugger to be?
Cuffe explained what had happened, and put into the
admiral's hand an official letter, explaining his recent
success
.
With the last, Nelson was pleasedat the first,
surprised
.
After a long, thoughtful pause, he went into the
after-cabin, and returned, throwing a small, jack-like, flag
on the floor.
As Lyon was cruising about, he said, and his sloop
was pitching her cat-heads under, this thing was washed
upon a spare anchor, where it stuck. It's a queer flag.
Can it have had any connection with the lugger?
Cuffe looked, and he immediately recognized the little
ala e ala
jack, that the Italians had described to him, in
their many conversations. It was the only vestige that was
ever found of the Wing-and-Wing.
CHAPTER XV.
How beautiful is sorrow, when 'tis drest
By virgin innocence! It makes
Felicity in others, seem deformed.
Davenant
.
We
must return to the rocks, and the melancholy
scene they offered. Our purposes will be answered, however,
by advancing the time into the evening, omitting many
things that the reader can imagine, without our relating
them.
It is scarcely necessary to say, that Andrea Barrofaldi,
and Vito Viti, took no part in the bloody transactions we
have related. When all was over, however, they drew near
to the rocks, and, sitting in their boat, contemplating the
sad spectacle presented within the narrow compass of the
islet of the ruins, the following short dialogue occurred
between them:
Vice-governatore, demanded the podest, pointing to
the place where Sir Frederick lay, a motionless corpse,
Raoul bleeding, and others were writhing under their
woundsdo you call this reality, or is it a part of that
damnable doctrine, which is enough to set the whole earth
by the ears, and to turn men into tigers and hawks?
I fear, neighbour Vito, this will only prove too true. I
see the bodies of Sir Dashwood and Sir Smees; and God
knows how many more have this day departed for the world
of spirits.
Leaving behind them only a world of shadows,
muttered
Vito Viti, even that melancholy spectacle failing to
draw his thoughts altogether from a discussion that had now
lasted near four-and-twenty hours. But the moment was
Vol. II.  17
not propitious to argument, and the two Italians landed.
This was within half-an-hour after the struggle had ceased;
and our intentions are to advance the time to the moment
mentioned in the opening of this Chapter.
We must give here, however, a rapid sketch of the
proceedings
that narrowed down the view to that we intend
shortly to lay before the reader. As soon as there was
leisure, Winchester made a survey of the field of battle. He
found many of his own men slain, and more wounded. Of
the French on the islet, quite half were hurt; but the mortal
wound received by their leader, was the blow that all
lamented. The surgeon soon pronounced Raoul's case to
be hopeless; and this declaration was heard with regret even
by generous enemies. The defence had been desperate;
it would have succeeded, had it been within the scope
of possibility for so few courageous men to repel double
their numbers of those who were equally brave. Both sides
had fought for honour; and, when this is the case, victory
generally awaits the strongest.
As soon as it was perceived that all the ships were likely
to be led far to leeward, in chase, the English officers felt
the necessity of acting for themselves. The medical men
had been busy from the first, and in the course of a couple
of hours, all had been done for the wounded that present
circumstances would allow. The amputations were few,
and each vessel having sent a surgeon, these were all made,
while the other appliances had been successfully used in such
cases as would be benefited by them. The day was
drawing
near a close, and the distance from the fleet was so great
as to call for exertion.
As soon, therefore, as the uninjured men were refreshed,
and the wounded cared for, the latter were put into the
launches, in the best manner they might be, and the cutters
took them in tow. One had no sooner received its
melancholy
freight, than it left the islets, on its way to the
hospitalship
of the fleet. The others succeeded, in turn; the unhurt
French willingly offering to assist in the performance of this
pious duty. At length, but three boats remained. One was
Sir Frederick's gig, which Winchester had kept for his own
particular use; another was the yawl of Andrea Barrofaldi;
and the third, the little craft in which Carlo Giuntotardi had
come from the shore. Of the French, no one remained but
the surgeon of the lugger, Raoul's steward and personal
attendant, and Raoul himself. If to these be added the two
Italians, and their oarsmen, Carlo and his niece, with
Winchester
and his boat's crew, we enumerate all who now
remained at the rocks.
By this time the sun had sunk below the adjacent hills,
and it was necessary to decide on some course. Winchester
consulted the surgeon as to the expediency of removing his
patient. Could it be done, it had better be done soon.
Mons. lieutenant
, answered this personage a little drily,
mon brave capitaine
has but a short time to live. He has
entreated to be left here, on the scene of his glory, and in
the company of that female whom he so well loved
mais
you are the victors shrugging his shouldersand you
will do your own pleasure.
Winchester coloured and bit his lips. The idea of
torturing
Raoul, either in body or mind, was the last intention
of one so humane, but he felt indignant at the implied
suspicion
.
Commanding himself, notwithstanding, he bowed
courteously, and intimated that he would remain himself,
with his prisoner, until all were over. The Frenchman was
surprised, and when he read the sympathy of the other in
the expression of his countenance, he felt regret for his own
distrust, and still more at having expressed it.
Mais, Monsieur
, he answered, night will soon come
you may have to pass it on the rocks.
And if we do, doctor, it is no more than we seamen are
used to. Boat-service is common duty with us. I have
only to wrap myself in my cloak, to enjoy a seaman's
comfort
.
This settled the matter, and no more was said. The
surgeon
,
a man accustomed to the exercise of such resources,
soon managed to make his dispositions for the final scene.
In clearing the lugger, a hundred light articles had been
thrown on the islet on which she had touched, and among
others were several rude mattresses of the seamen. Two
or three of these were procured, placed on the smoothest
surface of the rock, and a bed formed for Raoul. The
medical
man, and the seamen, would have erected a tent with a
sail, but this the wounded man forbade.
Let me breathe the free air, he saidI shall use but
little of it;let that little be free.
It was useless to oppose such a wish, nor was there any
motive for it. The air was pure, and little need be
apprehended
from the night, in behalf of Ghita, surrounded as
they were by the pure waters of the ocean. Even when the
Tramontana came, although it was cool, its coolness was
not unpleasant, the adjacent hill sheltering the islets from
its immediate influence.
The English seamen collected some fuel from the spare
spars of the lugger, and lighted a fire on the rock where
they had been found. Food of all sorts was abundant, and
several casks of water had been struck out whole, as provision
against a siege. Here they made coffee, and cooked enough
food for the wants of all the party. The distance prevented
their disturbing those who remained near Raoul, while the
light of the fire, which was kept in a cheerful blaze, cast a
picturesque glow upon the group around the dying man, as
soon as the night had fairly set in. It superseded, too, the
necessity of any lamps or torches.
We pass over all the first outpourings of Ghita's anguish,
when she learned the wound of Raoul, her many and
fervent
prayers, and the scenes that took place during the time
that the islet was still crowded with the combatants. More
quiet hours succeeded when these last were gone; and as
the night advanced, something like the fixed tranquillity of
settled despair followed the first emotions. When ten o'clock
arrived, we reach the moment at which we wish to raise the
curtain once more, in order to present the principal actors
in the scene.
Raoul lay on the summit of the islet, where his eye could
range over the mild waters that washed the rock, and his
ear listen to the murmuring of his own element. The
Tramontana
,
as usual, had driven all perceptible vapour from the
atmosphere, and the vault of heaven, in its cerulean blue,
and spangled with thousands of stars, stretched itself above
him, a glorious harbinger for the future, to one who died in
hope. The care of Ghita and the attendants had collected
around the spot, so many little comforts as to give it the air
of a room suddenly divested of sides and ceiling, but
habitable
and useful. Winchester, fatigued with his day's work,
and mindful of the wish that Raoul might so naturally feel
to be alone with Ghita, had lain down on a mattress,
leaving
orders to be called should anything occur; while the
surgeon, conscious that he could do no more, had imitated
his example, making a similar request. As for Carlo
Giuntotardi
,
he seldom slept; he was at his prayers in the ruins.
Andrea and the podest paced the rock to keep themselves
warm, slightly regretting the sudden burst of humanity
which had induced them to remain.
Raoul and Ghita were alone. The former lay on his
back, his head bolstered, and his face upturned towards the
vault of heaven. The pain was over, and life was ebbing
fast. Still, the mind was unshackled, and thought busy as
ever. His heart was still full of Ghita; thought his
extraordinary
situation, and more especially, the glorious view
before his eyes, blended certain pictures of the future, with
his feelings, that were as novel as he found them powerful.
With the girl it was different. As a woman, she had felt
the force of this sudden blow in a manner that she found
difficult to bear. Still, she blessed God, that what had
occurred, happened in her presence, as it might be; leaving
her the means of acting, and the efficacy of prayer. To say
that she did not yet feel the liveliest love for Raoul, all that
tenderness which constitutes so large a portion of woman's
nature, would be untrue; but, her mind was now made up
to the worst, and her thoughts were of another state of
being.
A long pause had occurred, in which Raoul remained
steadfastly gazing at the starry canopy above.
It is remarkable, Ghita, he said, at length, that I
Raoul Yvardthe corsairthe man of wars and tempests
fierce combats and hair-breadth escapes  should be dying
here, on this rock, with all those stars looking down upon
me, as it might be, from your heaven, seeming to smile upon
me!
Why not
your
heaven, as well as mine, Raoul? Ghita
answered, tremulously. It is as vast as He who dwells in
it  whose throne it is  and can contain all who love him,
and seek his mercy.
Dost thou think one like me would be received into his
presence, Ghita?
17 *
Do not doubt it  free from all error and weakness
Himself, his Holy Spirit delights in the penitent and the
sorrowful
.
Oh! dearest, dearest Raoul, if thou
would'st
but
pray!
A gleam, like that of triumph, glowed on the face of the
wounded man; and Ghita, in the intensity of her
expectation
,
rose, and stood over him, her own features filled with a
momentary hope.
Mon Feu-Follet! exclaimed Raoul, letting the tongue
reveal the transient thought which brought the gleam of
triumph to his countenance. Thou, at least, hast escaped!
These English will not count thee among their victims, and
glut their eyes on thy charming proportions!
Ghita felt a chill at her heart. She fell back on her seat,
and continued watching her lover's countenance, with a
feeling of despair, though inextinguishable tenderness was
still crowding around her soul. Raoul heard the
movement
;
and turning his head, he gazed at the girl, for quite
a minute, with a portion of that intense admiration that used
to gleam from his eyes in happier moments.
It is better as it is, Ghita, he said, than that I should
live without thee. Fate has been kind, in thus ending my
misery.
Oh! Raoul! there is no fate, but the holy will of God.
Deceive not thyself, at this awful moment; but bow down
thy proud spirit, in humility, and turn to Him for succour!
Poor Ghita!Well, thine is not the only innocent mind
by millions, that hath been trammelled by priests; and, I
suppose, what hath commenced with the beginning, will last
till the end.
The beginning and the end, are both God, Raoul. Since
the commencement of time, hath he established laws which
have brought about the trials of thy lifethe sadness of
this very hour.
And dost thou think he will pardon all thy care of one
so unworthy?
Ghita bowed her head to the mattress over which she
leaned, and buried her face in her hands. When the minute
of prayer, that succeeded, was over, and her face was again
raised with the flush of feeling tempered by innocence on it,
Raoul was lying on his back, his eyes riveted, again, on the
vault of heaven. His professional pursuits had led him
farther into the study of astronomy than comported with his
general education; and, addicted to speculation, its facts
had often seized upon his fancy, though they had failed to
touch his heart. Hitherto, indeed, he had fallen into the
common error of limited research, and found a confirmation
of his suspicions, in the assumed grasp of his own reason.
The dread moment that was so near, could not fail of its
influence, however; and that unknown future over which he
hung, as it might be, suspended by a hair, inevitably led
his mind into an inquiry after the unknown God.
Dost thou know, Ghita, he asked, that the learned
of France tell us that all yonder bright stars are worlds,
peopled most probably like this of our own, and to which
the earth appears but as a star itself, and that, too, of no
great magnitude?
And what is this, Raoul, to the power and majesty of
Him who created the universe? Ah! think not of the things
of his hand, but of Him who made them!
Hast thou ever heard, my poor Ghita, that the mind of
man hath been able to invent instruments to trace the
movements
of all these worlds, and hath power, even, to calculate
their wanderings with accuracy, for ages to come?
And dost
thou
know, my poor Raoul, what this mind
of man is?
A part of his naturethe highest quality; that which
maketh him the lord of earth.
His highest qualityand that which maketh him lord
of earth, in one sense, truly; but, after all, a mere fragment
a spot on the width of the heavensof the spirit of God
himself. It is, in this sense, that he hath been made in the
image of his creator.
Thou think'st then, Ghita, that man is God, after all.
Raoul!Raoul! if thou would'st not see me die with
thee, interpret not my words in this manner!
Would it, then, be so hard to quit life in my company,
Ghita? To me it would seem supreme felicity were our
places to be changed.
To go whither? Hast thou bethought thee of this, my
beloved?
Raoul answered not for some time. His eyes were
fastened
on a bright star, and a tumult of thought began to
crowd upon his brain. There are moments in the life of
every man, when the mental vision obtains clearer views of
remote conclusions, equally in connection with the past and
the future, as there are days, when an atmosphere purer
than common, more readily gives up its objects to the
physical
organs,  leaving the mind momentarily the master,
almost without control. One of these gleams of truth passed
over the faculties of the dying man, and it could not be
altogether
without its fruits. Raoul's soul was agitated by novel
sensations.
Do thy priests fancy that they who have known and
loved each other in this life, he asked, will know and
love each other, in that which they fancy is to come?
The life that is to come, Raoul, is one all love, or one
all hatred. That we may know each other, I try to hope;
nor, do I see any reason for disbelieving it. My uncle is
of opinion it must be so.
Thy uncle, Ghita? What, Carlo Giuntotardihe who
seemeth never to think of things around him  doth a mind
like his dwell on thoughts as remote and sublime as this?
Little dost thou know, or understand him, Raoul. His
mind seldom ceases to dwell on thoughts like these; this is
the reason why earth, and all it contains, seem so
indifferent
.
Raoul made no answer, but appearing to suffer under the
pain of his wound, the feelings of woman so far prevailed
over Ghita's tender nature, that she had not the heart to
press even his salvation on him, at such a moment. She
offered him soothing drinks, and nursed him with unabated
care; and when there seemed to be a cessation to his
sufferings
,
she again passed minutes on her knees, her whole soul
absorbed in his future welfare. An hour passed in this
manner, all on, or near the rock sleeping, overcome by
fatigue, but Ghita and the dying man.
That star haunts me, Ghita! Raoul at length muttered.
If it be really a world, some all-powerful hand must have
created it. Chance never made a world, more than chance
made a ship. Thought  mind  intelligence must have
governed at the formation of one, as well as of the other.
For months Ghita had not known an instant as happy as
that. It appeared as if the mind of Raoul were about to
extricate itself from the shallow philosophy so much in
fashion, and which had hitherto deadened a nature so kind,
an intellect ordinarily so clear. Could his thoughts but once
take the right direction, she had strong confidence in the
distinctness of their views, but most of all in the goodness
of the Deity.
Raoul, she whispered, God is there, as he is with us,
on this rock. His spirit is everywhere. Bless him!bless
him in thy soul, my beloved, and be for ever happy!
Raoul answered not. His face was upturned, and his eye
still remained riveted on that particular star. Ghita would
not disturb him, but taking his hand in hers, she once more
knelt, and resumed her prayers. Minute passed after
minute
,
and neither seemed disposed to speak. At length Ghita
became woman again, and bethought her of her patient's
bodily wants. It was time to administer the liquids of the
surgeon, and she advanced to hold them to his lips. The
eye was still fastened on the star, but the lips did not meet
her with the customary smile of love. They were compressed,
as when the body was about to mingle in the strife of a
battle
,
a sort of stern resolution being settled on them. Raoul
Yvard was dead.
The discovery of the truth was a fearful moment to Ghita.
Not a living being near her had the consciousness of her
situation; all being bound in the sleep of the weary. The
first feeling was that which belonged to her sex. She threw
herself on the body, and embraced it wildly, giving way to
those pent-up emotions, of which her lover, in his moody
humours, was wont to accuse her of not possessing. She
kissed the forehead, the cheeks, the pallid, stern lips of the
dead; and, for a time, there was the danger that her own
spirit might pass away in the paroxysm of her grief. But,
it was morally impossible for Ghita to remain long under
the influence of despair. Her gentle spirit had communed
too long and too closely with her Heavenly Father, not to
resort to his support in all the critical moments of life. She
prayed, for the tenth time, that night, and arose from her
knees calm, if not absolutely resigned.
The situation of Ghita was now as wildly picturesque as
it was moving to her inmost spirit. All around her still slept,
and that, to the eye, as profoundly as he who was only to
rise again, when the sea and the land gave up their dead.
The excitement and exertions of the past day produced
their reaction, and seldom did sleep exercise a more
profound
influence. The fire was still burning bright, on the
islet of the gig-men, casting its rays fairly atwhart the
ruins, the different sleepers in them, and the immoveable
body of the dead. At moments, gusts of the Tramontana,
which was now blowing fresh, descended so low as to fan the
flames, when the glare that succeeded seemed to give a
startling
reality to all that surrounded the place.
Still, the girl was too highly sustained, to be moved with
anything but her loss, and her restless inquietude for the
departed spirit. She saw that even her uncle slept, leaving
her truly alone with Raoul. Once a feeling of desertion
came over her, and she was inclined to arouse some of the
sleepers. She did approach the spot where the surgeon
lay, and her hand was raised to stir him, when a flash of
light shot atwhart the pallid countenance of Raoul, and she
perceived that his eyes were still open. Drawing near, she
bent over the body, gazing long and wistfully into those
windows of the soul, that had so often beamed on her in
manly tenderness, and she felt, like a miser with his hoarded
gold, unwilling to share it with any other.
Throughout the livelong night did Ghita watch by the
body of her well-beloved, now hanging over it with a
tenderness
no change could extinguish, now besieging
heaven
with her prayers. Not one awoke, to interfere with
the strange happiness she felt in those pious offices, or to
wound her sensibilities, by the surprise or the sneers of the
vulgar. Ere the day came, she closed the eyes of Raoul
with her own hands, covered his body with a French
ensign, that lay upon the rock, and sat, patient and resigned,
awaiting the moment when some of the others might be
ready to aid her in performing the last pious offices in
behalf
of the dead. As a Romanist, she found a holy
consolation
in that beautiful portion of her church's creed, that
admits of unceasing petition for the souls of the departed,
even to the latest hour of earthly things.
Winchester was the first to stir. Starting up, he
appeared to be astonished at the situation in which he found
himself; but a glance around told the whole truth.
Advancing
towards Ghita, he was about to inquire after the
welfare of Raoul, when, struck by the expression of her
seraphic countenance, he turned to the body, and read the
truth in the appropriate pall. It was no time for
self-upbraidings
,
or for reproaches to others; but arousing the
sleepers, in a subdued and respectful manner, he gave to the
place the quiet and seeming sanctity of a chapel.
Carlo Giuntotardi, soon after, begged the dead body from
the conquerors. There was no motive for denying the
request, and it was placed in a boat, and towed to the shore,
accompanied by all who had remained. The heavy sirocco
that soon succeeded, drove the waves atwhart the islet of the
ruins, effectually erasing its stains of blood, and sweeping
every trace of le Feu-Follet, and of the recent events, into
the sea.
At the foot of the Scaricatojo, the seamen constructed a
rude bier, and thus they bore the dead up that wild, and yet
lovely precipice, persevering in their good work until they
reached the cottage of Carlo Giuntotardi's sister. A little
procession accompanied the body from the first; and, Ghita
being universally known and respected among the simple
inhabitants of those heights, when it entered the street of
St. Agata, it had grown into a line that included a hundred
believers.
The convent, the empty buildings of which still crown
the summit of one of the adjacent hills, was then in
existence
as a religious community; and the influence of Carlo
Giuntotardi was sufficient to procure its offices in behalf
of the dead. For three days and nights did the body of
Raoul Yvard, the unbeliever, lie in the chapel of that holy
fraternity, his soul receiving the benefit of masses; and then
it was committed to holy ground, to await the summons of
the last trump.
There is a strange disposition in the human breast to
withhold praise from a man when living, that is freely
accorded to him when dead. Although we believe that
envy, and its attendant evil, detraction, are peculiarly
democratic
vices, meaning thereby that democracy is the most
fertile field in which these human failings luxuriate, yet is
there much reason to think that our parent nation is
preeminent
in the exhibition of the peculiarity first mentioned.
That which subsequently awaited Napoleon, after his
imprisonment
and death, was now exhibited in the case of
Raoul Yvard, on a scale suited to his condition and renown.
From being detested in the English fleet, he got to be
honoured and extolled. Now that he was dead and
harmless
,
his seamanship could be praised, his chivalry emulated,
his courage glorified. Winchester, McBean, O'Leary, and
Clinch, attended his funeral, quite as a matter of course.
They had proved themselves worthy to be there; but many
others insisted on being of the party. Some came to get a
last look of so celebrated an adventurer, even in his coffin;
others to say they had been present; and not a few to catch
a glimpse of the girl whose romantic, but innocent passion,
had got to be the subject of much discourse in the ships.
The result was such a procession, and such funeral honours,
as threw the quiet little hamlet of St. Agata into
commotion
.
All noted the particulars, and all were pleased but
Ghita. On her, these tardy compliments failed of their
effect, her soul being engrossed with the great care of
petitioning heaven in behalf of the deceased.
Andrea Barrofaldi and Vito Viti, too, figured on this
occasion; the latter taking care to let all who would listen,
understand how closely he had been connected with Sir
Smees; no longer viewed as an impostor, but honoured as
a hero. He even created a little difficulty in claiming a
precedency for the
toga
over arms on the occasion; well
knowing that if the vice-governatore got a conspicuous
place in the ceremony, that the podest could not fail to be
near at hand. The matter was settled entirely to Andrea's
satisfaction, if not to that of his friend.
To confess the truth, Nelson was not sorry for what had
occurred. When he learned the desperate nature of Raoul's
defence, and heard some traits of his liberal conduct on
various occasions, he felt a generous regret at his death;
but he thought even this preferable to escape. When Cuffe
got in, and brought the report of the lugger's fate, though he
would have preferred her capture, the common sentiment
settled down into a feeling that both lugger and commander
had fared as well as a privateer and her people usually
merited.
As a matter of course, those concerned in the capture,
and who survived the affair, reaped some advantages from
their success. England seldom fails in the duty of
conferring
rewards, more especially in her marine. When Cook
returned from his renowned voyages, it was not to meet
with persecution and neglect, but credit and justice. Nelson
knew how to appreciate that spirit and enterprise, which
were so often exercised by himself. As for Sir Frederick
Dashwood, little could be done besides giving his name an
honourable place on the list of those who had fallen in battle.
His heir wore mourning, seemed filled with sorrow, and
inwardly rejoiced at being a baronet with some thousands a
year. Lyon got his ship, and, from that moment, he ceased
to consider the chase and all connected with le Feu-Follet
an unprofitable thing. Airchy followed him to the
Terpsichore
,
with visions of prize-money before his eyes, which
were tolerably realized in the course of the succeeding five
years.
Winchester was promoted into the Ringdove, and Griffin
became first of the Proserpine. This, of course, made
Yelverton
second, and left one vacancy. Thus far the orders
had been made out, when Cuffe dined with the Admiral, by
invitation, tte--tte.
One of my objects in having you here to-day, Cuffe,
observed Nelson, as they sat together over their wine, the
cabin cleared, was to say something about the vacant berth
in your gun-room, and the other was to beg a
master's-mate
of you, in behalf of Berry. You remember that some
of your people were received on board here, before you got
in, the other day?
I do, my lord; and I meant to make my
acknowledgments
for the favour. The poor fellows had a warm time
of it at the rocks, and deserved comfortable berths after it
was over.
I believe we gave them as muchat least, I know few
suffer in this ship. Well, there was a mate among them,
who is a little advanced, and who is likely to stick where he
is, by what I learn. We want just such a man for the hold,
and I have promised my Captain to speak to you about him.
Don't let him go if there 's any reason for wishing to retain
Vol. II.  18
him; but we have three seamen ready to exchange against
him; good fellows too, they tell me.
Cuffe picked some nuts, and appeared a little at a loss for
a reply. Nelson saw this, and he fancied the other
reluctant
to give up his mate.
Well, I see how it is, he said, smiling. We must do
without him, and you will keep your Mr. Clinch. A thorough
officer in a ship's hold is an advantage not to be thrown
away; and I suppose, if Hotham had asked such a thing of
old Agamemnon, he might have whistled for the favour.
The deuce is in it, if we do not get as good a mate
somewhere
!
It 's not that, my lordyou 're welcome to the man,
though a better, in his station, cannot be had. But, I was
in hopes his recent good conduct, and his long services, might
give him a lift into the vacant gun-room berth.
The Admiral appeared surprised, while he did not seem
to be exactly pleased.
It has a hard look, I grant you, Cuffe, to keep a poor
devil ten or fifteen years in the same station, and this, too,
after he has served long enough for a commission. I was
a captain ten years younger than this Mr. Clinch must be
to-day, and it does
seem
hard; and yet I doubt not it is just.
I have rarely known a midshipman or a mate passed over, in
this way, that there was not some great fault at the bottom.
We must think of the service, as well as of generosity.
I confess all this, my lord  and yet I did hope poor
Clinch's delinquencies would at length be forgotten.
If there are any particular reasons for it, I should like
to hear them.
Cuffe now related all that had passed between himself and
the master's-mate; taking care to give Jane a due place in
his history. Nelson began to twitch the stump of his arm,
and by the time the story was told, Clinch's promotion was
settled. An order was sent forthwith, to the secretary, to
make out the orders, and Cuffe carried them back with him
to the Proserpine that night, when he returned to his own
ship.
All Nelson's promotions were confirmed by the Admiralty,
pretty much as a matter of course. Among others was that
of Clinch, who now became the junior lieutenant of the
Proserpine
.
This elevation awakened new feelings within him.
He dressed better; refrained from the bottle; paid more
attention to his mind; improved in manners, by keeping
better company; and, in the course of the next twelvemonth,
had made rapid advances towards respectability. At the
end of that time, the ship was sent home; and Jane, in her
imagination at least, received the reward of all her virtuous
constancy, by becoming his wife. Nor did Cuffe cease his
friendly offices, here. He succeeded in getting Clinch put
in command of a cutter; in which he captured a privateer,
after a warm action, within a month. This success
procured
him a gun-brig, and with her he was still more
fortunate
;
actually cutting out, with her boats, a French
sloop-of-war
,
that was not half manned, it is true, but which was
still considered a handsome prize. For this affair he got
the sloop; thus demonstrating the caprice of fortune, by
whose means he found himself a commander in less than
three years after he had been a mate. Here he stuck,
however
,
for a long time, until he got another sloop in fair fight,
when he was posted. From that moment we have lost sight
of him.
Cuffe being sent into the Gulf of Genoa, shortly after,
seized the opportunity to restore the vice-governatore and
his friend to their native island. The fame of their deeds
had preceded them, exaggerated, as a matter of course, by
the tongue of rumour. It was understood that the two Elbans
were actually in the fight, in which Raoul Yvard fell; and,
there being no one to deny it, many even believed that Vito
Viti, in particular, had killed the corsair with his own
hand. A discreet forbearance on the part of the podest,
always kept the matter so completely involved in mystery,
that we question if any traveller who should visit the island,
even at this day, would be able to learn more than we now
tell the reader. In a word, the podest, for ever after, passed
for a hero, through one of those mysterious processes by
which men sometimes reach fame; quite as much, perhaps,
to their own astonishment, as to the surprise of everybody
else.
As for Ithuel, he did not appear in America for many
years. When he did return, he came back with several
thousand dollars; how obtained no one knew, nor did he
choose to enter into particulars. He now married a widow,
and settled in life. In due time he experienced religion,
and, at this moment, is an active abolitionist, a patron of the
temperance cause, tee-totally, and a general terror to
evildoers
,
under the appellation of Deacon Bolt.
It was very different with the meek, pious and
singleminded
Ghita; though one was e'en a Roman Catholic,
and the other a Protestant, and that, too, of the Puritan
school. Our heroine had little of this world left to live for.
She continued, however, to reside with her uncle, until his
days were numbered; and then she retired to a convent,
not so much to comply with any religious superstitions, as
to be able to pass her time, uninterrupted, in repeating
prayers for the soul of Raoul. To her latest hour, and she
lived until quite recently, did this pure-minded creature
devote herself to what she believed to be the eternal welfare
of the man who had so interwoven himself with her virgin
affections, as to threaten, at one time, to disturb the just
ascendency of the dread Being who had created her.
THE END.